Chapter 161.
Between Day and Night.





The impulsive and passionate kiss didn’t last that long. Lust washed over Odette in waves of heat and when it finally came to an end, she was left with longing. She wanted that comforting warmth to last forever.

His firm hands felt warm against her cheek and she reached up with her own hand and placed it over his, his panting breaths mixed with their kiss. She tried to push him away, but he easily resisted, blocking her like a massive wall. He had always made her feel so helpless, a fact that was painfully clear in that moment. 

Bastian's lips parted from hers, his hand on her cheek,  “I will be back as soon as I can,” he said, the overwhelming embrace  holding her was gone.

   He looked deep into her eyes, his were as cool and bright as ever before, but Odette couldn’t read anything in them. She could only see her own, vague expression reflected back at her. A flush of embarrassment washed over her and she looked down at their feet. His hand became firmer as he pulled her head up to look at him again.

   “I’ll be right back, Odette,” he repeated it, swallowing his worries, and bid her a serene goodbye. It was a customary farewell between a husband heading to work and a wife seeing him off, as though it were a regular part of their everyday routine.

   Odette couldn’t think of anything to say in response, like an actress who had forgotten their lines, she stood and watched Bastian step away to his car. She could feel tears welling up and her cheeks flush.

Bastian gently caressed her face, then released her and turned away. Acting as though nothing had happened he bowed to the surprised employees and requested their understanding.

   It was all an act, he told himself, as he opened the car door and stepped into his seat. He was just pretending, to hide the truth. They were just actors on a stage.

The ivory car thundered down the lane, it started moving slowly into the radiant sunshine. Picking up speed, leaving the mansion's entrance behind and making its way toward the coastal road, where the turquoise sea sparkled before them.

Bastian never once looked back at her until he reached the road.



“Madam is going out?” The driver, who was polishing the car, stopped what he was doing to consider what Dora had just told him.

   “Yes, the master has given permission,” Dora said calmly.

   “But didn’t the master forbid madam from leaving the mansion grounds?”

   “Pah, that order lost all meaning weeks ago, how many times has she been out already?”

   “Well, yeah, I suppose,” the driver said, trying to work out how the logic didn’t work, but coming up with no solution, he reluctantly agreed with Dora.

   “She will be coming with me to Ardenne, to get some fresh air and a change of scenery.” Dora leaned heavily on the fact that, being head maid, she had some authority over the other staff, with Lovis being the only one that could undermine her.

   “Very well,” the driver said, “give me thirty minutes to get the car ready,” the driver said.

   It would be tight, but they should still be able to make their ‘chance’ encounter with Countess Trier in town. There would be a little public display, where Countess Trier will urge Odette to come away with her, to a safe place away from Bastian, after Odette has been made aware that Bastian had been ordered by the Emperor to divorce after series of shameful incidents associated with Klauswitz family.

   It wouldn’t change the fact that Odette was leaving her husband, but at least this way, Bastian might be able to cling on to some honour, if it was thought Odette was forced away from Bastian, rather than his wife having run away from him again.

   Dora left the garage and hurried back to the mansion. She firstly went about the other servants, asking them if they needed anything in town, hinting that she would be escorting Odette on a little excursion. Then she went to Odette, to see if she was ready to leave.

   Tonight, Dora was probably going to have to leave the mansion. She looked at the packed suitcases, conflict raging in her mind. She would not be able to keep her involvement from Bastian.  He would surely suspect her and uncover the truth. Even if her decision was based on concern for her master, betrayal remained betrayal. If Bastian held her responsible, Dora was prepared to face the consequences.

   Resolute, Dora got changed out of her maids outfit, then marched down to the bathroom on the third floor, where she had previously placed Odette's luggage. A small bag with just a few clothes was carefully hidden in the shopping cart.The list of errands in her hand, gripped tight enough to almost tear the paper.

   Odette did not appear.

   Dora went up to her room, knocking on the door softly. “Ma’am, its Dora, are you ready?”

   “Yes, come in,” Odette replied.

   When Dora pushed open the door, she saw that all of Odette’s bags were packed and neatly stacked, waiting to be taken to the car. Odette, on the other hand, did not look ready to leave. She stood at the window and stared out across the garden. She had been in this melancholy since this morning.

   “We’re all set, ma’am, are you ready to leave?” Dora said, taking a hesitant step toward Odette.

   “Yes,” Odette said strongly, almost forced.

   She turned from the window and strode across the bedroom with renewed determination and threw on her coat, hat and gloves that lay on the bed. Back straight, chin high, Odette then confidentially walked out of the bedroom.  Her eyes were red. Dora was aware that Odette had been like this since the morning she bid her husband farewell. However, what stood out was the newfound determination in her eyes.

Odette noticed the shopping cart Dora carried and walked ahead without uttering another word. Without delay, she took the lead toward the waiting car.

   The car left the mansion and made for their destination, the bustling city centre of downtown Ardenne. There the final stage of the drama would play out, the accidental meeting of Countess Trier.



Bastian arrived back at the mansion at the same time as he did the previous day, right at the border between day and night. The car slowed to a stop at the foot of the stairs leading up to the front door, there were people lined up to welcome his arrival but Odette was no where to be seen.

   Bastian pulled himself from the drivers seat and let the valet take it to the garage. He climbed the stairs deliberately, the western sky blushed with an impending sundown, promising a spectacle, with no cloud to mar its crown.

When he made it to the front door, Lovis was there. “I apologise sir,” the butler said, more solemn than usual.

   “Is dinner ready?” Bastian said, carefully scanning the entrance hall for any signs of Odette. He had instructed to move dinner time earlier, and if they had executed it correctly, dinner should be prepared promptly.

   “No, sir, but there is news,” Lovis said, as Bastian have him a scornful look. “Countess Trier has taken madam with her. She sent a notice that the imperial family have taken madam into their protection for the time being.”

   Lovis spoke in his usual flat tone. Bastian looked sharp when he mentioned Countess Trier. He snatched the envelope Lovis held out to him and eyed it suspiciously and walked to his study.

   The butler followed in Bastian’s wake without saying a word, his shadow. Even when Bastian suddenly veered off for the stairs, Lovis followed behind as if he knew Bastian was going to be going that way all along.

   Bastian threw open Odette’s door. “Madam went out to run errands with the head maid, sir, where they ran into Countess Trier, so I’m told…”

"Step aside."   Bastian ignored him and practically stomped into Odette’s room and closed the door behind him so that Lovis couldn’t follow him in.


The serene western sky had started to blush with a beautiful rosy twilight. The butler's voice had stopped, leaving the room in silence.  

Nothing about the room suggested anything was amiss. It was as meticulously clean and organised as always, just as Odette liked it. It was strange, it always felt like she she was prepared to leave at any moment, like a guest who would soon be staying and then leaving. 

“You’ve left, have you?” Bastian said to the empty room, the words that had stayed on his tongue all day. He moved over to the window sill where he looked out over the sea, the water sparkling in the deep red light. He opened it to let the cool sea breeze waft into the room. He had no choice but to accept that she was gone.


  Looking through the letter once more, the care with which each word was written suggests she must have been planning this for a long time. He crumpled the letter in his fists and tossed in onto a table. He took out the pack of cigarettes and smoked two in a row.


  A knock at the door and a soft voice, “Master, its Dora, I need to speak with you.” There was little hope it could have been Odette.

   “Come in,” Bastian snapped,  taking out his third cigarette.

   No sooner had Dora opened the door, than she began pleading for forgiveness. “I’m sorry sir, it was all my fault, whatever you wish to do, I will not disobey.” She bowed her head deep.

   Bastian leaned against the window and looked at her as he blew out a thick cloud of smoke. She had betrayed him, no matter how Countess Trier tried to make it look like she had orchestrated everything, Dora had some part to play. 

He was tired. Right now, all he wanted to do was slouch in a chair and nap.

   “Make sure dinner is ready in my room in thirty minutes,” was all he said and turned back to the window.

   “Master…”

   “Enough. You may go now.” He heard Dora let out a sob, but he did not have the patience to deal with overly emotional servants.

He strolled through the connecting corridor to his bedroom, changed into clean clothes, refreshed his face with cold water. Twilight welcomed him, as he returned to his room - cherished haven’s side.

Passing by the quietly working servants setting the table, he went to the window and glared across the bay to his fathers mansion. Now that Odette’s safety was guaranteed, he could finally begin working on his fathers ultimate end, the final act. 

With that clear goal in mind, no more distractions, he flicked his cigarette out the window and went to get ready for dinner.

He took her seat at the dining table. The feast spread before him was plentiful and enticing. He relished every morsel, leaving nothing uneaten, until he took the final bite.

Chapter 162.


Quiet Days.



The small house was situated on the bank of a small stream. It was a charming, aged, stone house with a rustic country charm.

   Carrying a folded parasol, Odette walked along the narrow path that stuck close to the stream, heading toward her little house. She placed the parasol down under the porch of the house and and unlocked the front door with the keys she had  taken from her handbag.

   She went straight to the kitchen and began organising the contents of the basket she had been carrying. Carrots, potatoes, onions, mushrooms, all the ingredients she would need to make a stew for that evenings meal. Dough for the bread was already set and ready for the oven.

   Her daily routine was a simple one, she went to the market for groceries, cooked her meals, and in the morning, she cleaned up the old house that hadn’t seen a living soul in years, or so it seemed. She would potter about the garden, too, planting flowers that would burst into a myriad of colours by the spring time, or tending to the vegetable patch. Her busy schedule made the day fly by, and the physical activities left her sleeping soundly at night.

Odette lit the oven, loaded it with coal, and waited for the heat to climb. During the wait, she placed the kettle on for tea but decided to brew coffee and headed to the outdoor rusty table in the backyard. 

   Count Xanders had offered to replace some of the more rustic looking furniture, but Odette flatly refused to let him spend any money on her. When he mentioned it would be the Countess money, as this was her house, Odette refused all the same. They had gone through enough trouble as it was, bringing her here, she didn’t want them spending even more money on her. She found it suited just as well to throw a nice, lace, table cloth over the rickety looking benches.

   Odette sat at the table in the back garden and watched the colourful sunset. The air smelt sweetly of blossom coming from the apple tree by the kitchen window.

   She reminisced about her winter in Ardenne and then finding herself spending spring in Rothewein. Adding sugar to her coffee, she couldn’t drink tea any more, not without conjuring up painful memories, she brought the bitter broth to her lips and supped.

   She had been thrilled to find out her travelling companion was none other than Count Xanders. After the chance encounter with Countess Trier, taking an hour to enjoy some tea. The Countess then took Odette to the outskirts of Ardenne, where she met the Count.

   He escorted her the rest of the way to Rothewein, making sure she arrived safely to her sanctuary and like a hibernating animal, Odette fell into a deep dream. She had crossed the uncrossable river and after days of being in a dream-like trance, she finally woke up and found she was still in the dream.

   She whittled away the days cleaning and exploring, getting herself familiar with her surroundings. She also bought groceries and some essential items.

As the quiet days passed, spring came up upon her almost by surprise. Odette felt a sense of relief. She felt sure that by the time summer arrived, Bastian would finally go ahead with the divorce and she could start anew.

Hoping for the best, she melted the sugar once more. After taking a sip of lukewarm coffee, she realized she had added too much sugar, making the coffee excessively sweet. She held her breath, staring at the fragments of sunlight filtering through the broken teacup. 

   “Good evening, Miss Marie,” someone called out and interrupted her thoughts.

   Odette looked up to see an elderly gentleman walking along the road that passed around her house. It was her neighbour, a distant relative of Count Xanders and it was then that Odette remembered her new role.

   “Oh, good evening, I hope you’re well,” Odette said. The old man muttered something heartily without stopping.

The chat with her neighbors, divided by a stone wall, stretched on for more time than expected. It covered topics ranging from when to plant beans to butter production and her grandson's school life. 

The disjointed conversation lasted longer than Odette had anticipated. When they said their goodbyes and she turned to leave, the sun had gone and so too had the light. Shaking herself into action, she cleared away the table and half drunk mug of coffee and went back into the house, where she found she couldn’t resist the urge to do a little more cleaning.

   She had no idea how much time had passed, but once she was done sweeping out the fireplace, washing the dishes, dusting the stairs and landing, reorganising the pots and pans, and scrubbing the bath, there came a loud knock at the door.

   Odette’s heart fluttered anxiously and she ran to a window to look out at who it was. She saw a tall, lank figure. A grim shadow in the darkness and her heart leaped, it was him, he had come for her at last and as thoughts of running out the back door, he spoke.

   “Odette? Its me, Maximin, are you in?”

   Relief washed over Odette and she rushed to the door and pulled it open.

   “I’m here too,” she said, smiling at him. She felt like such a fool. He had Alma with him.



News had reached Theodora that Franz had made it safely aboard the transport ship and by now, it would be sailing across the ocean. She had sent her son away from this hell and there was nothing to be concerned about any more.

   Theodora indulged in a deep, lavender bath, before picking out a fine dress for he evening. A maid came with a glass of champagne and the air was filled with the aria of her favourite opera.

   Despite the situations the Railway King had found himself in, thanks to her foresight, they were just managing to stay afloat. If she had need sold off all their hidden assets, all her jewels and resources, they would not have been able to retain their staff. They would have all jumped ship and she would have been sunk.

   All of Jeff’s ill gotten gains and stolen property had been sold on for what ever price Theodora could get for them. She gave all of that money to Franz and sent him on his way. It was just enough to live out of poverty, so long as Franz didn’t do anything stupid with it. She told him it was his inheritance from his father, which was technically true.

   He would probably have realised by now and she allowed herself a satisfied smile. She all but threw the empty champagne glass back at the maid and as she laid back in the bathtub, another came over to wash her hair.

   Theodora hoped that the end of this relationship would be a splendid tragedy. She had given everything for this and she was left nothing to show for it.

   After taking her bath, Theodora out on her favourite dress. Once she had attached the last pearl to her ear, the news she had been waiting for finally came,

   “The master has returned. He does not look happy, ma’am,” the servant said, flushed with having ran from the front door. “Today’s dinner will be…”

   “Yes, yes, tell them to get started already,” Theodora said impatiently.

   Jeff would be upset, he would most likely rant and rave and break furniture, but in the end, he will have to obey her whims when she made it clear she had the last of the money and she was going to be taking charge of it. It was exciting to be able to finally control her husband. He had once been the sweetest lover she ever had, back when they thought they were on top of everything.

   Theodora shooed away the fussing maids and sat at the dinner table patiently waiting for her husband. The whiskey bottle she had prepared for him in advanced glistened in the firelight, it was his favourite drink.

   Even though she had spent most of her life chasing after Sophia Illis’ shadow, she could sit victorious as she had possession of the man in the end. Theodora had only ever wanted one thing in her life, and no matter what happened, she was determined to protect it.

   “Theodora!” Jeff bellowed as he came into the room, anger and frustration made his face scarlet.

   Jeff Klauswitz was still as charming and handsome as ever and that fact pleased Theodora. Their love would become an unextinguishable fire of passion even after their death. It had turned out to be a favorable arrangement, as she would have a man who would belong to her for eternity. 

   Theodora stood up and smiled her best and most beautiful smile at Jeff, who eyed her suspiciously as he walked calmly to the table 

With a composed step, Theodora started to approach the man who would be hers forever.



“Please get rid of that damn notice.”

   The door to Lovis’ small office burst open and another servant, red faced with anger, appeared before him.

   Lovis closed the accounts book he had been studying and raised his eyes to the servant. “What’s going on?”

   “Another bloody scammer appeared this morning. How much longer are we going to have to put up with this?” the servant said furiously.

   “Ah, I assume you mean Margrethe’s missing posters.”

   The attendant sighed and nodded his head. “He brought in some mangy looking mutt, trying to convince us it was Odette’s dog. Can you believe it?”

   “Where is he now?”

   “Well, not here, I gave him a good thrashing and sent him on his way. He wont dare do such a thing again. He’s probably gone back to begging on some street corner by now.” The servant shrugged.

   At that point, a clock chimed, even though it wasn’t on the hour and Lovis dismissed the servant. About now, Bastian would be coming in from his exercise, so Lovis went to fetch some ice cold water and be ready for his masters return.

   Contrary to preliminary concerns, Bastian had been taking the disappearance of Odette rather well. He simply carried on with his daily routine in silence and made no effort to find his wife. Lovis knew Bastian was hurting, he had been by his masters side for years now and knew the signs. He just wished his master would find a way to move past this.

   Lovis watched Bastian run down the driveway and stop in front of him. “Your time is improving, master,” Lovis said, offering a towel and the water. Bastian took both, dabbed his face with the towel, sipped the water and gave both back to Lovis.

   “We will be leaving after I’ve had my shower, make sure the car is ready.”

   “Maybe you should think about taking a break, sir, a holiday will do you…”

   “Master, master.”

   Lovis was cut off by the head maid running out of the mansion, a newspaper held high above her head.

   “What’s going on?” Bastian said as he took the paper from Dora and read the headline.

Railroad King meets an untimely end at the hands of his wife.

The newspaper bore the special headline he had been eagerly awaiting. The tragic downfall of the former railroad magnate, murdered by his wife, and the horrific ending unfolded before him.

Chapter 163.


A Wild Beast Tied to a Rope.



“The funeral went well.” Maria Gross said in a low voice. It was the sound of a deep sigh that disappeared into the deep silence of the room.

   Bastian put down his tea cup, catching a glimpse of his fathers mansion through the window. He quickly turned his gaze back to Maria and smiled. Overwhelmed by Bastian’s heartless look, she went back to drinking her own tea, wishing she hadn’t said anything.

   Theodora had killed her husband with a poisoned bottle of whiskey, before turning a gun on herself and committing suicide. She didn’t leave a note or farewell letter. It was almost as if this last act was intentionally orchestrated to produce controversy and intrigue, and because of that, the funeral was attended by more reporters and journalists than friends and family. There was a forecast of even more excitement tomorrow, over Bastian Klauswitz, who never showed up.

   “I don’t mean to sound sincere, hers was an unforgivable sin that can not be redeemed by death, but wouldn’t you be better off paying your respects? There is really no need to be creating such problems,” Maria said, trying to appeal to Bastian’s humanity.

   Bastian smiled, his eyebrows twitching as he opened a cigarette box without saying a word. He politely offered Maria one first, before taking one for himself.

   Maria took one and lit it herself, all the while looking at Bastian with resignation. Through the grey smoke, he looked detached to her, as if he had nothing to do with the tragedy. Maria felt uneasy in his presence, as he sat there like a podium winner.  She reminisced about a past event when she found him had drowned in the sea and was attacked by a dog.

He had changed, Maria was sure of that.

   Bastian has achieved so much through his skilful manipulations and management. He was an actor who could play any roll that was needed, and an acrobat who could balance on the thinnest wire. He probably knew better than anyone what was best, but he continued to make self-destructive choices.

   “Bastian, would you like to stay with me for awhile?”

   Bastian turned from the window, where he had been looking out over the sea. Even though he looked as cool and ambitious as he had always done, Maria couldn’t help but feel unease as he considered her with his cool, blue eyes.

   “Thank you for the offer, but I will be fine.”

   “Think on it, seriously, it can’t be good for you to live in the shadow of the house your father died in.”

   “Don’t worry about that, it will soon disappear.” Bastian spoke like he was talking about the weather.

   Maria got a shock when she realised Bastian was talking literally. “Oh my god, Bastian, if you destroy that house, public opinion of you will get even worse.”

   “It doesn’t matter, we are already finalising the demolition procedure, the house will be gone by the end of the summer.” Bastian reached over to grab a glass of water, where his wristwatch slipped to reveal a scar.

   “Your wrist, what happened?” Maria said, shocked.

   “It's nothing, I got hurt while training,” Bastian said flatly.

   “Well then, I guess now that you’ve achieved everything you’ve set out to do, I suppose you will be thinking about retiring. If things continue in this way, every part of your body will be at risk of getting hurt.”

“It’s just a light scrape. It’s nothing to worry about.”

   Despite being shackled by all kinds of doubt and accusations, Bastian still managed to rise to the top. He became a person of reverence and contempt in equal measure. The fact that he was still favoured by the Emperor, despite abandoning his wife, the Emperor’s niece, contributed greatly to the fear of him.

   There might have been turmoil for a while, but Bastian had grown so big that he didn’t fear anything and Jeff Klauswitz was a prime example of what happened to those who tried to oppose him. 

Fear was indeed a powerful force and Maria felt like she no longer needed to worry after her nephew. He would overcome any crises, but she still worried about the emptiness growing in his heart.

Would it have been better for him to hold onto the foolish love?

Suddenly, a hint of regret washed over her, but she concealed it well.  “Oh, actually, Theodora did send me a letter,” Maria said, rummaging through her handbag. “It arrived the day after everything happened. It’s addressed to you, however. I guess she hoped I would pass it on and so, here it is.” Maria put the letter on the table. “I honestly didn’t know what her plan was and I did think of throwing it away, so, I guess I will leave that decision to you.”

In order to start anew, he needed to witness a complete end. Maria held the belief that Theodora's letter might, in some way, bring an end to their long and tumultuous relationship.

   Having achieved what she had set out to do, Maria got up, Bastian following suit. He placed the letter in an inside pocket and escorted Maria to the door.

   “If you change your mind, about staying with me for a time, you can contact me via the usual methods.”

   “Yes, I will,” Bastian said distantly. 

A hollow laugh flowed from Maria's lips as she stared at his fascinating face.  It seemed that Bastian was determined to protect this grave until the bitter end.



The rope tightened, causing the bed to creak and groan under the effort. Something had to give and with a concerted effort and a last groan of aching wood, the rope went slack again.

   The noise in the room was replaced by the sounds of ragged breathing. The rope tied around his wrist was tight and the more he struggled, the tighter the rope became. He was like a trapped beast, who would thrash around until exhausted, then collapse in a sweating heap. Blood trickled from the exposed flesh, where the rope had rubbed it raw. His vacant expression remained calm.

   Lying on the floor, he convulsed and moaned for a while, until his breathing slowed and he drifted back into calm sleep. He didn’t open his eyes until the first rays of morning shine in through a slither of a gap in the curtains.

The room, bathed in the tranquil blue dawn light pouring in through the window, had the sensation of being submerged in deep water.


Slowly and awkwardly sitting up, he could see that the handkerchief he had put under the ropes, to catch the blood, had slipped away and was no where to be seen. Shaking away the drowsiness from his mind, he untied the knot of the rope around his wrist.

   His nightmares were growing more cruel. He dreamed of a young child, holding his mothers hand as they enjoyed their time together. Just a normal day as a happy family. He had hoped that the sleeping pills he got from Doctor Kramer would put him under deep enough to prevent his sleep walking, but the rub of the rope on his wrists would suggest otherwise.

After the fading remnants of the dream dissipated, Bastian rose from bed and made his way to the bathroom. He splashed his face vigorously with ice-cold water, drenching his nightshirt until it adhered to his skin. After returning to the bedroom, his face had visibly transformed from the tumultuous night when the disturbance had taken place.

   After gulping down most of the water in the jug on the bedside table, he got out of his sweat drenched pyjamas and put on a robe. He then cleaned the rope burn and bandaged the raw flesh. He didn’t feel any pain from it, but it looked angry as he wrapped it.

   Plucking up a strong cigar, he went out onto the balcony to watch the morning sun grow stronger. He gazed across the glittering sea, where the darkness was receding across his fathers world.

   He found small comfort in his fathers demise, he had finally got payback for all the wrongs Jeff had done to Bastian’s mother and as a bonus, his step-mother was right there beside him. He wanted to give back everything he received.

   With all his heart, he had loved someone who betrayed him, endured hellish torment and ultimately wished for the destruction he had orchestrated with his own hands. Even though everything had gone according plan, there was still a lingering sense of regret.

Brushing off the lingering ash, Bastian returned to his room and got ready for the day.   When he removed his robe to get showered, he saw it, the letter from Theodora Klauswitz. He had not opened it yet. 

The dawn's sunlight, piercing through the sea, unveiled the concealed scars lurking in the darkness. Placing the cigar between his teeth, Bastian unceremoniously ripped open the envelope and read the letter.

You must believe you’ve won, Bastian, but have you really?|

Theodora's will began with a mocking question penned in elegant handwriting.

Chapter 164.


I Have Won.




As you have wished, my heart is broken, but it has nothing to do with you. My heart was broken a long time ago.

I gave everything to win your father's love. I was so confident that I had achieved what I set out to do. That is, until I found out that within his heart there stood a temple to the woman I had killed with my own hands. There was no other way to beat Sophia Illis, who your father worshipped. You were the one who constantly reminded me of that.

My pain grew with you!

Every time I saw you, I felt like I was losing all over again and that humiliation was passed on to my son. The day I foresaw the future of Franz Klauswitz as a shrivelled husk of his potential, I made a decision. I would do what ever it took to throw you into the abyss and I finally did it. It was quite the heart warming achievement.

Every time you broke down it made me happy. It was a confirmation that my choices were never the wrong one. Even now.

Its funny how you think your fathers betrayal can bring me down. I know all too well Jeff’s mean underbelly. I even accepted this as part of my love. I am different from you, who was hurt loving an illusion.

I have kept this love in the grave, buried alive, without hope or expectations and through that, I have loved Jeff deeper and truer than anyone, not even your mother, nor any of her substitutes or even Jeff himself. The only reason I stood on the game board was because it was a way to ruin you.

By the time you read this, everything will be at the end you wished. All the honour and power equivalent of any noble family that you have sought will be tarnished. The name Klauswitz will forever be synonymous with scandal and stigma. That is my gift to you.

Henceforth, you shall bear the name Klauswitz. This name shall prove a far more potent weapon for you than your status as a junk dealer's grandson ever was. Your true identity matters little, for what the world truly seeks is an excuse to despise and reject you.

Congratulations on becoming a Klauswitz, Bastian. Now you have become a true heir, inheriting everything your family has wrought.

I am sure you will do well. No doubt you will bare the stigma on your own terms, ascend to the iron blood throne amidst fear and contempt. You will no doubt become richer still and stronger everyday, but as you do so, your life will become more and more empty, because you wont be able to live like your father.

I am leaving having achieved what I have longed for the most. Jeff will be forever mine and you will never be able to live properly. You will slowly wither away amidst your desires, but Bastian, what have you got really?

I know you never wanted to be rich or to amass fame. I know that you wanted the love of a good woman, the comforts of home and a child. You were once a kind hearted soul that desired such things and you still do, but you have lost that forever, you’ve dried up in loneliness amidst unwanted wealth and fame.

So I have won.

May your life of defeat continue to haunt you each time you open your eyes until forever. I hope in the next life, you will be my son, and I will grant you the entire world.

As he read to the end of the letter, the room brightened with the passage of the morning. Bastian folded the letter and put it back in its envelope. He then tossed the whole thing into the fireplace and watched the flames dance across the paper. He gazed upon the morning sky, imbued with the fresh, clear vibes of spring, swallowing the memory of the woman that had kept him warm in the middle of the night.

   After catching his breath, he continued on with his morning like it was any other day. He showered, put on his uniform and decided that he would accept the leave offered by the admiralty, but just as he reached to pick up the receiver, the phone rang.

   “This is Bastian.”

  -It’s me, Thomas Muller, sorry for calling you so early, but its urgent.

   “What is it?”

   “The demolition work, they’ve had a last minute cancellation and can bring forward the schedule. You have to act quick, though or you will have to wait for the usual time.”

   “I accept,” Bastian said without giving it much thought.

Thomas Müller looked taken aback, yet refrained from saying anything more.

Following the phone call, Bastian proceeded with his plan and contacted the Navy Department to inform them of his intention to resume work. As he hung up the phone, he turned around and beheld the turquoise sea expanding beyond the window, with the immense mansion vanishing into the distance.

He wanted to see things through to the end, be it new beginning, or a point of no return. Whatever end awaited, at least it would be better than being trapped in this labyrinth.



“Odette wants to go to work and you allowed it? You’re both equally weird,” Countess Trier said, clicking her tongue.

   She put down her teacup as she watched Alma clamber up onto the stool to sit in front of the piano. She then proceeded to hit the keys at random, sounding more like a cat running across the piano. That child definitely didn’t have any musical talent.

   “Lady Odette desires to be self sufficient, it makes perfect sense,” Maximin said, smiling at his daughter.

   Countess Trier squinted her eyes at Maximin. It was last weekend when Odette had called her up and said that she wanted to work. If she couldn’t get a job as a piano instructor, then she would become a maid and if not that, then maybe a shop assistant or something, anything. Maximin was in on the conspiracy apparently.

   It was such an absurd request that Trier flat out refused. Then Odette tried a different tactic, saying that she would come to discuss things in person, but by the time Odette came to Rothewein, she had already gone out and gotten herself a job, as Alma piano instructor of all things.

   Trier looked over at the piano where the pair was sat now, Odette softly and sweetly telling Alma not to hit the key. She started to demonstrate how to properly press each key and soft music played out into the room.

   “Lady Odette wishes to express her gratitude to you for all your help,” Maximin said, smiling at his daughter as she watched, wide eyed, at Odette’s nimble fingers dancing along the piano. “But she doesn’t want to return to a life completely dependent on others. It may seem arrogant to think I know what it is that Lady Odette is feeling, but I think I can accurately guess what she desires. I think you are the same.”

   The Countess let out a little giggle to hide her shock. “I see now that you were Odette’s representative all along and not mine.”

   “I hope you are not too angry with me  and have a good time with Lady Odette.” The spring sun, filtering through the blossoming branches of flowers, bestowed a tender smile upon Maximin's face.

   Countess Trier couldn’t help but let out a little chuckle. The way he so carefully handled people was just like Odette. Their tastes and personality was so similar. What little anger she felt subsided when she thought how the pair deserved each other.


The pair continued their conversation in a notably more relaxed ambiance, biding their time until Odette came.

The dedicated tutor's piano lessons concluded only when news reached them that lunch was ready.



“Major Klauswitz still hasn’t expressed any objections.” Countess Trier said, as the luncheon reached its natural end.

  The melodious songs of birds, carried in through the open window, dispelled the quietude that enveloped the table where only the two of them sat in solitude. Odette wiped her mouth with a napkin and faced the Countess with a faint smile. Alma had already finished and was in the playroom with her nanny. Count Xanders had left to take a phone call from his laboratory.

   “I’m hoping the divorce will go smoothly. Maybe Major Klauswitz wants that too. Separating you from him was just as beneficial for him as it was for you,” Countess Trier said, turning to look out the window. Odette nodded.

   The tragedy of the Klauswitz had reached them, even all the way out in the middle of the countryside. Odette had seen it in the newspaper sat on the shelf in the general store when she had stopped by to pick up some laundry soap.

   Having read every word of the paper, Odette was not shocked at all that Bastian was taking it all in his stride and he ended up absorbing his fathers business. He had shed the shackles of society and was ready to fly.

   “Count Xanders doesn’t seem to have any desire to have a successor. I think he wants to raise Alma and live a quiet life,” Countess Trier said. “I think if you continue a good relationship with him, it may become something more.” Countess Trier lowered her voice so as not to be overheard.

   “Oh, don’t say that, Countess. I haven’t even properly settled things with Bastian yet,” Odette said calmly.

   “Oh please, things are already settled, why wait?” Countess Trier said with a shrug. “I’m not suggesting you jump his bones right away, but the path is already set for you. Its not like you’ve permanently lost the ability to have a child. Once you’ve recovered your health a bit…”

   “You’ll have to excuse me, Countess,” Odette said, standing up and doing her best to hide her face, which she was sure glowed a brilliant crimson colour. “I should really get to work, today is the first lesson and I don’t want to be late.” Odette dropped a fork and nearly tipped over her cup as she tried to leave in a hurry.

   “Oh my, Odette,” Countess Trier said with a giggle.

“I heard that you plan to stay here for a day and then return. I’ll stop by one more time before you leave.”  Odette, flustered, quickly left the dining room.

   Was it a mistake to bring up the topic of having a child?

   Countess Trier, lost in thought, turned her gaze back to the window, where she looked out over a field of wild flowers.  Odette had collected her belongings and was making her way across the garden. She walked beneath the noonday sun and unfurled her umbrella after reaching the entrance gate of the villa.

The Countess found herself unable to avert her gaze from the scene until the water-blue dress hem, dancing in the spring breeze, faded away into the distance along the road.


Chapter 165.


On the Ruins.



Jeff Klauswitz’s mansion was rendered to rubble during the season the roses bloomed. Those who had heard the rumours flocked to Ardenne and created a spectacle. Bastian never once visited the house. He went to work at the Admiralty as usual, performed his duties and left.

   Once he left Ratz’s city centre, the congestion eased. He increased his speed and drove along the country roads toward Ardenne. With the days being longer, the sun was still in the sky as he drove along the coastal road. The sea was bathed in the orange and reds of a setting sun. There was a faint scent of roses on the air. It was a beautiful evening.

   When he came around a hill, where he would normally see his fathers mansion and across the bay, his own, he could see that his fathers mansion was reduced to a skeleton of its former construction. Bastian slowed down.

   There was a deep, rumbling bang. Dust billowed up from his fathers mansion, then another bang.

   Bastian passed by a crowd of cars parked up on the side of the road. It seemed like it had brought a lot of attention to Ardenne Bay. Some even sported opera glasses.

   Was it really that interesting?

   Bastion watched as a portion of the mansion collapsed. He had reluctantly accepted his fathers inheritance, but there was no pleasure in its destruction. The emptiness and fatigue caused by Odette’s disappearance persisted.

   What have you got really?

   Bastian could hear Theodora’s mocking tone in his head as he recalled the last line of the letter. Perhaps it was because he couldn’t see the true end to all of this. As he passed under the elongated shadows, Bastian turned into his own mansion.

He sent the waiting servants by the entrance away before he stepped out of the car. As the last echoes of the explosion faded, the familiar tranquility enveloped Ardenne’s bay once again.



Odette walked further than she intended. She walked the road that led past the village and to where the wheat fields were ready to be lain with crop for the spring. She removed her straw hat, her disheveled hair had been neatly braided. she tidied up the dusty hem of her skirt and sat on a bench under a leafy tree and looked out over the peaceful countryside. Some where in the distance, a chapel bell of evening prayer broke the peace.

   She listened and looked up at the clear rosy-blue sky. Evenings in Ardenne were also greeted with the sound of bells. She would linger by the windows of the mansion and look out over the sea, or the fields or even down the driveway for Bastian. It was a time when waiting brought fear and sadness.

   The bells stopped ringing and the evening deepened. Odette got up off the bench and pointed herself back home. She strolled the primrose-covered hill and made her way across the stream. Out in the countryside, the night was deep as there were no streetlamps to guide the way. She wasn’t as tired as she used to be and although it had been a slow process, her body was slowly starting to find its old strength.

She walked through a field adorned with roses and peonies, reflecting on the end of her marriage.

‘Perhaps before summer came to an end’

   The spring was a good time to let go of the past and hope for what the future might bring. That was Bastian’s usual thoughts and she would need to prepare for the worst.

   As she passed through the entrance to the village, dusk began to fall. She started to see some of the faces that were growing familiar to her. She would pause for a minute or two to exchange polite words of conversation.

   “Good evening Miss Marie, you didn’t forget your promise, did you?” one kindly old lady said as she passed.

   “No, of course not, I will bring those cookies tomorrow, as promised.” Odette said as she recalled the promise they had made to have tea together at her house.

In this village, the young women had a tradition of rotating visits to each other's homes for tea. During these gatherings, they would share the dishes they had prepared and engage in conversation. Odette, being relatively new to the group, often found herself listening more than speaking, alas she enjoyed these gatherings.

   “Oh, I’ve read all your books,” Odette said to the teachers wife, who burst out laughing.

The aim of the meeting was to engage in a productive activity following tea, and it was the responsibility of the tea organizer to select the activity. The teacher's wife volunteered to coordinate a book club, and the chosen books were communicated beforehand during the previous gathering.

  "I knew you would say that. See you tomorrow!” Waving her hand, the teacher's wife soothed her fussy child and departed. As a mother of three, her two older sons seldom accompanied her, so she usually traveled with her youngest daughter. 

Watching the mother-daughter pair as they strolled away, Odette wore a small smile as she walked through the village. Perhaps it was because the summer was so close that everyone was in a good mood, but Odette couldn’t quite reach that level yet, still haunted by the child she could never forget. 

If it had been healthy, it would have been born this summer. Whenever she made a passing assumption, Bastian's presence in her thoughts seemed like an inescapable fixture within the household.

   What would our lives be, if the child had safely come into this world?

   There was no point pondering on what could have been, it only left her feeling empty. In the heart of self-pity, her quint little cottage came into view. Seeing the warm light in its windows, her heart softened a little.

Not wanting to return to a darkened home, she switched on the lights before setting out for her walk. She was aware that it was an imprudent use of fuel, but she planned to keep it this way for a while. She believed she will be able to stop when the day arrived, a day when all the wounds in her heart had healed—perhaps before the summer's end. 

   She enjoyed being in this village and despite everyone knowing her as Marie Byller, a small lie she didn’t like all the same, she wanted to stay here, even after the divorce was finalised. She wanted to become the master of her own life.

Her first task would be to return home and prepare dinner. Following that, she planned to review the books for the book club meeting scheduled for tomorrow and work on sewing lace collars onto her summer blouses. With her thoughts organized, Odette quickened her pace on her way home. The breeze that wafted through the enchanting bird cherry trees lining the creek was warm and carried a sweet scent. The approaching change of season brought the incoming summer ever so closer.



Bastian made a slow path down the hallway and to the stairs. All the while his eyes looking out into the world unfocused and distant. They were like beads of blue glass. When he reached the bottom step and his footsteps echoed out across the main hall, he expertly made his way to the front door and opened it like he was awake. He stepped out onto the moonlight bathed stone in with bare feet.

   Bastian wondered through the forest, losing himself in the deepening night, his platinum hair tousled about by the wind and his bare feet leaving imprints of his passage.

   Eventually coming to a stop within the deepest parts of the forest, focus almost seemed to come back to him for a moment, as he looked up into the sky, at the bright moon. A moment of clarity came to him. He remembered lying down on the couch, thinking he could do with a moment or two to rest and have fallen asleep.  He didn't even think that something like this could happen, so he didn't tie his wrists. 

   He felt an emptiness inside as he realised what had happened. Just like when he was a small boy and was first made aware of his condition. He realised he was still trapped in those moments.

He’s broken.

   A wind picked up that made him shiver. Bastian turned his head in the direction of the wind as he smelt fresh flowers on the breeze. There were flowers everywhere, all of different scents and differing levels of sweetness.

   Bastian looked around and saw that he was in the garden, not the forest. A sea of flowers were all around him, rippling in the wind as it passed through. He remembered getting a report from Lovis, telling him that Odette had been taking extra effort to tend to the garden. It was back when he was still in Trosa and he felt excitement at being able to enjoy the garden the next spring, with her.

   Back in those days he still believed that time was his friend and in time, Odette would grow to love him as he loved her. Such a foolish and arrogant belief.

As winter passed, followed by spring, and now on the cusp of summer, the memory of Odette had not faded in the slightest. She continued to dominate his life, even though she was no longer a part of it. Even if another year passed, things would not have changed.

In this world, there exists a heart that time cannot mend. 

He now seemed to understand it all—the true meaning of her efforts poured into a garden she would never witness bloom in the coming spring.

   This futile gift she left behind, one that she would never get to enjoy, brought tears to his eyes. It was so beautiful, yet so tormenting.

   Bastian turned away from the garden and faced out to the deep darkness across the sea, to where his fathers mansion used to be. His fathers world was now nothing more but demolished ruins and so to, was his own world.

   What have I got? 

   Theodora’s voice haunted him. Beyond the ruins, there was nothing but more ruin.

   At the very end, what lay before him were two mirrored ruins, facing each other once more, and he was left alone, with a wealth he never wanted and an empire he didn’t really care for. It was like a curse left behind by his step-mother.  

His eyes deepened as he looked at the garden with soft moonlight flowing through it. Now all that was left was the feeling of defeat every time he woke up.

   No. He thought definitely. It was about time for that child from his past to finally grow up and move forward. Bastian turned away from the ruins like he had bid them a final farewell. With renewed determination, he marched through his wife’s garden, back to the mansion.


Chapter 166.
The Best Ending.








“Major Klauswitz is here to see you,” the maid said.

   Countess Trier sighed deeply and took off her reading glasses. She had barely been able to read the first page of the book she had picked out, which she now placed down on the side table.

“He said he would wait for you again today.”  Didn't know what to do, the maid bowed her head.

   This was the forth day on the trot that Bastian had came to see her and each time, Countess Trier made her excuses not to see him. There was no good that could come from meeting him, but each day, he waited out the front of her town house for hours on end, as if he had nothing better to do.

On the next day, and the day after, Bastian appeared at the same time. Worried about what others might say, Countess Trier took to letting Bastian sit in the guest room until he had gotten bored and wondered off back home, but he still came the following day. Yet, he never waited for longer than two hours.

This time, she relented after Bastian left her a message through her maid, ‘Enjoy your dinner.’ He knew she was being untruthful but offered to vacate his seat so she could dine comfortably. His confident and gallant demeanor was enough to make her admire him.

   She was going to have to deal with the situation for fear of it spiralling out of control. “Get some tea ready,” she said with a sigh as she got up from her chair. “Please bring two drinks.” 

After staying silent for almost three months, it seemed like it was time to find out what his intentions were. 



Bastian watched the Countess walk down the stairs as graceful as ever and greeted her with a smile. He had expected it to take a few more days. Her impatience played into his hands quite nicely.

   Once the formal greetings were exchanged, the pair settled into high back chairs in the guest room, where a maid shortly came in with a tray laden for tea.

   “Why are you wasting your time with this old woman, Major? What business could you possibly have with me?” the Countess asked sharply.

   “I think you know why I have come, Countess,” Bastian said coolly.

   “To settle the divorce then?”

   “Yes,” even under the Countesses cold glare, Bastian remained resolute.

   “I assume you’ve brought the divorce papers with you.”

   “First, I would like to see my wife, Countess,” Bastian said, his blue eyes gleaming. The Countess simply shook her head.

   “Its over Bastian, you need to accept that.”

   “I tried.”

  “But?”

   “It didn’t sit well,” Bastian said humbly, as if taking confession.

   “Odette has found her peace, you need to do the same. Its what’s best for the both of you.”

   "I know you don't trust me. I admit that I have made some pretty significant mistakes, but regardless, Odette and I have been married for over three years and I don’t think ending it this way is the best for anyone.”

   The light of the setting sun turned Bastian’s white uniform red. The Countess looked at him with a perplexed expression. She had prepared herself for a heated argument, but this was entirely unexpected.

   “What if Odette has found some one else?” the Countess put in, struggling to find genuine cause to refuse Bastian’s request.

   “You mean Count Xanders?” Bastian said monotonously.

   Countess Trier blinked in surprise, Bastian moistened his lips by sipping at the tea and did not take his eyes from the Countess.

   “Are you still having her followed?”

   Bastian wasn’t fazed by the question. While he had been conducting an investigation to try and find where Odette was hiding, he discovered something quite unexpected, Maximin Von Xanders had been staying away more recently. He played it off as some research for the botanical gardens. It was a detail that could easily be dismissed, but it niggled at Bastian.

Odette didn't have many friends in the social circle, with only a handful who sympathized and offered assistance. Maximin von Xanders was likely one of those few, having moved in around the time Odette vanished. It didn't appear to be a mere coincidence, so this was information that he kept in mind.

   “Why did you come to me, when you already have the resources to find Odette yourself?” Countess Trier said.

   “I thought it would be more polite to give you the opportunity to tell me, Countess,” Bastian said honestly. He was aware that the simplest way would be to hire a detective for background checks. However, he didn't want to do that.

   Bastian had never truly treated the Countess with any level of respect or courtesy, but he wanted to make an effort to seek Countess Triers approval as the protector of Odette  and gain the rightful permission for a reunion.

   “And if I refuse?”

“I think I’ll come here everyday until the end of the week.” 

"After that?" 

   “I will track down Sir Xanders then scour every inch of Lausanne for my wife.”

   “Major Klauswitz!”

   “I am asking you nicely in the hopes to avoid any untoward incident that could cause harm to you and Odette,” Bastian’s conciliation sounded more like a threat.

Why would Odette give her heart to a man like him?

 The ache in her heart deepened as she recalled her meeting with Odette at Rothewein.

Odette had never mentioned Bastian Klauswitz's name. Whenever she asked about her husband, she only offered brief or evasive responses. She merely drew a line and declared it was over, sealing her lips tightly like a clam.

At a glance, she seemed had put her past behind her.  owever, there were moments when she couldn't conceal her emotions for her husband. A subtle smile graced her face, and she displayed a mischievous demeanor whenever his name was mentioned.

 Even the expression in her eyes occasionally betrayed a hint of confusion. The woman who had consistently carried herself with a maturity beyond her years, suddenly transformed into a woman of her own age in those instances. 

What Helene had passed to her daughter went beyond just pride and dignity; there seemed to be something deeper within her.

Still, Odette was much wiser than her mother.  She had a cool-headed mind, a child who understood the value of cherishing her own life. She could undoubtedly overcome her wounds and lead a fulfilling life. It would be unwise to dwell on and yearn for a man who was a part of the past.

   “Well then, I guess there is nothing more to say, Major, its time for you to leave,” Countess Trier announced, standing and showing Bastian the door.

   If Bastian started the investigation now, it would still take a few days for anything of note to come up. He could only expect that Countess Trier would arrange for Odette to be moved some where even more remote in that time, making it harder. Bastian got to his feet at that thought.

   He made a move for the door but stopped when he came level with Countess Trier and looked down at her. The two looked at each other in absolute silence, but he could see the tremble in her eyes. Bastian bowed his head without a single word. He went all the way down to his knees and he heard Countess Trier gasp.

The man who seemed like an arrogant warlord, knelt down. 

   “I will never let any harm come to Odette,” Bastian said humbly. The Countess simply looked at him in wide eyed shock. “All I ask is that you let me and Odette decide together the best outcome for our marriage. Please.”



“Finally taking that time off, eh Major? Good, live to fight another day,” Admiral Demel chuckled heartily.

   The rumour that Bastian was taking a leave of absence quickly spread around the admiralty. The fact that it was announced to be a recreational vacation was what was shocking. Most people would think he was taking time off to grieve for his late father. A lot of the other officers were worried about what was going on in Bastian’s head.

   “Well, you’ve made a wise decision. If you had continued to push yourself as you have been, I would have had no choice but to order you to take some time off,” Demel said, waving a hand dismissively.

   “I didn’t want to leave at such a critical time,” Bastian said, sounding apologetic.

   Admiral Demel shook his head reverently. “Don’t worry yourself, we’re well prepared here, there really isn’t any need to worry. So you be on your way.”

"I've reported the emergency contact information to higher-ups. If any urgent matters arise—"

"Do you think the entire Berg navy will collapse in your absence, Mayor? You need not concern yourself with that. Continue on your way." Admiral Demel pat on Bastian's shoulder and dismissed him with a light-hearted jest.

   “Thank you, sir. As always, I am indebted to you.” Only then did Bastian smile.

   “Ah, so long as you bring me back a bottle of decent whiskey. I hear Rothwein Whiskey is the best.” Admiral Demel laughed playfully.

   Bastian saluted and left the office. There was a trunk already outside the office, Bastian had no intention of waiting around and had planned on leaving the second he got done talking with Admiral Demel.

The Admiral stood by his office window, puffing on his pipe, watching the departure of his subordinate who was finally taking a well-deserved vacation. 

The sunlight streamed down onto the tree-lined avenue that led to the naval base's entrance, casting a dazzling brightness upon the early summer foliage.

Chapter 167.


Like the June's Sky.








Bastian needed to ride a train overnight to reach Rothewein. He got off the night train from Ratz, sat on a station bench, closed his eyes briefly, and waited for the first local train to arrive. The dawn was only just breaking as the train pulled into the final station. From there he went straight to the hotel just beyond the central square. Odette lived in a remote village, roughly an hour's walk away. Worried about finding a place to stay, he chose to unpack and stay there for the time being.

   “You look like a military sort, what brings you here?” asked the clerk behind the counter.

   “Meeting relatives,” Bastian said plainly.

   The clerk watched him closely as he filled out the accommodation information and handed Bastian a key. It was unusual for someone to be travelling in military uniform, but he had gone straight from the Admiralty and didn’t have a chance to change his outfit.

   As the clerk handed over the keys, Bastian could see he still had a lot of questions on his face, but he was a professional enough man to know that it was rude to bother guests.

   Bastian hurried up to his room and got cleaned up. After a soothing hot shower and a warm shave, he was looking as radiant as ever. No one would have guessed that he had just travelled for the last eight hours.

   Now feeling fresh, Bastian donned a linen summer suit, rewrapped the rope burns on his wrists with a gauze bandage and put on a watch, making sure to adjust the cuffs afterward. and just as he was inspecting himself in the mirror, a knock came at the door. 

The momentary panic passed as he found the clerk standing there, waiting to take orders for breakfast. Bastian told him to move on a little firmer than he intended. He did ask the clerk for a map, though and after twenty minutes, showed back up with one in his hand.

It was early in the morning, however the rural village was bustling with activity due to the busy farming season, making it feel as lively as midday. There was still a lot of travel ahead of him, the village Odette was staying at was over an hour away, deep in the countryside and Bastian had no idea how to get there.

   Satisfied that he knew how to get here, Bastian donned his hat and set out, straight for the cities outskirts where he found a river that flowed through the village Odette was staying in and followed the waterway.

   It took all morning, but Bastian eventually made his way to the neighbouring village and checking the address Countess Trier had given him, he started to look for the address.  He crossed the stepping stones, and made his way to the left side of the stream. His steps became more deliberate as he double-checked the house addresses along the road.

The Countess agreed to give Bastian the address on two conditions; he respected Odette’s wishes and he did not hurt her. It would be an easy enough request to follow and reminded Bastian of easier times.

   “Excuse me ma’am, do you know where this address is?” Bastian asked a passing woman carrying a small crate.

After checking his note, the elderly woman smiled brightly, “Oh, yes,” the woman said. “That’s Marie Byller’s house, right over there. She pointed to a stone cottage a little ways up the hill. 

   ‘Marie Byller.’ 

Bastian laughed as heard that name. 

“Are you her relative?”

"Yes. I’m relative of Ms.Marie Byller. Thank you for your help.” Bastian put on his most charming smile and thanked the woman before hurrying off to the stone cottage.


Bastian rolled the name around in his head and said it out loud a couple times. Just as he reached the house, the window burst open and Bastian ducked behind a tall climbing rose bush. He could see Odette just beyond the window.

She looked at peace as she gazed at the far-off sky, as if checking the weather for the day.  All the sadness and worry that had wrinkled her face were gone. Bastian only remembered Odette looking so beautiful once, when they first met. She looked as fresh as a newly blooming flower.


Bastian stepped back and looked at her, who seemed familiar but unfamiliar. 

He didn't want to ruin something beautiful. 

Just a little bit more. 

Even after Odette drew the curtains closed, he continued to stare at the window.



Odette fussed over the sit of the bow in her hair, holding back the misbehaving lengths of hair. She then brushed out the wrinkles in her fine, white linen dress. It was far from fashionable, but it would serve its purpose well enough. She had borrowed the pattern from the lady next door.

Odette secured a sky-blue belt crafted from spare fabric around her dress. She inspected the ribbon's appearance, which was fastened behind her back, in the mirror and then adorned her hands with her homemade lace gloves.

   It was important that Odette looked her best, like a princess if she could bare it. The mistress of the family she was about to see was very particular when it came to appearance and presentation. Being the owner of the largest vineyard in the country, it was important for Odette to make a good impression.

   She double checked she had all the textbooks she would need in a small bag, she set out. There was a stagecoach that could take her to the vineyard, but by the time it got her there, it would be faster walking. Besides, it was a nice day for a walk in the countryside.

Odette strolled by the river, the day was exceptionally beautiful, with a gentle breeze rustling the leaves of the picturesque willow trees by the stream. In the background, the laughter of children playing in the water could be heard. The air was filled with the delightful scent of wild roses and fully bloomed silver plum blossoms, adding to the overall summery atmosphere.

As she crossed the stone bridge, she paused to open her parasol, to provide shade from the sun.

   She happened to glance back to the village, where she saw an elderly couple sitting on a bench at the edge of the stream and chatting. There were children playing and laughing in the water. Swan’s swimming around the loud children as they played.

It was an ordinary summer morning. 

   Odette couldn’t help but feel something ominous, but unable to see anything, she turned and walked on.



   All during her journey, she felt like someone was behind her, following her. Even when she got to the vineyard and was sat at the piano with her student, she got a feeling in her gut and she looked out the window, but saw nothing but the countryside.

   Odette finished off the lesson without too many idle thoughts distracting her and when she left, the mistress of the house saw her off.

The summer sun was already high overhead. The walk back to the village was a little easier and she wondered if she had become hypersensitive due to that important engagement. She would get home, make tea and relax. That was, until it was time to set things ready for hosting a gathering.

She was the host of this gathering. She had to provide tea cups and plates based on the number of guests, prepare food to complement the tea, and even put up new curtains for the summer. The past few days had been quite hectic. Just the previous night, she had stayed up late to create lace designs to share with the members. She hoped that the gathering would go smoothly and relieve some of the tension.

   “Hello, Miss Byller.” Came a man’s voice as she passed under the clock tower in the village square.

   Odette gave a polite reply to the eldest brother of the child she had been teaching piano to. He was a studying at the collage of a near by town. He had returned to the village for the holidays.

   “Have you had lunch yet, Miss Byller?” he said.

   “Not yet, I was just returning from a class.”

   “Oh, yes, of course,I must have mistaken the class time.” the lad said, turning red faced.

   “Well, I must go, I do have a lunch date,” Odette said, making her excuses to be away.

   “Okay, have a good afternoon, I’ll see you next week, Miss Byller.”

   Odette smiled and hurried away. The lad was nice enough, but far too young for her to be engaging in any kind of relationship. It was like that every time he came home and normally, she wasn’t so distracted to avoid him.

Odette went to a nearby cafe and settled herself on the outdoor terrace facing the clock tower.  She ordered a cup of coffee and glanced around the square, as if anticipating the arrival of her companions. She discreetly averted her gaze from the man who was still wandering nearby.

As she pretended to wait, her coffee was served. Odette decided to savor her tea time, enjoying her coffee while reading a book she had taken from her bag. Just as she was becoming engrossed in her reading, there’s a gentle knock on the table.

   “Hello, beautiful lady,” said another man.

   This was not her lucky day. Odette gave her polite greeting and attempted to hurry away from the stranger.   “I’m sorry, but I’m waiting for someone.” She responded by maintaining her focus on the book, as though she hadn't heard the interruption. However, the man displayed no intention of giving up or leaving.

“Is this your husband’s seat?” 

   “Yes, that’s right…” She ignorantly said as turned the pages of her book. Yet, all of a sudden, she realized that the voice sounded oddly familiar.

Odette lowered her gaze, trying to deny the absurd thought. Then, a sizable hand with long, unadorned fingers bearing signs of wear and calluses landed on the table before her. The gleam of a ring, likely a symbol of matrimony, cut through her vision sharply.

No way. Odette paused and looked at the man as he bowed and removed his hat.

“Then I’ve come to the right place.”  The sunlight streaming under the awning illuminated the man's smiling face. As Odette blinked her bewildered eyes, her husband's seat had been taken.   “It’s been awhile, Odette.” Bastian said. “Ah no, I should call you Miss Marie Byller for now.”  He smiled mischievously

He looked at her as calm and placid as ever. There was no anger in his eyes, no malice. His ble eyes were as clear and gentle as the June sky. 

   Odette stared at him for a second that felt like hours. She never said a word, just looked at him with wide eyes, not daring to believe he was really stood before her. She fell to her knees and clamped her hands to her chest like she was praying.


It wasn't a dream. This reunion didn't resemble any she had ever experienced in a dream.

   “You...why you…?” she managed to say between sobs.

   “I miss you, Odette” he said softly. “The pain of not seeing you has been far greater than anything I have ever known.”

Bastian glanced at the clock tower and the sky adorned with feather-like clouds, then turned his eyes back to her.

 “So I came…. because I miss you.”


Chapter 168.


Double-Edged Sword.








The wind gusted through the village square between them. The cafe was bustling with lunch time visitors, but Odette was deaf to it all. Her mind went blank and she felt like she was suffocating. 

"May I take your order?" A waiter approached their table, shattering the heavy silence. Even after giving Bastian the menu, he stood still, waiting beside their table.

She tried to suppress the urge to run away.Out in the countryside, people were very close knit. She had managed to make a success out of being a piano tutor because of how fast word got around. Odette couldn’t imagine what they would  have to say about this. There were already rumours going around about the circumstances of her coming to the village, alone.

   Odette’s mood darkened as she realised what Bastian’s appearance meant and she knew she would probably not be around to know what the rumours said.

"I think this is my first time meeting you. Are you familiar with Miss Byller?" the waiter asked bluntly when Bastian placed orders for both himself and Odette.

"Yes, I am," Bastian replied. "Miss Marie Beller is my cousin. I came to Rothewein to visit her after a long time."

As Odette's heart began to race, Bastian, sensing her unease, fabricated a false narrative to avoid unnecessary trouble. Fortunately, the waiter believed him and left, wearing a very satisfied expression.

Odette thought hard about how to get out of this situation, and did her best to pretend to be calm.  However, her quivering eyes and flushed cheeks betrayed her inner turmoil. She secretly wished that Bastian would chastise her for fleeing like a coward, but he just kept looking at her with his cold, grey eyes in silence. Sometimes it felt like he was sincere, other times like he was putting it on those false moments that confused her, and became her sadness. 

 “You must forgive Countess Trier,” Bastian said. “I put forward a rather convincing argument and she seemed to agree with me.”

   “What argument?” Odette demanded.

   “That we should decide our future together, for ourselves. Forget about all the noise of the world, all the judgemental eyes are no longer upon us. We can talk, in confidence and come to our own conclusions, rather than looking to others to bring us together or break us apart.” Bastian said, his words steady as he graced her with his gaze, a curious blend of icy reserve and fiery passion, like a verdant kindling caressed by dancing flames, his stare was something she tried so hard to forget.

While she was still stunned, their ordered food was finally brought to the table. Odette suddenly lowered her gaze to the tabletop and released a deep breath, almost unconsciously.

A generously portioned grilled meat dish was set before him, while a fish dish with a subtly aromatic sauce was presented in front of her. The meal included bread and wine, and everything was distinctively tailored to her liking, Bastian had considered her tastes carefully.

"Let's eat first, sis Marie" Bastian said, picking up the cutlery. "I think you’re already hungry, right?"

The man, donning a sunshine smile, effortlessly rendered all her painstaking efforts futile in a heartbeat. Left without the capacity for argue, Odette could only bring the icy relief of water to her parched mouth.

She knew that playing along with Bastian’s script might be her only chance to get out of his shadow finally, but she found her focus faltering in the performance of this play. It was like having an unexpected accident. Her mind was paralyzed and unable to think properly.  All she could do now was look at Bastian who was eating quietly.

   The past that she had so tirelessly tried to escape was once again her present and it looked down at her with a calmness she found unsettling. Her mind was paralysed and she couldn’t think straight. All from the presence of this one man.

   “I have always felt sorry for the way I left and I apologise for that,” Odette said, finally opening her stiff lips and speaking through a dry throat. “But my mind has not changed, not even now. So there is not reason for you to hang around.”

   “If you need time, I can wait.” Bastian said. His voice was as calm as the water that flowed through the village. Her heart felt like it was going to explode. She forgot what she wanted to say and she simply looked at  his unwavering eyes without saying a word, mouth agape. She felt like she had been caught in a trap. Like that tragic moment when the seeds of this heartache were first sown.

“I will wait for you, Odette, no matter how long it takes.”



“Count, Mr Karl Lovis is here to see you, says he would like to see the wildflower garden behind the laboratory,” the assistant said.

   Maximin frowned, he did not know Karl Lovis. He looked up at the clock, 4pm, his appointment with Bastian was meant to be about now, in the wildflower garden. Maximin guessed at the true identity of Karl Lovis.

   “Alright, you can let everyone know they can leave early today.”

   Once he got himself cleaned up, Maximin went out into the garden and found Bastian leisurely strolling through the flowers. Maximin recognised him easily enough, though he wasn’t in uniform and he hid his face under a low hat.

   He had been surprised to receive a call from Bastian, even more surprised when he told Maximin that he would be in Rothewein. He wanted to meet up, just the two of them, wherever and whenever Maximin decided.

   Bastian never let on what he wanted to meet him for and was so cool, they could have been discussing the weather. That did nothing to put Maximin at ease and only served to make him more tense.

   “It's been awhile, Count Xanders,” Bastian said when he saw Maximin come out into the garden.

   The two stood facing each other, at a polite distance and exchanged polite greetings. There was no hostility in the way Bastian spoke and no amenity in the way he behaved. It was like he was a polite stranger.

   “I had always heard these gardens were beautiful, I don’t suppose you would be my guide,” Bastian said quite unexpectedly, but Maximin saw a small group of noble looking ladies, also exploring the garden, slowly meandering in their direction.

   “Yes, of course, right this way,” Maximin led Bastian along the garden path, around to a more secluded part of the garden.

   “I was just on my way back from meeting with my wife, when I thought I would take the time to also meet with you,” Bastian said calmly. “I had heard from Countess Trier and others that you have been a great help to my wife, I must extend my thanks, Count Xanders.”

   “Major Klauswitz, well, I had heard the two of you had split,” Maximin said, forcing his voice to sound cool and level.

   “For the time being, it doesn’t mean that she wants to divorce, I am still her husband and she is still my wife,” Bastian said, sounding a little defensive.

   “That may be so, but that doesn't mean you have the right to claim her as your property. How about respecting Lady Odette’s wishes?”

   “Is that advice coming as a friend of Lady Odette?”

   “It is advice from someone who knows how to respect other people and how to show a little compassion.”

   “Then let me ask you this, Count Xanders, do you sincerely hold no feelings for my wife beyond friendship and compassion?”

   “That is entirely out of line, Major Klauswitz.” Maximin’s face went bright red.

   Bastian looked at him as calm as ever. “I believe I have my answer.”

For a considerable time, he had been aware that it was unlikely for someone to extend such extensive help solely out of friendship and fondness. Bastian wasn't foolish enough to be oblivious to his feeling for his wife. Nevertheless, he recognized that Maximin was making a concerted effort to suppress his unacceptable feelings.

Because he was the person who will always hold the line until everything was done perfectly. Understanding and respecting Odette's boundaries, avoiding any harm. The fact that Maximin had such dignity could be likened to a double-edged sword. 

What was extremely difficult for him was as easy as breathing for Maximin. It was both fortunate and frustrating at the same time.

   “I believe you to be a man of honour, Count, so I have no doubt you will not go beyond what is expected of you.”

   “What are you trying to say?” Maximin said, calm once more.

   “I am still Odette’s husband and I will not break any advances on my wife.” Bastian drew the line in the sand and made it as clear as possible.

   “Actually, I think it's more down to Lady Odette to decide that, Major. You only came down here to try and rattle her cage, to break her composure before she has a chance to fully regain it. If a situation arises wherein the Lady Odette needs my help, I will be by her side, no matter what.”

   Bastian nodded solemnly. “Yes, well, I can’t fault you for your honour, no doubt upholding some promise to Countess Trier and all. I will respect you for that.”

   The two walked on in silence for a few paces, giving time for the tension between them to die a little.

   “You know, Lady Odette is currently teaching my daughter how to play the piano. Usually, she would stop and have lunch or dinner, would you like to join us?” It sounded like any ordinary dinner invitation, but it was more a dare for Bastian to say yes.

   “I appreciate the invitation, but I must decline.” Bastian said politely.

He was well aware that showing off could spoil their dinner, and he had no intention of willingly disrupting the joy of family of three.

At that juncture, they bid their farewells and went their separate paths. Maximin got into the car that had been waiting outside the laboratory, while Bastian strolled along the path leading to the entrance of the Royal Botanical Gardens.

As he watched Count Xander's car pass by, he hoped for Odette to have a peaceful evening. 

Because tarting from tomorrow, the evenings might not be so peaceful.

Chapter 169.
Familiar, yet Unfamiliar.








Odette’s new life had been rocked to the core. She had to accept the fact that she was no longer going to be able to avoid it, the evidence was spread before her eyes. The tea Odette had so meticulously prepared had turned out quite different.

Her plans to wear the new summer blouse today were foiled when the sleeve-ends accidentally caught fire during ironing. With no time left to repair it, she had to choose another dress.

   The bad luck didn’t stop there.

   While she set the table, she broke one of the tea cups and they were sold out, so she couldn’t get a replacement, so she had to make do with ones that were kind of similar. While she was fussing about with the tea cups, the acrid smell of smoke reminded her that her Plum Pie was still in the oven and was now burnt.

Her intent to serve fresh pies sadly fell through.  Luckily enough, she had other produce that she could serve, a well-prepared cake laden with raspberry jam, rose jelly, and fruitcake, but it would be a dampener that she could not serve fresh food.

   Now the tea party was well prepared, Odette still couldn’t bring herself into the mood for entertaining guests. She felt nothing but disappointment in herself. This streak of misfortune began with Bastian's arrival and it seemed to continue. 

By the end of the tea party, she was thoroughly downcast and to make matters worse, there seemed to be uninvited talk of Odette’s strange randevu with a handsome stranger.

   “Really, there is a rumour that Miss Byller went on a date with a handsome young man yesterday, we must know who he is.”

   Odette nearly dropped another tea cup. She tried to put a smile on her face.

“I heard your cousin visited Rothewein. Is it really him?”  

The table buzzed with the gleeful chittering of the ladies around the table and Odette felt her cheeks flush.


“…Ah yes… that's right."  Once more, she played the role of a pathetic actor in a drama. she held back her anger while smiling sweetly. “I met my cousin. I had not seen him in a long time,”


The disappointed sounds and grumblings replaced the excitement. “Oh, well, if you had said sooner, we could have stopped by to say hello.”

"My cousin is staying at a hotel in a neighboring village. I didn't get to introduce him because I met him there." Odette lied. Fortunately, everyone seemed to believe her.

“Everyone in Miss Marie's family seems has a good personality and I've heard he is quite handsome. If he visits our village, it'd be great if you could meet him. Alright?”

"That’s… .” 

Before Odette could respond, the doorbell echoed through the room. She whipped her head towards the entrance, eyes wide. The chatter among the members fell silent, all eyes following her gaze. Just as she thought that it might be a prankster, the doorbell rang again.

   “Oh look!” someone said, craning her neck to look out the window. “I think Miss Marie’s cousin is coming!”” 

   As soon as those words were spoken, Odette’s heart stopped and she felt like she was going to faint. The rest of the ladies all gathered around the window to get a better look.

A tall figure, garbed in a light grey suit, stood in front of the terrace. Odette pressed her lips shut to stifle a looming cry after seeing whose coming. The doorbell rang again and there came a soft knock.

   This was a tragedy. What if Bastian called her by her real name? What if came in and introduced himself as her husband?

   Odette ran to the door as the bell rang a third time and the knocking became more insistent. She felt tears rising to her eyes.

   She gingerly opened the door. “Oh, you came early,” she said. Odette gave him a look of pure indignation and as Bastian entered, all the women looked at him in unison.

 If she weren’t careful, her lie might be discovered.  So help. Odette looked at Bastian in and whispered. Bastian frowned slightly, but soon changed his expression and smiled to them.

   “Erm, this is my cousin,” Odette said rather loudly as she stood on Bastian’s side. “I asked him to come later, but here he is, early. He never listens to me.”

   “Oh, I am sorry, my cousin is right, but I didn’t think she had any friends to come over,” Bastian said with a playful grin. “I will come back later, when I’m not getting in the way.”  He gave Odette a bouquet of flowers and a box of chocolates that he'd brought along. Then he bowed to the ladies and made to head back through the front door.

   “No, no, no,” the women all said in unison. “You came all this way, the least you can do is have a sit with us. You must be thirsty from all that walking.”

   “Absolutely,” said another woman. “You won't find anywhere in the village worth going to, when you have a homely hearth here, right Miss Marie?”

   Odette was speechless as each woman in turn invited Bastian to join them.

   “Thank you so much,” Bastian said politely. “If my cousin is fine with it, then I guess I will stay.” Bastian gave Odette a look and she knew he had planned on this.

“…O-Of course. It’s fine, so please come in.” Odette's voice wavered slightly as she gave an answer. Watching her quietly, Bastian smiled and stepped across the threshold of the front door.

Filled with despair, Odette trailed behind the emerging misfortune.



The echoing footsteps of two person ascending the stairs melded with the golden afternoon sunlight. Leading with light, gentle steps, followed by a stern and sturdy pace. Their harmonious rhythm persisted until it ceased upon reaching the one of the door.

Odette led Bastian to her bedroom, carrying a tray of an assortment of refreshments. She pushed open the door with a toe and let Bastian in, handing him the tray once he was in the room.

   “Do not come down until the guests have gone,” Odette demanded.

  Bastian looked around the small room. There was a bed, a closet and a dressing table. It was a simple enough room, with minimal decoration. The room was also badly looked after, the floor was well worn and the wall paper was faded. Bastian felt like he was experiencing a piece of Odette’s desperate heart, when she had run away with nothing but a small trunk of clothes.

   “Answer me, Mr Karl Lovis,” Odette said, rounding on Bastian with scorn in her words.

   “You don’t like that name, do you?” Bastian said.

   “I’m not playing here,” Odette stamped her foot.

   “I think its a better name than Marie Byller though.”

   “Bastian!” Odette nearly shouted.

   “Alright, I wont go down. I will stay up here, as quiet as a church mouse,” Bastian said, holding up his hands in mock surrender. He walked across the bedroom, and sat down in front of the table by the window. He sat with his legs crossed and lifted the teacup.

   He was being surprisingly calm and played along without a fuss. He even accepted the alias of Karl Lovis. So far so good, now all Odette had to do was deal with an hour of the ladies bombarding her with questions about “Karl Lovis” and then they would be out of her hair.

   “Please keep that promise,” Odette said as she left the room.

Now that he was left alone, Bastian poured out some tea and sipped at it as he looked out the window. The riverside village, lined with willows, looked like something out of a painting.

   Already bored of the view, Bastian put down the tea cup and started nosing around Odette’s bedroom. Although it was a very plain room, with very little decoration, he could still see traces of Odette here and there. Hand woven furniture coverings. A single rose in a bottle as a vase. A pile of books on the night stand. Notes pasted on the vanity mirror.

   It dawned on him that this was a space that was being lived in and Countess Trier’s words rang true in his ear, Odette was flourishing without him. A fresh beginning unfolded for her. Her ardent dream had finally come true.

   Bastian habitually held up his pack of cigarettes and went back to the window. He caught the sound of women’s laughter. They were probably sitting around the dining table, happily knitting lace together, while he was left, like an outcast, to stare out into the blooming flower of the garden.

   Odette felt familiar, yet quite unfamiliar. He had rarely ever seen this side of her, so playful and happy, actually enjoying the company of others. The faint laughter that played out from time to time was unmistakably hers.

Bastian returned to the table, smiling with a mixture of relief and disappointment. By now, the tea Odette had served him had grown cold.

   When the tea party finally broke up, Bastian felt it would have been polite to go down and say goodbye to everyone, but he made a promise. By the time Odette came upstairs for him, all the guests were gone.

   “Its over now, you can come down stairs,” Odette said in a whisper.

   “Thank you. Did I hear right, you invited me to dinner, correct?”

“Don’t be like this, Bastian. It's just... .” 

   “I’m hungry, Odette.” He looked down at his bandaged wrist, then back at Odette, who looked like she was having a deep argument with herself.

   “Why on earth are you so thin?” Odette said. Her turquoise eyes, awash with tearful redness, glistened vividly in the evening glow.

   “I’ve been too busy.”

   “You should still eat properly.”

   “I know, I don’t think you’d be so heartless as to turn me away from dinner.”   Bastian chuckled and approached Odette.  “Let me stay a little longer. I have something to say." 

The last step left was a strategy to break down her cracked wall.


Odette let out a very loud and distinct sigh. “Fine. You can stay up here until I call you down for dinner.”

Once the operation's success was affirmed, Bastian followed his wife without hesitation.

Chapter 170.


Just Like This.








The table was set in the backyard. Odette had laid out a lace cloth on an old wooden bench, in the shade of a tree. There were even flowers placed in the centre once all the crockery was laid out.

   Bastian went downstairs before he was bidden, he didn’t want to stay in that stuffy room any more.  On his way out, he grabbed a bottle of water and a glass.

   “Food is not ready yet,” Odette said like a mother about to scold a child.

   “I know, but I need some air, your room is rather stuffy,” Bastian said calmly, taking a seat at the table across the kitchen’s window.

edit this sentence so the flow more simple and nice to read


The soft glow of the sunset painted the world in warm colors, as warm as his eyes when he looked at her.

   Bastian watched Odette potter about the kitchen. He could see her clearly when ever she came to stand at the sink, whether to wash vegetables or fill a pot with water. She was moving diligently without a moment's rest as if she was dancing.

   There were occasions where their eyes met and each time, Odette would pause what she was doing for a second, then carry on with her chores, shaking her head.

   Bastian could not take his eyes off his wife for a moment, every time he could see her and even when he couldn’t, he imagined her moving about the kitchen. He never saw the sadness in her eyes, that hung over her like the shadow of the tree over him. She was beautiful and that was all that mattered to him.



The plate set on the table just as the summer sun was making its final decent to the horizon. It was laden with exquisite food, vegetables straight from the garden and a fresh plucked chicken and bread that just came out of the oven. Unbelievably, it was all prepared in a hurry

"Please eat." Odette took off her apron and sat down opposite him with nothing but few left over vegetables.

   “Why don’t you eat, is it because of me?” Bastian asked, his brow furrowed.

   “I enjoy tea parties, so I’m not hungry,” Odette said, pouring herself some water.

   A cool breeze rustled the leaves in the tree and passed between them. Odette could feel Bastian persistent gaze on her. She forced herself to eat the roasted vegetables while Bastian ate heartily, he was never a picky eater and it kind of bothered her the way he would stuff his face.

   Once the initial shock of Bastian’s arrival had subsided, Odette saw that there was a change in him. He was certainly acting differently to all the other times she had betrayed him. He wasn’t trying to confine or condemn her and there was no apparent intent to punish her.

But why? 

   All through the dinner, she felt a pang of anxiety, expecting him to pull the rug out from under her at any minute. She thought she got the measure of him, knew the reason why he had come all the way out to the country.

   “I never knew your culinary skills were so good,” Bastian said after clearing his plate.

   “I have been responsible for the family’s meals. I’m glad you liked it.” Odette said politely.

   She bustled around the table, taking up Bastian’s dirty plate and cutlery, then went to fetch desert, which was a freshly baked plum pie. It was her second attempt, the first one was a disaster, but this one had the perfect golden hue about its crust. She placed a large slice with a dollop of cream in front of Bastian.

   “Don’t you enjoy tea more than coffee?” Bastian said, when he noticed Odette pouring out two cups of coffee.

   “These days I drink coffee.”

   “Why?”

   “Because tea conjures up difficult memories.”

   “Odette.”

   “You too, Bastian, that’s why I left you.” It was unexpected and came very calmly. She finally realised, cowardly running away will not lead to a good ending.  After she saw Bastian, her jumbled thoughts found clarity.

   “I’m sorry, Odette.” Bastian said, looking down at the coffee now in front of him. He looked up in time to see Odette’s dazed expression before she turned away in embarrassment. “I know that I was wrong, I ruined you and caused the death of our…”

   “No, Bastian, don’t say it,” Odette pleaded and shook her head. “I know you’re sorry, but if I wanted an apology, I wouldn’t have run away. That is not what’s important to me. I’ve already accepted your apology, but it was unbearable for me, it still is, so please, stop, don’t hurt me any more, I cant take it. I’m begging you, Bastian, please stop.”

   Bastian couldn’t help himself, Odette’s voice was like a siren song that permeated the evening air, a song that seduced him whether he wanted it or not. He looked at her like of a lost sou, as if the deep ocean of abandonment engulfed him, drowning even the last beacon of apology and forgiveness.

Should he plug his ears? Like what the hero of an old folk story. Who was so enamoured by a siren song that he tied himself to a mast and plugged his ears with wax. As the hero escaped unscathed from the sea, the siren met her inevitable demise, as was her destiny. 

   A rueful smile crossed Bastian’s lips as he looked up at the clear night sky. He did not want them have that kind of ending.

“Then let me know what I should do for you?” Bastian asked her.

He chose to listen to that beautiful song. He was fine with running around, loose, he was fine with casting his ship on the rocks, he was fine with clinging to the wreckage and he was fine with swimming the length of the sea to be with his siren, what ever it took, no matter what.

   “Just, stay here for awhile,” Odette said softly. “And, please don’t come back again.” 

   “Odette, I…”

   “I don’t hate you, Bastian. In fact I wanted to see you. I didn’t know until now, until I saw you. Before, I worried about you, about how you were doing in your weakened state. The feeling torments me so much. Its like the day I went into the bitter sea.”

   Bastian stared at Odette, at her watery eyes and face subtly tinged red in the setting sun. The despair and pain on her face was the same as that day.

   “I want to live well, Bastian. I am doing my best, but if I get hurt again, I don’t think I could bare it.” Odette took a deep breath and sat up straight. “I don’t want to live like that any more and I hope you don’t either. Obligations, society's judgment, understanding, losses, and gains - none of it matters to me anymore. You must consider your true feelings, feelings that are not brought on by guilt, sympathy or responsibility.”

Odette set the untouched pie plate aside and lit the lantern that hung from a tree branch.  The warm light cut through the night, casting an inviting glow over the backyard of the house.

Under the gentle light they stared at each other from across the dinner table. The light danced across their morose faces and the tranquillity of the evening settled over the cottage. It felt like the calm sea left behind after a storm's retreat.

   “The roads get dark out here in the country, you best leave, if you wish to make it back to your hotel.” Odette broke the silence first. The sunset's lingering traces had vanished, and stars were sprouting up in the sky.

   Bastian nodded his head without saying a single word and started to eat the pie. Odette watched, surprise tingling her mind. She had thought he couldn't possibly eat it, but Bastian silently emptied his plate. He also finished off the cold coffee before he stood and spoke.

   “Thank you for the meal, Miss Byller. Tomorrow I will bring a bottle of champagne.” Bastian gave a silly bow and made for the road.

   “Bastian…”

   “You never know, we might be able to have tea tomorrow.”

   All Odette could do was sigh at the back of the man as he walked away, a man that was more like a brick wall. She had hurt him with her words, she could feel it, no matter how hard he tried to hide it. 

Bastian wore his jacket and left the backyard. She hurried after the leaving guest, keeping a respectful distance.

   “I shall see you tomorrow, sister.”

   Even after the shadow of Bastian vanished down the dark lane, Odette never moved from the gate, staring after him.



“Ah, Mr Lovis, are you involved in some sort of suspicious activity?” The hotel owner barred Bastian from entering the lobby.

   “What do you mean?” Bastian said politely, looking down at the hotel owner.

   “A little while ago, some strange men came in here asking for a naval officer, a major. I don’t know who they were, but they insisted that I give you this.” The hotel owner held out a note for Bastian. There was a jumble of letters and numbers on it that Bastian instantly recognised as Naval code.

   “Thank you,” Bastian said, taking the note and stuffing it hastily into his pocket.

   Once out of sight of the hotel owner, Bastian looked at the note. It was a message conveying a meeting place, a hillside behind the village and as he approached the hill, he found a black car waiting for him.

   There were two men in civilian clother leaning on the car, smoking cigarettes and as soon as they saw Bastian approach, the stood up straight and saluted him. They were unfamiliar to Bastian, though one he had seen a couple times, a captain that was present in a few briefings.

   “Good evening, Major, we have a very important message for you, which had to be delivered in person.” The captain held out an envelope to Bastian, stamped with top secret.

Chapter 171.


A Clock That Never Stops.








Bastian took the car straight for Rothewein station and from there, the express to Ratz, with his arrival set for around dawn. From there, on to the Admiralty without delay. Even though it was early in the morning, the operations centre was crowded with activity and the atmosphere was quite different from a few days ago. 

   Bastian passed through into the briefing room, where there were only a few officers present  after identity verification and security screening, waiting for the reason they had all been summoned here.

 In a partial wartime situation, please come back promptly and join the urgent meeting.

The notes they all got shed no light on why the war council was in session and all the high ranking officers were rampant with speculation. Bastian was one of the few who did not participate in the rumour-mongering, instead, he waited patiently for the official news, which finally came some time during the mid morning.

   “Intelligence has shown that the Southern Allied Fleet is amassing on the main front,” the operations commander said, going straight into the briefing without any preamble.

   A map was brought up that showed the positioning and make up of the Southern Allied Fleet, arrows showed the fleet movements. The north and south had been involved in several small scale engagements over the years, but this was the first time either side made a definitive move against the other.

   “Lovita is moving the fleet and the core of the naval powers, to the north sea.” The operations commander pointed to an island that Bastian was intimately familiar with, Torsa Island. The size of the force moving in was at least three times larger than that of the Berg fleet.

   “It has been confirmed that the fleet consists of some the navy’s best battleships and carriers. It moves to set up a blockade around Torsa Island and is led by none other than Admiral Cher.” The operations commander looked directly at Bastian.

   Bastian understood why he had been called in for this now. Admiral Cher, otherwise known as the Pride of Lovita, who had his pride dented by a young and hopeful Captain, Bastian.



The office filled with acrid smoke as Admiral Demel chuffed away on his cigar anxiously. “Admiral Cher, that son of a bitch. I should have had him buried in the water long ago.”

  The Minister of Defence decided to deploy the entire fleet to the front line by the end of the month, under the pretext of a large scale exercise, but with the full intention of going to all out war. Bastian was commanded to go to Torsa Island to command the fleet from there.

   “I’m sorry, Major, to have cut your vacation time short,” Admiral Demel looked at Bastian with cold eyes.

   “Do you think war will break out?” Bastian said, ignoring the comment.

   “Lovita may be stupid, but there is no way even they would think it a good idea to deploy their entire fleet just for an exercise.”

   “If war does break out, it will not be confined to the local area, this could be a full scale battle.”

   “I know, its hard to tell. The people in power, that make these kinds of decisions, are usually too crazy to understand the reality of a situation like this. They think throwing a few bombs is enough to get the job done.”

   “Any idea how the battle lines will be drawn out?”

   “It's too early to tell right now, but at the very least, Ardenne won't be attacked.”

   “What about the east, Rothewein.”

   “Why? Have you bought a distillery there or something? Moving into whiskey now that you control the railway and steel industry?” Admiral Demel gazed at him, his eyes narrowed. Bastian saw an unfamiliar, intense seriousness and even desperation in them that he had never witnessed before. “Looking at the current situation, the army is advancing to the south, the navy to the north, leaving the eastern fringe out of it for now, it's a difficult spot to occupy by land. I believe the north sea front will be the gateway to protecting the north and the east parts of the Empire.” Admiral Demel gave his consensus without any more mirth. 

“For now, let's just concentrate on Cher’s fleet, let's bury him in the depths of the north sea.”

   “When’s departure?”

   “This weekend, without any ceremony. You will slip away into the night as if on another routine training mission.”

   Three days. There was too little time to get his company and personal affairs in order. 

“Could you give me a few more days?” Bastian looked at Admiral Demel, cold and stern. Time was relentlessly slipping away. There was no room left for any hesitation or delay. “I promise to compensate for my disloyalty with a victory. Just give me a bit more time. Please," Bastian pleaded, making a deep bow towards a bewildered Admiral Demel.

The silence filled with the sound of the ticking clock on the wall.



The fragrant smell of baking filled the country house. Odette moved about getting everything prepared and ready. The potatoes were all prepared, so she moved to the sea bass and sauce, using tomatoes and an eggplant from the garden.

   Every time she checked the time, her hands moved faster. She moved like a woman possessed with making the finest meal for a man she didn’t really want to come.

   With the food prepared, Odette set the table. Laying out a freshly laundered cloth and settings for two. She even went into the village earlier, to buy two champagne glasses. She thought about only putting out one, there was no way she was going to be able to control herself, even after just one glass of alcohol.

   Once there was nothing more to do, Odette went up stairs to get changed. She tidied her hair, which had become a tangled and frizzy mess from all the running around and cooking. While she was arranging the shape of the ribbon, the bell rang.

   She got up to answer the door excitedly, only to realise, as she was running down the stairs, that it was in fact a bicycle trundling past.

   Six o’clock came and the normally quiet road became a little busier from all the people returning home from work.

   Seven o’clock came, the water in the river turned red from the sunset.

   Eight o’clock. The village was quiet now, shrouded in darkness.

   Odette got up from where she sat in the front window, watching the road and went out into the back yard, where a single lantern broke the night. She grabbed a single champagne glass and returned to the kitchen where the oven had cooled ages ago.

   The door bell rang.

   Odette nearly dropped the glass in her rush to the front door. When she pulled it open, doing her best to hide the excited smile on her face, she was met with someone unexpected.

   “Good evening, Lady Odette,” said Count Xanders.

   “Teacher,” Alma called out.

   “I am sorry to drop in unannounced, but I was passing through and thought I would call in to see how you were doing. I would also like to discuss about the carpenter coming over to fix the flooring.”

   “Ah, yes, okay, come in.”

Regardless, a visitor had come. She decided to think that was enough. 



Bastian was the last person to get off the train. He rushed over to his hotel and changed out of his uniform. By the time he came back out into the square, the village clock chimed nine. He sprinted along the road beside the river that led to Odette’s house.

   His increasingly heavy breathing broke the quiet night, along with the thundering of his feet on the dirt road. His heart pounded hard in his chest, like it was trying to break free, but Bastian did not stop. He clutched a bottle of Champagne in one hand.

   He had been lucky that Admiral Demel agreed to let him have an extra couple days, he actually had until the end of the week. It was enough to get out and see Odette.

   As soon as the bright lights of Odette’s house appeared, he ran even faster. By the time he stood on the porch, his breathing was heavy and his lungs burned. He thought he heard the sound of a child’s laugh.

   Twisting his crumpled handkerchief Bastian carefully walked around the side of the house,  and peered around the wall. He saw a luxury car, one he recognised. Bastian headed further around, until he could see to the back garden. 

Alma was playing, while Maximin Von Xanders watched on and even Odette had a smile on her face as she watched him.

   They looked like a happy family, sat under the large tree, beaming and smiling at each other. It was a scene so beautiful and peaceful that it felt like a dream.

   She seemed like a completely different person from yesterday who was immersed in deep sadness and pain.. She was having a comfortable meal. She chatted and laughed often. Everything had changed

Who was the uninvited guest? 

   Bastian turned away, the firing in his eyes cooled as he chuckle to himself. The turbulent thoughts settled themselves and his hatred dimmed. The happy laughter of the three was a joyous sound to hear and the uninvited guest slowly slunk away into the night.

Chapter 172.


Finally the Correct Answer.








Count Xanders did not leave until after ten. He gingerly placed his daughter onto the back seat of the car. Odette had come out to see them off, even though he insisted that she didn’t need to. He couldn’t help notice that she seemed to have put more effort into her dress than yesterday.

   Bastian sat close by, in the darkness, under a willow tree and watched. He carried on watching when the counts car drove off down the road and Odette walked out to the gate, looking both ways.

   He chuckled and brushed the hair from his face. How pathetic would it be if she spotted him, caught him spying on her love life. It would have been better for the pair of them if he had just gone straight off to battle.

   Odette returned to the house. The lights in the downstairs windows went out and the lights in the upstairs came on. Now and then, Bastian could see her silhouette passing by the window. An incredible passion came over him.

The naval higher-ups approved his request, allowing him additional time to prepare in light of the empire's special recognition of a hero. The underlying implications were not difficult to discern. The military, generally unmerciful, exhibiting leniency did not suggest a favorable situation. Unless circumstances went awry, war was likely to erupt, and the North Sea would transform into a battleground.

Intent on revenge, the enemy's commander advanced to the battlefield. Meanwhile, Berg sought to bolster his troops' morale by sending him, a hero who had previously defeated the same enemy commander.

Bastian fully grasped the weight of the responsibility entrusted to him; he would serve as the vanguard in this war. The additional days granted to him could be likened to the final meal served to a condemned prisoner.

He knew that if he cared for her, he should turn away now and go off to war. Even if he stood at a new starting line in the hopes of being with her, he would only end up hurting her again. Apology, forgiveness all mixed up in a vicious cycle that had no room for love. He no longer had the reasoning or time necessary to fulfill his desire.


He knew his misfortune and he accepted it. He didn’t know how to make her smile, no matter how hard he tried. In the end, he will only end up hurting her.

   But still…

   Bastian crossed the little bridge and rang the doorbell without a seconds hesitation.

   An eternity passed.

   Even if this was selfish, he was a dog and a dog couldn’t help behaving as such, he should just accept that. If he had to play the villain once again, just for her to hate him and wash away the love, then all the better for her.

   “Bastian? What on earth…” Odette looked at him, blinking.

   “Put up with me for just a couple more days,” he pleaded, holding on tightly to the open door.  “Maybe because of guilt or sympathy, as you said, just give me a couple days, to confirm.”

   “What are you talking about?”

   “A proper end, I want us to come to a proper end.”

   Odette considered him, not sure what to make of the man before her. The man that failed to turn up when she expected him, only now came when she was not. He was unbelievable. Then she saw the glimmer of a glass bottle in his hands and things suddenly made sense.

Odette looked at him, puzzled. His clothes and hair were a mess, it was startlingly dissimilar to his typically exceptionally tidy appearance. “Bastian, is something…”

   “Just stay with me until Wednesday. Then I will do whatever you want.”

   “I thought you were supposed to already know what I wanted.”

   Odette could not take this affront. He broke all rules of etiquette, coming at an inappropriate hour, half drunk and all messed up. Just as she was about to lose her temper with him, right as she was about to let the anger burst from her…

   “Let’s get divorced,” Bastian said. A soft, summer breeze fluttered playfully around the garden, tugging at Odette’s nightgown. “If things turn out to be exactly the same as they always were, then I will put an end to it, as you want, but I want to try right up until the very last. I believe you have nothing to lose from the deal, yes?” He said as he took a step back, like a polite stranger.

   Odette gazed at the man who had finally come up with the answer.



 

As the dawn began to break the night, Odette decided to get up. She had not slept at all through the night and even when she splashed cold water on her face, her minds remained in a daze.

   The man who had disrupted her evening left almost like a dream. If it hadn’t been for the champagne bottle left on her doorstep, she would have thought she dreamt Bastian’s arrival last night. Perhaps her memory had been distorted. She went through the series of strange events in her mind as she got ready for the day.

   As she made her way to the kitchen to fix herself some breakfast, the doorbell rang. She glanced up at the clock, it was so early in the morning she doubted even the milkman had gotten up yet. She rushed to the door with a sense of trepidation and when she opened it, Bastian was stood there with a travel trunk, an elderly lady just behind him.

   “Ah, here we are, this is your cousin, is it not?” the elderly lady said to Bastian.

   “Yes, good morning ma’am.” Bastian greeted her.

   “That is good, staying for awhile are you?” the old woman continued to pry.

   “Yes, for a little while. I was staying at the hotel in the neighbouring town, but I like this village so much, I decided to stay here instead.”

   “Ah, you have good taste, does he not Marie?”

   “Oh, yes ma’am,” Odette said, not sure what to make of the scene.

   With her nosey curiosity satisfied, the old lady continued about her day with a smug look of content on her face.

   “I don’t think you should be leaving guests out on the doorstep, where they can draw even more unwanted attention,” Bastian said with a cocked smile. His appearance this morning was very neat in contrast to his disheveled state last night.

   “Only if you promise that you will leave when you are asked,” Odette said sternly.

   “No more, no less,” Bastian said, stepping into the cottage and dragging the trunk behind him.

   “Follow me, then, though I have not properly prepared the guest bedroom,” Odette said and led the way up the stairs, with Bastian keeping a respectful distance.

   She took him to the spare bedroom. It had a bed, which was more than the third bedroom, which was only slightly bigger. There was also a wardrobe with a missing door.

   “I will bring you blankets once I am done with the mornings lessons,” Odette said.

   “I’m not sure how to properly thank you  for my niece's warm welcome,” Bastian mischievously said as he entered the bedroom. “Will you be seeing Count Xanders again today?”

   “No, today I am teaching a farmers daughter in the next village, I should be done around noon.”

   “The girl from the vineyard?”

   “Yes, that’s right. It’ll probably be done around noon."  

Bastian hoisted his trunk onto the bed and flipped the lid open to start hanging clothes in the rickety old wardrobe. A faint smile appeared on Odette’s face as she watched him, he had no intention of hiding the fact that he had been following her around.

   “So, I will meet you under the clock tower at midday.”

   “No, I have the things I need here…”

   “Keep your promise, Odette,” Bastian said. He slowly approached her and stopped right in front of her. “We agreed to give each other time.”

   “Then you need to keep your promise too.”

   “Yes, of course I will.”

   His eyes were like the deep blue sea and for some reason, Odette stared into those eerie blue eyes, wondering what manner of beasts floated just below the surface.

 



 

Odette declined the vintner's wife’s offer to stay for lunch, she was late enough as it was because her daughter couldn’t follow instructions properly. The older brother followed Odette out the door, pretending to be going out.

   “Miss Byller, do you have another appointment today?”

   “Yes, I’m meeting my cousin,” Odette said, relieved that she didn’t need to make up an excuse. Bastian was sitting on the bench below the clock tower reading a newspaper.

   “Are you making things up to reject me…”

   “Ah, Marie, there you are, I was getting worried,” Bastian shouted before the brother could finish his line. He folded the newspaper in his hands, and rose from his seat then strode across the square. The older brother huffed and turned back for the vineyard.

"Hi sister, shall we go, now?" Bastian extended his hand while looking towards a man who shot cautious glances over his shoulder. Following the script, Odette folded her umbrella and grasped Bastian's offered hand.

They began to saunter side by side, their path lit by the brilliantly blazing sun above them.


Chapter 173.


This Is Me.








"What do you think of this? It's new." The store owner showed a fresh blanket. The small store was packed with colorful blankets.

Odette studied the blanket with a discerning eye, questioning the shop clerk about the type of fabric and its feather count. Bastian kept a respectful distance as he didn’t understand what they were talking about and wondered why Odette didn’t just pick the top blanket, the colour and softness didn’t matter, but she was determined to make an informed decision.

   “These two seem to be the best, what do you think?” Odette said, showing some blankets to him.

   Bastian approached the stand and looked at the blankets. One was plain white, while the other had a floral pattern.

   “Flowers? Are you serious?” Bastian said with a raised eyebrow.

   “The texture feel really nice, try, touch it.” Odette smiled at Bastian brightly and held out the flowery blanket, attempting to torment him.

   “Okay, fine, then let's go with that one. ” Bastian said. Odette was somewhat surprised by his chosen blanket.

   “Good choice,” the stall owner said stepping forward. “But I think it might be a little small if its for the gentleman. Give me a second. There's a bigger blanket with this material in our storage. I'll grab it for you." The stall owner turned away.  

“No, this will be enough,” Odette said.

   “If you insist, but with a husband that tall, there’s no way it can be enough.”

   Odette flushed bright red. “Wait, this is my cousin, my cousin has come to visit and I don’t have any blankets for him.”

"Is that so?" The store owner looked at them, puzzled. However, once she spotted the wedding ring on Bastian's hand, any doubts she had disappeared. “Oh, my, I am sorry, I didn’t mean to make a fuss. "I thought you were picking a blanket for you and your husband. Maybe I'm getting old, my guesswork isn't good anymore." The store owner joked as he packed the quilt.

   Bastian came forward and paid the stall keeper as Odette turned and near ran away in embarrassment. Bastian smiled as he turned in time to see the blue ribbon in her hair flutter away.

"Why that one?" Odette asked, annoyed outside the store.

"The texture," Bastian said casually.

"You didn't even touch it."

"I chose to trust my cousin's great taste and took her advice."


“Since when do you trust anything I have to say?”

“Since today, I suppose.” Bastian said and walked ahead, leaving Odette who confused, watching his back.

   Wherever Bastian went, he would naturally grab people's attention, but as he walked through the village with the floral blanket tucked under his arm, he attracted more attention than usual.

   “Lets go back,” Odette said, turning down a side road to head back to the cottage.

   “I, ah, have some things I need to do first.”

   “What things?”

   “Well, you know, this and that.” Bastian did not wait to see if Odette followed after him, but turned away and made for the only restaurant in the village.

   Odette stood in the middle of the road, dumbfounded and watched him march away. He looked like an entirely different person and she had never seen him like this before. Bastian sat on the terrace and waved for Odette to join him when he noticed she did not follow.

   “Come, Miss Byller.” Bastian shouted enough to get the attention of the whole village. Odette picked up her feet, that man not Bastian Klauswitz, he was Karl Lovis.|

It seemed more reasonable to believe that, after all.



 

On the return to the cottage, they passed through the fountain at the village square and several stalls selling all sorts of niknaks and curious. Odette’s face lit up. It was hard to believe that she acted so aloof when around the various gold and expensive jewels back at the mansion.

   Bastian followed her around the stands, keeping a respectful distance, watching her trying to choose between one sugar cube tong and another. They were pretty much the same but with minor differences. After considering both the shell and flower patterns, Odette picked the shell.

They stayed at the market until well into the afternoon, but the only thing Bastian remembered was Odette.

   Odette had a surprisingly girly taste.

   Odette was good at bargaining.

   Odette was always careful what she chose.

   Odette was so beautiful in the golden rays of the afternoon sun. A beauty he would soon lose forever.

   By the time they were done, Odette had bought so much stuff, Bastian wasn’t sure how he was going to carry it all. Bastian laughed when he saw the final item Odette bought. Pesticide. She held a pesticide bottle with strong words on it, like a queen's scepter. 

“Apparently there was a bug in the rose tree.” Odette told him, like it was no big deal.

   “Allow me to carry it,” Bastian said, extending his hand. “No, you’re already carrying too much,” she had a stubborn look in her eye.

   Bastian didn’t argue and let Odette have her way. If she didn’t want help, he was not going to pressure her. Maybe it wasn’t just about preserving her pride.

   They left the market, carrying a hundred bags between them. The village brook, basking in the afternoon sun, danced with a radiant golden hue. They walked side by side, following the stream back to the cottage. The shadows of willow trees cast about them, and each of them was lost in their own thoughts.

   “Countess Trier must not be a very generous person, to have put you up in this pokey little cottage.”

   “I like it here.”

  “Why?”

   “Countess Trier is not a heartless person, I told her that I did not want handouts, there’s no such thing as a free lunch.”

   “Is that why you cut ties with the imperial family?”

   “Perhaps. I wouldn’t even call it distancing as I have never lived a single moment as a noble, so a I don’t know what it's like. I only accepted their stipend as I thought it was some sort of compensation, but I don’t even want that now. At this point, I feel I have suffered enough as the girl who stole her mothers crown.”

   “What if your rights were restored?”

   “Empty assumptions have no power, Bastian. I wont live like my mother.” Odette drew a clear line in the conversation and Bastian respected her. “You know, I think you are more of a noble than I am. You’ve received more of an aristocratic education, led a more aristocratic life and therefore, are more aristocratic life. While lowly old me has been a day labourer and lived as a maid.”

   “You speak like a revolutionary.”

   “I’m just saying, our lineage does not define who we are, so perhaps I am only just now finding out where I belong.”

   The things she could never bring up when talking to Countess Trier or Count Xanders flowed more easily around Bastian. She thought it might be because Bastian might be able to understand better.

   “You were deceived, dear Bastian, there was never a noble woman behind these features,” Odette humbly confessed. “I am just an ordinary woman who had the rotten luck of being born into the Imperial family.”

   Odette felt like a great weight lifted off her shoulders. The sadness that had grown as long as the evening shadows got carried away like a flowing stream.

   Once they got home, Odette went straight to the kitchen and arranged the groceries and placed the insecticide in the back garden. She sensed Bastian trailing behind her.

   “I’ll prepare dinner, if you want to go ahead and tidy up the guest room.”

   Bastian went up stairs, throwing the blankets onto the bed and went over to the dressing table. Neatly arranged toiletries and a golden comb sat next to a bottle of cream, with a shinning red letter H. It was the initial letter of Odette’s name, her pride and her shackle. Bastian looked at it for the longest time.


Chapter 174.


Land Sickness.


Odette woke up early once more. She tried to get back to sleep, but when she couldn’t, she made yet another early start to the day. Even after getting herself ready and came out of her room, the door on the opposite side of the hallway was silent.

   He was certainly acting like a polite guest. He stayed in the guest room and kept to the boundaries. At this rate, their few days together could be quite pleasant.

   Odette tip toed downstairs and out into the back garden. It was too early for her to have breakfast, so she thought she would tend to the flowers and vegetables first. Just as she started to spray the pesticide on the rose tree, the unmistakable sounds of Bastian’s disturbed the peaceful morning.

   Odette looked up and realised that the house had been silent because Bastian was not home. He came jogging down the country lane in his sports wear and when their eyes met, he gave her a broad smile and jumped over the fence.

   “When did you start running?” Odette said. Her eyes kept shifting between his wet shirt and his very shorts.

   “Same time I always go for a run,” Bastian said, his heavy breathing made his words breathy. He got water from the garden pump and used it to clean his face. “Shall we go for a picnic today?”

Odette squinted her eyes and glanced at the cloudy sky. “In the weather like this?”

   “I’ll go get ready then.” Bastian casually made a promise and went into the house without looking back. 

Odette sighed deeply and stored her gardening equipment. She was rethinking her idea that Bastian was a polite guest.



Odette looked up at the sky with anxious eyes. As they approached their destination, the clouds were growing more dense and the idea of a picnic was growing desperate.

   “I think we should go back,” Odette said, looking back up the road where a muggy breeze blew down at her.

   “But we’re already here,” said Bastian, already pulling out a blanket and flapping it out under a willow tree. Odette resigned, she had no choice and went to his side.

   Odette had chosen this cosy little field of wild flowers. There were many beautiful spots in the village and Odette had to walk far to find this spot, far from prying eyes. If it did decide to rain, they would be in trouble, but Bastian remained optimistic.

   “If I had the time, I would have prepared properly,” Odette said, as she helped Bastian layout the food and drink. A quickly prepared sandwich and a few pieces of fruit. The pastries she packed were remaining from a gathering a couple of days before.

   “I think this is ample,” Bastian said with a casual smile and took out the champagne.

   Odette sat with her legs tucked to one side. Taking off her hat and placing a heavy box of cookies on it to stop it blowing away, she grimaced at the mismatch of her ensemble.  A blouse and skirt that didn't match in color at all, her hair neatly held in a ponytail. Adding to the palette confusion, even the stockings were disparate. That’s what she got for dressing in a hurry. When she noticed how messy she was, her upset grew.

   “Is there any reason why it had to be today?” Odette said in a reprimanding tone. Bastian simply looked at her with a sly smile. He seemed preoccupied by something.

Odette was quietly watching the unabashed man. Bastian donned suspenders over a shirt left casually unbuttoned. His hair, styled impeccably without the aid of pomade, moved rhythmically with the breeze. He was so perfect in the midst of the chaos, and it amplified her irritation further.

While Bastian was busy uncorking the champagne, Odette quickly combed her hair with finger and fixed the ponytail into a half bun. Then... Bang.  The sudden noise startled Odette and fizzy wine sprayed out over the picnic, soaking her head, the cloth and spraying over several of the cookies and cakes. 

“What is this…?”  Odette let out an exasperated yel gazing at Bastian across from her. Despite being doused in champagne, he appeared in better shape than she did.


Bastian chuckled mirthfully, “I guess this is the champagne I bought the other day,” he said, continuing to laugh. “I am sorry, Miss Byller, I didn’t anticipate that it had been shaken up quite a lot.”


Odette gave the champagne glass a mocking look. She had cushioned it with a towel fearing it might shatter, but now lugging it around seemed pointless. She gazed at the sky, shrouded in dreary clouds then got up, shaking her head and went over to the stream to try and wash off some of the wine before it got sticky. It seemed like her whole life had unfolded within the last few minutes, she did her best to laugh it off like Bastian and found her heart lightened a little.

Odette did her best to wash her hands and face, though there was no helping her blouse and skirt.  it seemed like there was nothing she could do other than take it off.

 She stared at her reflection in the stream and felt like such a fool. What was she doing with a man she had already broken up with? It was so ridiculous and pathetic.

   As she got up, thinking back along the wasted three years of her life, a blue hanky suddenly came into view. She looked up at the man that held it out to her and the piercing blue eyes that looked at her.

   “It's okay, I’ll use mine,” she said politely. She reached into the pocket of her skirt and found it empty.

   In her moment of despair, Bastian seemed to read what was wrong and stood before her, gently dabbing at her face. His gentle touch blurred her composure.

   Feeling overwhelmed by his closeness, she pushed him away and he stepped aside without resistance, providing a moment of relief. Odette made to walk back alone, only to find, his coat draped on her shoulders. She looked at him, but he had moved away to washed his face in the stream.

Finally, they back to square one.

Her mind went blank like a blank sheet of paper.



“Oh my god, don’t eat it, Bastian!”

   As Bastian was about to place the sandwich in his mouth, Odette called out. He looked at her, mock surprise on his face.

   “It's soaked in champagne, let's go back and I will cook us a proper meal.”

   Bastian chuckled and stuffed the whole half sandwich into his mouth. Bastian ate it all, under the disgusted scowl of Odette. Bastian, not able to say anything, offered an apple. Odette sighed with exasperation and took the apple.

   “Why on earth are you doing this?” Odette said.

   The two sat side by side under the willow tree, sharing slices of the apple and looking at the overcast sky. There was no conversation that came to their minds. Bastian, who had eaten his fill, laid down with his fingers interlocked behind his head. Odette leaned back against the tree and started to read the book she brought with her. It was a peaceful time of rest.

   “Odette,” Bastian murmured, his eyes closed.

   “Yes?”

   “Would you sing for me?”

   Odette looked at Bastian with a frown. “I didn’t think you could get drunk on a few slices of soggy sandwich.”

   “Please? I would like to hear you sing.”

   “I don’t think it would be appropriate.”

   “What was ever appropriate about our relationship?”

   Odette looked at Bastian with a glare, he chuckled. Today, Bastian seemed like a mischievous little boy.

   “I suppose you’re right,” Odette said with a nod.

   A more humid wind blew threw the meadow.

   Odette closed the book and looked up at the distant sky and began to hum. Bastian looked up at her as she started to sing for him, like a beautiful dream.

The melody flew past the fields and stream, towards him. As their eyes weaved a tapestry of intent, the song drew its final breath.

   Bastian looked at Odette for a long moment. He felt like he was at the top of the tallest wave. He felt the familiar dizziness that came over him when ever life became quiet and comfortable. He felt like he could identify the anxiety that had been so unfamiliar, uncomfortable, and felt so wrong. 

   After being at sea for so long, the land felt like a sandpit and made him feel unsteady. It was land sickness. His body had become so used to the motion of the waves, that when he finally stood still, he couldn’t help but feel like he was in motion.

   Such was the life of a sailor.

   He had survived stormy seas. He had survived gargantuan waves. He had spent every night being rocked to sleep by the water. The feeling of solid ground was alien to him.

   She was the first bit of land he had ever set foot on.

   The feelings that were so abnormal to him were nothing more than ordinary love. He had fallen in love with a beautiful woman and became infatuated by her. He wanted to know everything about her and he wanted to be with her.

   He just wanted all of his days to be like this. In that moment of helplessness, when his feelings grew to the point they wanted to burst free, he felt a cold something splash on his cheek. Bastian opened his eyes and saw the sky was now far too close and far too dark.

Thinking it could start to rain heavily Bastian stood up, And soon, it did. Heavy rain started pouring down.



It quickly became the worst day ever. The anger boiled up inside Odette and threatened to rear its ugly head as her umbrella was ripped inside out and eventually torn from her wet hands.

   Why today, of all days?

   She felt like she wanted to scream, but right now she didn’t have the time, she needed to get her umbrella back, but the tattered thing was carried away high and clear. Her pout was enough to turn away anyone. 

Unable to contain herself any more, she ran barefoot in the rain. Bastian was following behind her, maintaining a certain distance. 

“Ah!” Odette suddenly sat down on the road. Bastian quickly ran to aid her, noticing she have twisted her ankle and had trouble standing.

The rain was becoming increasingly heavy, whipped into a frenzy by the growing winds. Without wasting a moment, Bastian pulled a blanket from the basket and wrapped it around the shivering body.

   “This is all your fault,” Odette high-pitched shout rang out along with thunder. “You’re such a stubborn jackass.”

   “Let's put the fight on hold for now, until we get out of the rain and into some dry clothes,” Bastian said. Carrying a basket in on arm, he quickly lifted her and started running. Odette’s surprised cries were drowned out by the loud rain and thunder.

   The downpour was growing heavier by the second and Bastian was getting desperate. It was clear they would not be able to make it home in this storm, but luckily, they passed through a wheat field that had recently been harvested and at its back, there was a mill. Bastian quickly checked the door was unlocked and immediately went inside.


Chapter 175.


Sanctuary of My Heart.








Bastian laid Odette down upon the dry straw in the corner of the mill. He then proceeded to remove all the soaked items, starting with the picnic blanket that was wrapped around her, it had done nothing to protect her from the rain. Her shoes came off and he poured out the water pooling at the bottom. He sit between her legs then lifted her skirt to unhook the garter belt. Realising what he was doing, Odette quickly pushed down her skirts.

   “No, I will do it,” she said.

   “Stay still,” Bastian said, snatching the skirts out of her hand and returning his attention to removing her stockings. He inspected her ankle like a jeweller inspecting a priceless diamond. It didn’t look broken.  He quickly tied Odette's ankles using a handkerchief from his pocket.

 “You’ll be fine, though I wouldn’t risk walking on it for a while.”  Bastian turned his attention to removing the other stocking, but Odette shoved his shoulder again. Bastian paused and looked at Odette, her bright red face caught his eye. She didn’t say anything to him and wrung out the hem of her skirt. He then realised the exposed nature of her thin, reedy legs and the depth held within her skirt. He felt his heat rise and became overly aware of her scent mixed with the fresh rain.

   Bastian stood up and backed away politely, brushing his lank hair out of his face. “Wait here, I’ll run back home and get some dry clothes for you.”

Odette, who was hastily adjusting the hem of her skirt, looked up at him in surprise. “There’s no need for that, we can cuddle up in the hay…”

   “No, Odette, you stay here, keep warm, I’ll be back in a moment.”

   Even before Bastian made it to the door, he heard footsteps approaching. “I think someone’s coming,” he said and Odette flushed with more embarrassment.

  “Sshh” Bastian put a finger to his lips and went up to the small window beside the door. It was a large, burly man in a long, deep raincoat. He was pulling a cart. He must be the farmer who owns the mill.

   “What do we do?” Odette said, fright evident in her face. Suddenly, the pain in her ankle returned, causing her to lose balance. Bastian came over and helped her before a tower of baled hay fell on their head. He hugged her tightly, then flung himself onto the straw-covered floor. The water wheel became a dirty mess. Before they could do anything, the farmer entered the mill. They rolled over and hid behind a collapsed haystack. 

“You damn rats! They made chaos again!  Why today! ” the farmer muttered angrily and  Odette felt her pulse race, scared they would be caught out. “Bloody rain, always when I have the most work to do.” he threw away the straw he had brought in his cart then started smoking. 

Bastian lay in the hay, his arms wrapped around Odette, holding her close. She could feel his warmth radiate from his body and she could feel his heart beating a slow, calm rhythm compared to her racing beat. 

“…Odette.” In a low whisper, Bastian held her more tightly. They lay still to avoid collapsing the haystack. Odette became quiet as she understood their situation and a wave of relief washed over him. His eyelids fell shut, releasing a ragged sigh of tension.


  Every time the farmer's feet shuffled across the floor, Odette feared they would be caught, but it never happened. The farmer moved about, doing his chores, but never came around the hay that obscured them.

   There was the distinct sound of a lighter and the mill quickly filled with the acrid stench of a cigarette. They waited patiently for the farmer to finish his break and once done, the door slammed shut and the farmer was gone. As soon as they were left alone, Odette pushed herself from Bastian.

   She brushed off the hay that was now clinging to her and straightened the hem of her dress and tidied her hair. When she looked over at Bastian, he was still laying in the hay, eyes closed. Now that she was away from him, she could feel her body getting colder and colder. She wanted to go home, get a hot bath and put on some fresh, dry clothes.

   “Don’t bother,” Bastian said as she hobbled over to the door.

   She ignored him and continued to the door, he heard him get up and follow her and she felt fear wash over her. Was he going to do something to her? Was this her plan all along? Overcome with panic, Odette scrambled for the door and tried to fling it open, but it didn’t budge. Bastian came over her and tried to pushed it as well.

He let out a sigh.

“Stop it, Odette. It's locked.” 



  Gradually the rain did subside. Bastian stood by the window, looking out at the grey, gloomy world.  “When the rain stops, the farmer will most likely return.”

  “How do you know that?” 

   Bastian waved a hand at a fresh pile of hay dumped in the middle of the mill, as if it would explain anything..


  “Odette, just leave it…” His eyes widened when he saw Odette limping and in tears.

Odette had whittled away the hours by keeping herself busy in the only manner she knew how, by cleaning up the mill. Bastian had told her not to bother several times, but Odette ignored him. Now, there was no work for the farmer to return to.

   “Are you quite finished?” Bastian said,  

“No,” Odette snapped, sweeping more vigorously.

"Will this make any difference?" Bastian took the broom from Odette, knowing she was using it as an excuse to avoid being alone with him. If he didn't take it, she might even stir up the dusty floor. He had held back earlier, but now his patience was wearing thin.

"Give it back."

"The farmer will be back soon, so what's the point of you doing this madness?"

 Odette let out a frustrated grunt. “You know, this is why I never wanted to see you again.” She glared at Bastian with her reddened eyes and rosy cheeks. She had tried to hold back from saying harsh words.

   She had wanted these few days to become a good memory for them both. In a couple days, he would be gone forever and she would hopefully never see him again. Was it so much that their final parting was a good one, it would benefit the both of them. And this only deepened her resentment towards him for intruding into the sanctuary of her heart.

She knew this man wasn’t doing anything wrong  and it was unfair to blame him in this way. , but she couldn’t help but feel antagonised. The anger was mostly from disappointment in herself. She couldn’t turn away from him, who had suddenly appeared, though she should have suspected he would show up, he always did.

She accepted his ridiculous offer, and she was doing something she couldn't understand.  She knew it was her choice and thus her responsibility, but it was difficult to control her emotions.

   “I came all the way out there, I started to feel better about myself, but here you are again, trying to ruin my life, why?”  Odette cried out, struggling to hold back tears, she wanted to stamp her foot in frustration, but the ankle was sore and felt swollen. 

The cousins took shelter in a watermill cottage just outside town. Rumors would undoubtedly spread. When a farmer came, they shouldn't have hidden and just explained they were simply escaping the rain. But now they were trapped, uncertain of what excuse to give. Even in the midst of all this, she couldn’t forgive herself for succumbing such animalistic desires.

"Should I quash the rumors that you're a woman obsessed with your cousin?" Bastian asked her with a hint of sarcasm, as he looked at her.

"What are you going to do now?" Odette tried to hold back her tears.

   Bastian gave her a hurt look, which was quickly replaced with something of scorn. He put down the broom and marched to the door like he was going to walk through it, but stopped just short and tried to put his foot through it instead. He was trying to kick the door down. Every forceful kick from him made the water mill quiver. The sound made Odette anxious and frightful. The whole building shook like it was going to collapse.

   It took a few tries, but eventually Bastian was able to burst threw it when he threw his whole body into shouldering it open. Falling thru the doorway, Bastian looked around to make sure no one was about. The road was still empty.

   Bastian turned back to the mill and looked at Odette with a flat expression as he slipped a thick stack of money under a stone to pay for the damages.

   “If you could have done that all along, why did you wait until now?” Odette said, her quivering voice carried through the wind and rain.

   “I guess I was underestimating myself,” Bastian approached her, holding the basket one last time. He'd rather face her disdain than give up at that moment.  "Even if you hate me, bear with it. There isn’t much left now.”  he said coldly, extending his polite hands.

“Shall we go then, sister?”


Chapter 176.


Appropriate Line.



The rain was intermittent all night long. During the brief lulls in the downpour, Bastian went out into the back garden for a smoke and watched the fog roll over the countryside. In those quiet moments, the imminent approach of war weighed heavy on his heart.

   As he put out his cigarette, he noticed that his wrist was not bandaged. It was an unusual mistake. He tugged on the cuff of his sleeve to cover the wound. It was not healing easily, after being agitated every night for weeks on end. He went into the kitchen and heard the stairs creek.

   With a sigh, Bastian went out into the hall, determined to help Odette so that she didn’t make her ankle worse, but she was already halfway down the stairs. She gave him a defiant look, daring him to offer help. Odette had drawn a clearly defined line and if he crossed it, it would only result in unnecessary conflict.

   “How’s your ankle?”

   “It's fine now,” Odette said, hiding her pain through a pleasant enough smile. She was still suffering from a mild fever, but it was not enough for her to be considered properly sick. Bastian was not so easily fooled, but he let her have her way, once again, to avoid conflict.


Odette carefully took the rest of the stairs and hobbled her way into the kitchen. When she heard the stairs creek, she gave a sigh of relief, as Bastian was heading up to the first floor. Accepting help from him would be a mistake, she knew that, but she didn’t want to lead him on in any way. After yesterday's chaotic picnic, hopefully the next 3 days will go by without incident and she could go back to her quiet life.

She wanted to have a good farewell. 

   The relationship was always something she ran from, like a coward. Maybe the reason she couldn’t let go of any of her regrets was because she never truly gave the arrangement a chance, but if they could spend their last remaining days together well, then they could finally say goodbye properly and end their marriage on good terms. No regrets.

After kneading the bread, Odette searched the kitchen for more ingredients and found plenty of eggs.

   “I will help you make breakfast,” with his sleeves rolled up, Bastian suddenly stride into the kitchen. She hadn’t heard him come back down the stairs.

   “No, you can wait for me upstairs,” Odette snapped.

   Bastian ignored her and turned his attention to the bread dough. “Does this need kneading?” He smiled at Odette as if he had just told a joke.

   If he was going to insist on helping, fine. “Yes, and those vegetables need chopping.” She broke the shells of several eggs.

   The kitchen quickly filled with the warm scents of breakfast foods. The bread went into the oven and the sausages went onto a pan, over a fire. Bastian was peeling potatoes and doing a very bad job of it. The pile of potato skins looked to be more potato than actual skin. Odette did her best to refrain from making a fuss, even though Bastian was more of a hindrance than anything else.

   “I think the talk of your swordsmanship was greatly exaggerated, if those potatoes are anything to go by.”

   “A potato and a kitchen knife are vastly different from a sword.”

   Odette noticed the mark on Bastian’s wrist. “What happened to your wrist, why is it like that?”

   “It's nothing, I got hurt during a training exercise,” Bastian said flatly, dumping a crudely skinned potato into the pot.

   “Is it serious?”

   “No, just a scratch.”

   “Really?” Odette said, looking sceptical. The bandage looked fresh and new. She definitely didn’t remember seeing it before. He had been on leave from the Navy for a few days, so his cuts should have healed and he shouldn't still be wearing bandages.

   “Are you calling me a liar?” Bastian said, giving her a grave look.

 Odette's cheeks turned faintly red, “No, I didn’t mean it like that,” she said quickly and turned away. She used the spitting sausages as an excuse to turn away. The kitchen fell into a deep, awkward silence, filled only by the sizzling sausages.

   Once the vegetables were cut, Bastian went to the dining room to set the table. Odette sliced up the vegetables properly and started work on the omelette. The bread was baked and the soup was thickening. The only thing left was to prepare the drink and she took out the coffee container. 

"I want some tea." Bastian, back in the kitchen, unexpectedly asked for it. "How about you?" His voice, reminding her of rain, reached her again. 

Odette opened the cupboard and took out the teapot. On the breakfast table, there was a clear distinction: one cup of coffee and one cup of tea, each placed separately. Odette's boundaries were clearly drawn once more.



The day flowed by as gentle as the rain outside. Once breakfast was done, they both spent the day separately. Odette sat in the living room, by the window, concentrating on her embroidery. While Bastian sat in the corner, reading a book.

   Odette knew there wasn’t a single book in the house that suited his taste, but she didn’t attempt to interfere, she wanted to maintain the distance between them. A good parting. That’s what she hoped for.

   The cold and the fatigue overcame her at some point and without realising, she drifted off to sleep. She woke in the late afternoon, far later than she would ever intend, surprised to find a blanket wrapped around her.

   It was far too late for lunch, so Odette pushed it from her mind and leaned back in her chair. She looked over her shoulder to the corner where Bastian had been sat reading. He too had drifted off to sleep. They had taken a lazy Sunday nap together. It was a serenity she never thought they would ever share.

   For a long while, Odette sat in the chair, looking out of the window, only occasionally looking over her shoulder to Bastian. When the hour grew too late to put off dinner any more, she stood carefully, doing her best not to disturb him. He looked tired. As the light outside faded and the light in the living room grew in strength, the lines on his face made him look even more tired.

Even if he got his years of desired revenge, the tragic end of the Klauswitz family didn’t bring him joy. Maybe if his father had passed away as his planned two years earlier, his family's downfall might not have been so heartbreaking.

   When the thought of how they had hurt each other so badly, she stifled a laugh. She did not want to put this man through any more hell and with escape in sight, she hoped they both could forget the pains of the past and be happy.

For the sake of each other, they needed to stop here.

  As she tiptoed out to the kitchen, she was relieved the day had passed by already, it meant there was 2 days left until he would have to leave. She was confident that she could maintain a distance between them.



Odette was startled awake from her slumber. She had taken a does of cold medicine after dinner and retired early. Only to be woken in the middle of the night. She got up and rushed over to the window to see what the commotion was, but there was nothing. The night was clear.

   Drawing the curtains back, Odette concluded that she much have startled herself awake through her dreams brought on by her cold, but then a loud bark of noise came from across the hall, from Bastian’s room.

   Odette threw a shawl over herself and hurried over to his room. There were more noises, something that sounded like someone struggling. She knocked on the door, panic overcame her.

   “Bastian?” There was no response. Only the sound of stamping feet and something being dragged about. Odette knocked again, more urgently. “BASTIAN!” she said, practically shouting his name.

  The painful moans that could be heard from inside.  She tried the door knob, but it was locked from the inside. She tried with all her might to try and jimmy the door open, but it was shut tight.

   “BASTIAN!” she shouted, hammering a fist on the door. “CAN YOU HEAR ME BASTIAN!? ARE YOU OKAY!?  PLEASE ANSWER ME, BASTIAN!” 

“I’m…fine,” came a weak voice, as she considered fetching the key.

   “What’s happening?”

   “Just a nightmare, its okay now, I’m fine.”

   It sounded like he was right on the other side of the door, but chose not to open it.

   “No, I don’t believe you,” she said, the words coming out as a strangle of noise. “Please open the door, Bastian.”

   She kept knocking for several minutes, the line she had so carefully drawn between them now completely forgotten.


Chapter 177.


Let's Stop.








Bastian closed his eyes and let out a resigned sigh. He held firm of the doorknob, which was now heated by his touch. The stubborn, foolish woman kept knocking and every time he heard her voice, he wanted to slip back into his nightmare. Perhaps going insane wasn’t such a bad idea.

   “Fine, if you won’t open it, then I will,” Odette said, he could hear her tiny feet stamping away.

   “You can’t open it, Odette.” There was no reply, she was gone.

Bastian let go of the doorknob with a twisted smile. He was sweating so much that drops fell from his nose down to his feet.

He turned away to drag a chair over to the door and then dumped his tired body into it. How had this happened? The nightmares had not plagued him since he came to the cottage, but tonight, they were as bad as ever. It might be due to the sleeping pills he had taken.

   He heard something scraping in the lock. “You’re wasting your time, Odette.”

   The lock snapped, but the door barely budged as he sat on the floor prevented the door from opening.

   “Bastian, why are you doing this?”

   “Please, just go, Odette.” Bastian chewed and spat out the command like a roar, like he was reprimanding a new recruit.

   The white moon poured light through the window and over the bed, where dried spots of blood had bloomed like crimson roses. The blanket Odette had gotten him lay crumpled on the floor, where he had tossed it off himself.

   “Fine,” Odette said. “If you won’t open up, then I will just have to break it down.”

   A sardonic smile crossed Bastian’s lips. “Just you try.”

   “I will, just as you taught me, I don’t care if I break my door. Just show me your face and I will leave you alone once I make sure you’re okay.”

   “Odette, please…” His plea was left hanging in the dark room.

Even when he turned around to face the sealed door and shut his eyes, the image of Odette stayed with him. Her turquoise eyes, brimming with unshed tears, lips quivering in silent agony. A face that had lived without knowing how to cry, making it all the more sad and beautiful.

Odette…my beloved Odette.

   Bastian looked at the door, Odette was still there, her voice shook as she kept hitting the door, no doubt her eyes bloodshot with tears. He had discovered a new weakness in her, something he could use, a weapon he could control perfectly. Himself. He looked down at the rope burn on his wrist and his eyes filled with despairing hope.

   She was the type of person that could not ignore the plight of a helpless animal. He knew better than any one how to restrain Odette. All he had to do was open the door and show her his miserable, broken self. She would pity him and want to take care of him. This was his last chance to have the woman he craved so desperately.

Bastian grasped the latch desperately, like a starving animal that had found its prey when suddenly a face came to mind, an old, wrinkled and tired face, with eyes that shone brightly with instinctive desire. 

He knew very well that the reason she couldn’t let go of her family was not because of love, but because of responsibility. She had sacrificed everything, and remained a prisoner of her own life. She had sacrificed so much already for her wretched father and her step sister. So, there was hope for him. And that hope stopped Bastian in his tracks. 

He stared into moonlit room, holding on to the latch that he could not open. Odette was finally living her age. She was able to life the way she wanted and he was a threat to that peace. She was a dazzling, bright beauty and he was an all consuming shadow.

What can he give her in return for taking it away? 

   The hope that had brought Bastian here quickly turned to despair. His previously simple and easy calculation method was no longer valid. Odette said that even apologising would be painful, but if he begged and clung to her, she would forgive him, then he would have the right to confess his love to her, that was the plan, but now, it seemed more like an evil scheme. Even if such a miracle were to occur where he would be able to confess his love, he would have to leave for war.

   If Odette waited for him, he felt like he could make it through anything to get back to her, he could have promised many times it would happen, even if it meant risking his life. But …destiny is not defined by the will of one person. He was set to head into a warzone on the scale of which had never been seen before. It would be difficult to be sure of anything.

   “Are you okay Bastian?” Odette’s voice carved through his melancholy. She had said she would not be able to bare it if she were to get hurt again and he understood that feeling now.

  She might be a cold person, but she wasn’t heartless. Her loneliness had made her kind hearted, rather than bitter. She was the kind of person that would not so easily be able to ignore the suffering of others. That’s why she needed to get away from him. If she saw him in this pitiful state, her heart would soften and she would trap herself all over again. Like a bird freely going into the cage.

   “Go back to bed,” Bastian whispered through the door. “I’m just haunted by nightmares of the wrongs I have done.” His voice serene like the break of dawn. 

In the end, all he could give her was pain.  As he closed his eyes, he had finally found the answer he was looking for. He now understood what he needed to do for that unfortunate woman.

   “Open the door and we can talk about it.”

   “No, I don’t think that is a good idea.” Bastian sat back down in the chair. “I apologised and sought forgiveness. I thought that I could start over, overcome, but the past will always be there. You were right, Odette, I think I understand my true feelings now, after eliminating empathy and guilt. We are a festering wound to each other and the only way to heal, is to be apart.” Bastian closed his eyes as the tears flowed down his cheek. “We need to stop.”

“Bastian….”

"I will keep my word. My thoughts are now mostly clear."

He heard Odette release the door knob and took the step back. There was silence for a long while and Bastian slowly opened his eyes. His emotionless eyes were now veiled by the darkness of the night.  He had made his decision and let go, ready to face the remnants of his nightmares.

  I won’t lock you up in hell again.


Bastian decided to stay strong, covered his sleeves over his injuries, and cleaned up the mess. As he did this, the early morning became even more silent.

"I don't want to live like this anymore either." Bastian said, facing the locked door. Odette didn't respond. "So stop, Odette."  

He removed the ropes, stashed them in a drawer, and fixed the mattress. He straightened the blankets, took a sleeping pill, and went to bed. As the sleeping pill started to work, he heard Odette's soft footsteps leaving through the front door.

Overwhelmed with bitter-sweet emotion, Bastian drifted into his slumber.



Odette woke up the next morning far later than she intended. At first she was content with enjoying the warm comfort of her bed, until the realisation that it was a school day. She rushed around the house, gathering the things she need and no matter how hard she tried, she was not going to make it on time, mostly because her ankle has not yet fully recovered.

   As she was pottering about the house, she noticed that it was quieter than usual. Had Bastian left already? She took a moment from her hurried morning to peer into the spare bedroom and let out a sigh of relief when she saw Bastian’s luggage was still there. Why was she relieved? At least he didn't just disappear, without saying goodbye. Odette suddenly realized that she always left him like that, and turned around with a blank smile.


Memories of the night she realized the lines Bastian had drawn came one by one, following the sound of the creaking stairs.

He didn't hesitate to say harsh things like, ‘You're just my employee.’ but he had never drawn such a clear line between them before now. Maybe she was just realizing that some people, no matter how hard you try, remain beyond your reach

“Bastian!”   She went about the house calling his name. Had he gone out to exercise? The time on the clock hinted that he should have finished hours ago and just as she grew frustrated, someone called out to her from the garden.

   “Miss Byller, would you come outside?” It was a soft beckon full of mirth.

   Odette ran to the door and pulled it open and as soon as she took her first steps into the garden, she saw it. Bastian, on a bike, was smiling as calm as if nothing out of the ordinary was happening, waving for her to come over.

   “Miss Byller, if you don’t leave now, you’re going to be late. Come sister.” Bastian pointed to the second seat of the bike, it was a tandem.

   “Where on earth did you get that?”

   “I borrowed it from your generous neighbour.”

   “What do you mean?”

   “Your ankle, you should not be walking on it, so I borrowed a bike. After all, I was the one that insisted on going out for a picnic.”

   “You’re also the one that said we should stop.”

   “True.”

   “So, why…”

   “Does it matter? We have two days left and you need to get to your lessons.”

   “Pah, you’re still the same stubborn, foolish man ever.”

   “Well, that’s not entirely wrong,” Bastian said shamelessly.

   “Is this your way of making up for the nightmare you’ve put me through?”

   “Perhaps.”

   “Why should I accept such kindness?” Odette said, folding her arms, unmoving.

   “Lady Odette, know when its time to yield, now, are you going to get on so we can get you to your classes or are we going to have to disappoint a poor young girl?”

   He was acting the same as when he had trampled her heart, but it did not feel like it had the same sense of humiliation. Perhaps because she had grown accustomed to this man.

   The eyes of the people passing by started to focus on them and giving them funny looks. Odette had no choice but to hop on the bike. As Bastian started pedaling, she screamed a little and held his waist tight.

The bike slowly got faster, moving through the summer field.

Chapter 178.


Beautiful Nightmare.








“Thank you for your understanding, Count Xanders, I will see you next Wednesday?” Odette said. Maximin gave his response and Odette hung up the phone. With that last call, all the scheduled lessons had been postponed for the time being.

   Lets stop. She could hear Bastian’s voice as a soft muffled from the other side of the door. He sounded colder than usual. At that moment, Odette realised this moment of reprieve should not be viewed as mere generosity. 

He would undoubtedly keep his promise. Last nights event should giver her enough assurances. Bastian had prepared well enough for a good farewell and now, so should she.

   Odette left the farm house with a polite bow and a thank you for allowing her to use the telephone. Bastian was already waiting for her at the bicycle, parked under a shady tree.

   She didn’t know what she should feel for the man that had so surreptitiously disturbed her peaceful life, only to satisfy his own greedy desires. She resented him for it, but at the same time she was thankful. Thanks to him, she had the chance to conduct a proper break-up. She decided she was going to be as selfish as he was, letting her heart flow with all the pent up feelings that have been building up over the years.

   “Are we heading to Count Xanders this afternoon, to teach…Alma?” Bastian said, trying to recall the name of his little girl.

   “No, I have rearranged all my appointments,” Odette said, getting on the back of the bicycle.

   “Why?”  Bastian said, frowning.

   Odette looked long and hard into his beautiful, cold eyes, a combination of bright blue eyes and long golden eyelashes. “It's difficult to say, its a personal matter, I suppose.”

   With that poignant response, Bastian laughed. A cheerful and hearty laugh. “I see, than shall I take you home.”

   “Nah, let's go downtown Rothewein. There is a cafe there that sells the most amazing coffee.”

   “But…”

   “I’ll buy lunch and you can get the coffee,” Odette said, wrapping her arms around Bastian’s waist as she climbed onto the seat.

   Although he looked shocked, Bastian pushed off and started peddling toward Rothewein, leaving the village far behind.

   At every cross road they came to, Odette pointed the way, even though Bastian already knew. The fields of brilliant flowers whizzed by them in a blur of vibrant colours. A train sped by them, making Odette bury her face into Bastian’s spine and she tightened her grip. She looked up at the clear, summer sky, sure of her decisions for the first time in a long time.

   After the nice meal at the coffee shop, she planned to enjoy a foamy coffee and a slice of decedent chocolate cake. It was something she had wanted to do with her husband so long ago in Ratz.



They rode the bicycle all the way along the winding path from Rothewein and didn’t stop until they were back outside the stone cottage. Odette gracefully removed herself from the bike and adjusted the folds of her brilliant yellow summer dress. It was new and Odette didn’t want to spoil it with creases.

   “Go on ahead, sister,” Bastian moved the luggage to the porch, then headed back to his parked bicycle.

   “Where are you going?” Odette said as he moved away.

   “I have some business I need to take care of, I will be back before dinner, don’t worry.” 

   “How can you have business here of all places?”

   “I can’t really say, it's top secret,” Bastian said with a sly grin. He got back onto the bike after taking out all their shopping. Odette couldn’t help but chuckle and watch Bastian as he rode away.

   Odette took the groceries inside and reflected on their time in Rothewein. It had been a perfect day. They had lunch at Rothewein’s most famous restaurant and the coffee in the cafe house terrace, which had the best view, would be something she would always remember. Then she went clothes shopping and bought the beautiful summer dress she was now wearing. It was hardly appropriate attire for the country, but she didn’t care.

  After she gathered her thoughts, Odette slipped into comfy clothes and headed to the backyard. She watered the garden and flower beds, doing all the housework she had not had time to do earlier that morning. Turning around, she noticed clothes that seemed freshly washed and hung by Bastian.

Odette gathered the dry laundry and made her way to the room where Bastian was staying.    When she stood in from of his close door, the memory of the other night rushed back to her.

‘What kind of nightmare was tormenting him?’

She turned the doorknob and noticed that everything was still clean and tidy. In a shabby room, there was an old bed and a closet with a broken door. It was to be expected, Bastian was a very organised man. It seemed unnecessary for her to clean anything.

Having folded the laundry, Odette decided to make the bed. It wasn’t until she pulled off the sheets to change them that she noticed a rather large red patch in one corner.

Trace of dried blood.

She stood by the window, staring down at the blood-stained blanket for quite some time. Another memory of the other night suddenly came back to her, flashes of anguished noises and Bastian’s refusal to let her see him.  She knew that it was better not to pry into matters Bastian wanted to keep personal, but she couldn’t help but worry about what had happened that night.

She knew it was better to close her eyes and pretend not to know. However, she chose not to continue the act of being a good wife. Taking the blanket, she returned to the backyard. She meticulously cleaned the stain, being careful not to soak it too much, gave it a good shake, and then hung it on the clothesline.

Odette went back to Bastian's room, quickly rolled up the pillows and sheets, and pulled out the old mat from under the bed. Then, using all her strength, she dragged it out of the room.

Perhaps what she did might cause Bastian more pain, but she had made up her mind. This was her home, and she had every right to make decisions about it. She had a thought, the business of an uninvited guest was none of hers. 

Firm in her decision, she pushed the mat with all her might, crossing the threshold of the bedroom.



His bed disappeared. 

To be accurate, his mat and blanket had vanished. He found this only after he returned to his room after dinner. He did not mention it, only Odette could see a deep sense of embarrassment when he he looked around his room. .

   “I’ve moved your bed,” Odette said and Bastian gave her a grim look.

    “On your own?”

   “Don’t worry, I didn’t touch anything.”

   “Why?”

   “You can come and sleep with me tonight, so you can get a decent nights sleep.”

   Bastian was taken aback and laughed as she spoke.  “Look here, Lady Odette…”

   “I don’t want to go through the same thing that you put me through last night,” Odette said, ignoring Bastian’s protests. “Keeping you by my side might not prevent nightmares, but at least you won’t have to worry.”

"Do you even know what you're talking about?"


"Yes, I know exactly, so you won't have to worry.”

“I’ll get it back.” Bastian said and got up to leave, but Odette was faster and blocked his way out of the dinning room. “Please step aside.”

   “No, Bastian. You have no right.” Odette stood her ground, pouting sternly at Bastian. “I understand that it might be me that is causing your nightmares, but I won't apologise, it's not my fault.”

   “Don’t get pushy, Odette.”

   “If you hate being around me so much, why did you come all the way out here to see me?” Odette said coldly. “Maybe you wish to ease your guilt for the things you did to me, if so, then you have to allow me to handle my feelings my way.”  Bastian stared blankly at the beautiful nightmare before him. Odette’s eyes eyes raged like fierce, blue ocean waves in a tempest. “I will spend the last night with you and if you don’t like that arrangement, then feel free to leave now.”

Bastian let out a long breath. The night had deepened, and outside the window, an all-encompassing darkness blanketed everything.



Bastian was already lying in bed, reading a book. He looked ready for sleep already. When he looked up at her, she turned away quickly and brushed her damp hair. This was her idea, but she felt on edge, while he looked relaxed like the room’s owner. Her worries about what might happen if he chose to leave the house felt useless.

   With a sigh, she sat at her vanity and continued with her bedtime routine. She could see him in the mirror, watched him put down his book and lay his head on the pillow, never taking his eyes from her back.

   Odette checked the tight knot of her gown, suddenly worried about exposing herself to him and then rigorously applied moisturiser to her face. She took a lot longer than usual with the cream and brushing her hair, she was delaying. When she accidentally dropped the lid of the cream, Bastian chuckled and Odette felt a hot flush of embarrassment.

   By the time she was done with brushing her hair dry, Bastian was already asleep. His eyes closed and his chest gently rising and falling. The anxiety melted away and she smiled softly at his calm visage, the floral blanket she had washed pulled up to his chin. Surprisingly,  the flower print suited with him However, she chose to keep it secret, knowing that compliment wouldn't make him happy.

   She turned off the lights and fumbled her way into bed, the sound of night time critters lulling her to sleep, but she couldn’t get to sleep. She tossed and turned several times, and felt sure that she must have woken Bastian up several times. He had not stirred even once, though, didn’t even move or flinch.

   After an hour or so, Odette had reached the limit of her patience. As soon as she lifted the blankets, Bastian opened his eyes. It made Odette jump and she fell on top of him. He let out a grunt as her weight pressed on his chest.

   She could feel his heart racing as they stared into each others eyes in the gloom of the night, celestial radiance the only source of light. In that moment, she felt like she understood why he had come here. 

Pity, guilt, what was she to him in the past? 

The question that had been on the tip of her tongue ever since he showed up.

   Bastian reached out a hand and Odette felt her own heart race, her cheeks became hot, her lips parted. His hand gripped her shoulder, not firm, but delicate and yet, still strong. With absolutely no effort at all, Bastian pushed Odette off of him.

   Am I just some woman you found detestable, but now only pity?

Tather than through words, Odette asked the question with her kiss, seeking the answer in the warmth of Bastian's lips.


Chapter 179.


The end of Disillusionment.








Odette’s kiss sent a wave of emotions through him like the ripples on the surface of a pond. Their lips softly met, warm and inviting, followed by a collective sigh before they tenderly kissed again. He gently closed his eyes and put his hands on her shoulder and pulled her in close. He could smell her sweet scent, feel her warmth and the fierce beating of her heart against his chest.


There was no way this could be a dream. While he was helplessly obsessed with her, a woman he could simply brush away with his fingertips, their awkward kiss,  bit by bit, turned into something far more passionate. After he had taken his fill of her passion, Bastian fought against the temptation and pulled away.

   “Bastian?” Odette said in a whisper and cupped his cheek.

   Reigned, he opened his eyes to look at her, her cheeks flush and her eyes feverish with desire, shimmering in the dark. She leans in and pressed her lips against his again, proving that it was not a desire borne from a momentary lapse in judgement, she wanted this and he gave in to the fervent kissing. He hugged her so tight and kissed her, he felt like he was going to absorb her into himself, and Odette returned his kiss with fervor, breaking down the final barrier between them she had been striving to uphold, as they would become one, two halves making the whole.

 Then, their positions changed. Bastian rolled on top of her, pressing against her soft, delicate frame and she pulled him into her as they kissed. Their breathing became deep and ragged, and sound of kissing underlined their passion. 

Their muffled moans filled the summer night. From her forehead to her nose, then cheek to chin, and finally back to those captivating lips. Bastian kissed every inch of her that he could see, nuzzling into her neck made her gasp in pleasure. His hand came up from her waist, detailing the very fine curves of her waist and all the way to her breast, hiding behind her nightgown. It fit snugly in the palm of his hand as he played with it, feeling her stiff nipple play between his fingers.

   She did not shrink away from him, she did not protest in any way. Her form trembled as she surrendered to the pleasure, looked pitiful, yet beautiful sight. Bastian then started to kiss down her front, taking the nightgown with him, exposing her creamy, silk skin an inch at a time, lacing kisses over every bit of exposed flesh. He moved to climb back on top of her, but the sight of her half-undressed body snapped him to full awareness.

Bastian stopped pulling down her underwear and sat up, taking deep breaths to calm himself. The moonlight cast his shadow over her nakedness. He face was pale, her hair was wild, her chest marked with traces of intense love-making, her lips reddened, and her turqoise eyes, bewildered about why he stopped, glazed over with the heat of the moment, 

   A thought came over him and just as suddenly as his desires came over him, they faded. Bastian wiped his face and turned away from Odette, sitting himself on the edge of the mattress. He could feel her eyes on him, Yet he didn't return her gaze.

   Did she really want this or was she taking pity on him because of what happened last night, with the nightmares? He found it pathetic and sad that her heart would soften toward him so easily. He found himself pathetic for pretending not to know and accept the charity.

She was always showed her weakness so easily, which inadvertently made him see his own. 

   Bastian looked over his shoulder at Odette, the desire still smoldered within him, but a deeper frustration took root in his heart. She was still laying out in her pale nakedness.  Her misaligned nightgown revealed her white shoulders and legs, subtly illuminated by the moonlight.

 She was blinded by pity and he was blinded by her.

How pathetic this love was. Bastian gave a sorrowful laugh at the thought of his tragic love. He gently wrapped the still Odette in a blanket, lifting her with care to place her on the bed.

   “Bastian?” Odette said, grabbing the end of his sleeve as he was about to leave. 

Bastian, his eyes as deep and dark as the night, turned to look at her. 

Perhaps she was looking for some kind of consolation, reassurance that her saintly act was justified. Just like she stood by her bound father and loved her self-centered sister without question. Like she took in and cared a motherless stray dog, and showered her unwanted child with affection.

And now, she's showing the same compassion to him.

   “It's getting late, sister” Bastian calmly removed her hand. 

He had the chance to act on his desires, to be a jerk just this once, because it wouldn't change the outcome. But he didn't want to leave on a sour note, or to be an object of pity. He wanted her to know that he was not parting because of her, and it was the last bastion he wanted to guard.

   “Good night, Miss Marie,” Bastian said,  reminding himself of reality once again before he closed the bedroom door behind him.

The echo of footsteps in the hallway disrupted the tranquil night. Bastian returned to the guest bedroom and picked out a cigarette from the packet discarded on the window sill. He leaned back against the wall, its coolness chilling his back and he let out a rueful smile.

 He was still so very hard, the bulge in his pants was nearly painful in confining his lust. He desperately tried to suck the smoke, but the memory of Odette, devoted herself like an enchanting witch, wouldn't dim.

His mind drift to the feel of her soft skin, the pliability of her breast, the sound of her whispered moans. In the end, Bastian slid his hands into his pants, letting himself give way to his uncontrollable lust. His heart aching with a pain that raged out of control. He tilted his head back, expelling the cigarette smoke he could not bear to hold within. His hand held the burning stick, veins bulging on its back, while the cords in his neck strained.

The rumble of ragged breaths and the squeak of aged floorboards shattered the night silence, much like a pebble disturbing the underwater calm.

 Bastian pursued all the way to the end of his insatiable desire, letting out a moan as his climax wracked his body with spasms, filling the air with the scent of his sordid desire. He took off his pajama, cleaned himself up and relit the cigarette, closing his eyes.

It took some more time before he could properly blow out a cloud of smoke at the moon.



Surprisingly Odette did not feel tired, despite having spent most of the night tossing and turning in her bed. She lay in the dawn light, staring up at the ceiling. She had done something rash and stupid. The embarrassment of it made her cheeks go red, even as she thought how she was going to face Bastian this morning.

   Odette heard Bastian waking up and clamped her eyes shut, like he was going to know that she was awake. She listened to him tidy up the mattress and left her bedroom. She then breathed a sigh of relief when she heard him head out for his morning routine.

   Only then did she slide out of bed, seeing the neatly folded floral-patterned quilt Bastian had left behind, heat once again rose in her cheeks.

 She had done something so crazy, there was no other words for it.

Last night, Bastian returned late and simply went to his own bed as though nothing had happened. His disturbingly normal behaviour once again conveyed a clear message; she was a woman he trampled out of hatred yet he also showed care for out of pity. 

Her meaning to him hadn't changed at all since the past.The realization caused her heart to ache unbearably. But with time, she came to terms with reality and finally understood him.

   Bastian had come here to resolve their issues, to try and forge some sort of satisfying conclusion. He must have felt remorse for the sins committed by his half-brother and stepmother and came to pity the woman he had hated for so long. Odette could understand his reasoning to nullify the engagement with Sandrine, he wasn’t an entirely heartless man and probably didn’t want to drag Sandrine into his drama.

   He tried to atone by committing himself to his work, conducting himself to his duties, but it ultimately led to his destruction once more. Odette could see now that the guild had become a painful shackle. That was why he came back to her. He must believe that a new beginning is the only way to break the chain. Just like she had done once, just like she knew of the shackles that bound them together.

   Odette felt even more ashamed of her actions. They had made progress since his time in Rothewein, she felt they could actually be friends after everything they had done to each other and she tried to push herself onto him. She was ashamed, sure, but she was also able to understand Bastian’s true feelings because of it. She had no regret.

As Odette sought order in her muddled thoughts, the impatient summer sun climbed its zenith. Unwilling to waste another moment, she started the day and bravely went downstairs.

   The idea of having to face Bastian again was daunting, but she knew that she could not simply hide herself away from him. 

He was the man she would say her final goodbye to tomorrow.

She could not let herself get swept up in confused emotions again, so she decided to be even more brazen. There was no point in trying to save face and hold onto dignity. What had happened, happened and it was time to start acting like an adult about it.

So, how should she spend their last day?  As Odette was preparing breakfast, Bastian returned. He jumped over the wall of the back garden and doused himself under the water pump, washing his sweaty face. She suddenly felt ashamed wearing high-neckline blouse that was ill-suited for the sweltering weather. Odette didn’t realise she was staring at his toned physique through the kitchen window until he looked directly at her.

Without any time to look away, their eyes met, their gazes interlocking. Her heart skipped, her desire flowed and her breathing became deep. Memories of that mortifying night, when she'd been left alone to change her damp clothes, flashed across the face of the man who shone as brilliantly as the sun.

Unconsciously, Odette found herself holding her breath. Memories of that mortifying night, when she'd been left alone to change her damp clothes, flashed across the face of the man who shone as brilliantly as the sun.

Understanding the past no longer held any meaning. There were motions beyond empathy and guilt, yet nothing would change their reality. 

She kept questioning herself, Where did her heart truly belong? but the answer eluded her. Suddenly everything was shrouded in a purple fog and just when she thought she was going to suffocate, Bastian simply walked away without doing or saying anything.

   Startled by her childish reaction to seeing Bastian wet body, she shook her head and turned away from the window. Still flustered though, she tried to turn the sausages and flip the eggs. The doorbell made her jump and she was glad for the distraction.

   “I’m sorry for coming by so early, Miss Marie,” said the village teachers wife when Odette opened the door.

   “No, not at all. Is there something the matter?”

   “I need to go into Rothewein, to attend a school committee meeting. Unfortunately, Mrs Schiller, who had said she could look after the kids while I was away, just called to tell me she has the flu. Would you mind helping me out? I’m so sorry its last minute, but could you? Only until 3.” She said as repeatedly checked her wristwatch.  She seemed very busy.

“If your cousin feel uncomfortable, you can refuse….” 

“It's fine,” Bastian spoke for her when Odette didn’t know what to say, "It would be my pleasure to repay your kindness for lending me your bicycle," he said in warm and gentle voice.

   “Oh my, Mr. Lovis, you are too kind.” The teacher smiled brightly as if she had won the lottery. 

   “Er, yes, just like my cousin, I'm happy to be able to help. We've always owed you so much.” Odette said with a kind smile. Fortuitously, this meant they would avoid an uncomfortable, stifling atmosphere.

The teacher departed, bubbling with excitement, promising to return with the children in two hours.

   Odette excused herself and returned to the kitchen, continuing with her meal preparations. She ignored Bastian's gaze trailing after her.

The breakfast will need to be hearty if they were going to be looking after kids all day.

Chapter 180.


Until the Endpoint.








As soon as the trio of kids arrived, laughter and chatter filled the quiet house.

Bastian watched the mess form quickly. It reminded him a little of the battlefield, with how quickly things get turned on its head. The two young boys sped around the house like frustrated colts and took them less than an hour to turn the house into a mess. The carpets were all covered in dirt, cupboards and drawers were turned out of their contents as the boys explored with insatiable curiosity. The worst of it all, the youngest burst into tears when ever he saw Bastian.

   “This will not do,” Odette said, comforting the child in her arms. She remained surprisingly calm through it all.

   The two boys resorted to their favourite pass time, arguing with each other and wresting on the floor. They tussled over toys on the carpet, like a couple of fighting ferrets.

   “Could you take them outside?” Odette said to Bastian as she passed the two brothers. 

   “Where?” Bastian asked with a puzzled look. The youngest looked up at him and started bawling her eyes out again.

   “Huweee…” she wailed and stretched out her tiny, handpointing at bastian. “Lion.” Odette immediately tried to comfort the child, burying her deep in her embrace.

   “What does she mean?”

   “She means you look like a lion and it scares her,” Odette said with a chuckle, the timid youngest child was fearful of the unfamiliar towering man.

   “Take the other two outside, throw a ball around, splash in some water or something, I don’t know. I will look after this one.” Odette said, pointing to the stream beyond the window, “Oh, come on, Bastian.” 

   The two eldest boys followed after Bastian without any issues, they were not like the youngest, they did not think Bastian was all that scary. As soon as Bastian was out of sight, the youngest stopped crying and Odette gently rocked her in her arms. She drifted off to sleep quite quickly and as gently as she could, laid her down on the sofa.

   Once the girl was settled, she went to the kitchen window and caught the feeling that she was in a strange dream. She watched the three of them kick a ball about . One one of them kicked the ball so hard that it landed in the stream, Bastian did not hesitate in rolling up his trouser legs and wading in after it. He was generally a wait and see type of person, but when one of the kids wanted something, he did not hesitate to oblige. She had never seen this side of him before.

   Coming out of the water with a smile on his face, he barely seemed to notice that he was soaked and carried on kicking the ball with the others. He kept up with the children’s hectic pace. It seemed to be his natural talent given he likely had no prior experience with childcare.

   She couldn’t take her eyes off Bastian, who was smiling like a fresh spring morning. It wasn’t until her eyes started to hurt from staring so long that she suddenly realised the identity of her sorrow.  They could have had a life like this, together. If only they weren’t so foolish. If only life hadn't been so ruthless. If only fortune's goddess had bestowed them with a single, kindly smile.

   Shards of regret struck at her heart. The child that was supposed to come into the world with the summer had fallen asleep in an eternal winter. Watching Bastian playing with the boys made her realise what she had lost.

   As Odette turned away from the window, unable to bare the pain any longer. The youngest of the three children was standing in the entrance to the kitchen.

   “Mommy!”

Her heart tripped over itself when the child called out. Perhaps it would have been more bearable to linger in the awkward silence..but ...there was no turning back, just like the countless thoughtless decisions she made in the past.

Gathering her emotions, Odette drew the curtain and turned around to approach the child



As lunch time approached, the children started to lose their spirit. Bastian arrived home with the two boys, weary from playtime. As he stepped inside, he found a worn-out Odette, snoozing on the couch and lovingly embracing their littlest one.

Bastian climbed the stairs to the second floor, carrying the two boys on his shoulders. He gently placed them onto his sleeping mat in Odette's room, after that changed his clothes, then made his way downstairs to prepare meal. 

Just as he reached the first floor heading for the kitchen, he bumped into the youngest child who had just woken up. She looked at Bastian with dreamy eyes and gave a surprised gasp, shrinking back in alarm. Before the child could make any noise, however, Bastian plucked up a doll from the floor and handed it to her. And for the first time, she smiled at him.

   “What time is it?” Odette asked, stirring from her shallow nap.

   “About one,” Bastian said after checking his watch. He set the toy aside and took a seat at the sofa.

   Odette did her best to sit up a little straighter. There was an affectionate warmth in her eyes as she looked down at the child. Perhaps it's because her motherly love, why the children followed her so willingly. The sudden thought that she'd make an incredible mother coaxed a painful smile from him.

   “I should go and prepare lunch, would you mind looking after the child?” She said, gently easing the child into her arms so that she could lift her off.

   “Me, that kid?”

   “You’ll be fine, she’s not dangerous and I think this one has gotten used to you,” Odette said, placing the complaining child into his arms and leaving for the kitchen. "Look, She laugh at you.” 

 After teaching him how to care for the child, Odette hurried to the kitchen. Bastian looked down at the child, who was looking right back up at him, her little eyes wide and trying to work things out. She looked about the room for Odette and when she couldn’t find her, Bastian could see she was about to let out the tears. He tried to entice her with various toys and teddies, but nothing was working, so he held her tight and carried her to the kitchen where Odette was preparing a late lunch.

   Once the child saw Odette, she calmed a little and Odette stroked her forehead. “I’m just making us some lunch, okay, so be good for Uncle Bastian.”

  This seemed to do the trick as the child calmed and accepted Bastian a little better. He took the child out into the garden and she became quite chatty.

   “Flower,” she said, pointing to the flower bed. Bastian laughed and picked the flower she pointed to. One bunch. Another bunch.  Her smile, blooming with each gifted flower, made it seem as if she held the entire world in her tiny hands.

Bastian stared down at the child holding a hand full of colorful flowers, without realising he was smiling. His mind drifted to the spring, when he expecting to be a father himself and the unexpected event of having to bury his own child in amongst the flowers.

He opened my eyes and saw the child's brightly shining eyes looking at him. Silently, she reached out, tracing a tender path down his cheek.

   “Come get your lunch,” Odette called out of the kitchen window.

   Bastian knew he was going to remember this day for as long as he lived, the perfect imitation of a happy life, with a happy wife and happy children. It was both a blessing and maybe a curse.



The children’s mother returned earlier than expected and Odette saw them off, waving to them as they walked down the garden path. 

"Bye-bye!" Bastian only flashed a smile when the child in his mother's arms gently waved at him.

“Would you like to stay for tea?” he suddenly asked as she turned around. Odette looked at him like he was a stranger. She understood and respected his choice, an ending she had fervently hoped for. Yet, she found herself grappling with a sense of emptiness she couldn't understand

   “Oh no, I can’t, I am far too tired, I will end up falling asleep on the couch.”

   Odette was half relieved that she could not stay, she too was tired and fancied taking a quick nap before dinner. With excuses made and the neighbours going their separate ways, Odette climbed the stairs to her bedroom. She laid out on the bed without even trying to take off her day dress and closed her eyes, but she couldn’t relax, her nerves were only growing sharper.

   They finally snapped when she heard banging coming from the back garden. Frustrated, Odette threw herself off the bed and went to the back window to see Bastian, with tools laid out, hammering away at the old, rickety garden table. It was always hidden under a table cloth, but he had noticed that it needed a lot of care and attention.

   She was grateful that he would take the time to fix her garden furniture, but every time she heard the sound of the hammer hitting wood, her heart leapt in her chest. With each hammer strike, with each time her heart jumped, she could feel her broken hearts resolve and she knew the ugly truth. 

Like it or not, Bastian Klauswitz was the first man in her life. 

Every 'first' she had experienced was with him. She was certain those memories would remain, indelible and enduring, despite their parting.

   She thought she wanted to cover up the scarred beginning with a convenient lie. Even if it was a shallow self-deception, it would be okay, he would have his child as part of his revenge and she could get away, having served her purpose. It was better that then remaining with him as a pitiful woman.

   She realised that she wanted him to desire her, not pity her and that was the reason last night was so awkward. Odette’s feet moved on their own accord and did not stop until she was standing in the back garden. Bastian had finished mending the table and chairs and was not working on the water pump.

   “Will you stop,” Odette ordered. Bastian froze mid motion and looked at her with confusion wrinkling his forehead. “I don’t want traces of you left behind, so please stop and just leave things alone.”

   “What? Okay, I wasn’t after any gratitude, sister,” Bastian said indifferently and continued greasing the pump mechanism.

 She roughly grabbed his wrist,  “You really shouldn’t.”

   “Don’t get pushy.”

   “If you really want to pity me, then just give me money or something. There is no need to fix anything, there are workmen in the village that will be glad of the work… ”

   Vang! The pump suddenly exploded and a spray of water gushed out into Bastian’s face.

   “See why you’ve gone and done, leave it.”

   Bastian sputtered as he tried to tighten the screw. Slowly, the jet of water slowed to a gush, then a trickle. Odette, who was also drenched, ran back into the kitchen. Bastian followed after her once the flow of water stopped. Odette was leaning against the kitchen counter, working a tea towel through her hair and glared at him.

   “Don’t pity me,” Odette said at just short of a shout.

   “Pity?”

   “Isn’t this enough?” she asked, her eyes going red. “Don’t make me feel even more pitiful.” Her pleading made her voice tremble.

   Bastian chuckled, who here was really behaving like they were giving alms to a beggar? It was amusing to see Odette behaving so absurdly, but what was funnier was that all of his senses were directed toward her.


Pity.

   The smell of her was strong because of how damp she was and the soaked dress clung to her curves, giving just enough of a hint to her nakedness to rouse his spirit. Recalling the events of last night made him short of breath.

After all I've done to protect you.-He resented her for pushing him away, but he still loved her.

   Bastian felt the mad desire to vent his frustrations, unable to cope any longer with a wounded heart. He didn’t need to think to understand it.

   “I think you might have misunderstood something,” Bastian said as he approached Odette, stopping only when he was in front of her. “Do you want me to show you what being pitied really looks like?” Even in his mocking tone, his eyes were soft and warm.

   Odette held back the tears by throwing her arms around him and forcing her lips onto his deeply. Their breath mingles, their tongues danced around each other, their bodies became one.

   Neither of them could resist any longer. Bastian scooped Odette up in his arms and began to climb the stairs. The old stairs groaned under their weight, the noise mingling with their uneven breaths. Odette clung to him, like ivy to a sturdy wall, her eyes tightly shut.

Just as Bastian said that he would go to the end, she also wanted to be there with him at that endpoint.

For it was only after reaching the depths, that they could truly rise anew.

Chapter 181.
So, Sincerely.








Driven by some unseen desire, the securely shut door of the room swung open once more. Bastian crossed the bedroom and he dropped her onto the bed. The firm grip of Odette’s arms around his neck pulled him down after her.

 Their entwined bodies tumbled onto the bed, stirring dust that danced in the golden afternoon sunlight filling the room. Odette looked at him, there was ravenous hunger in his eyes, like a famished beast that left her breathless.

   You will regret this. A voice played in Odette’s mind. The warning came from reason that she could barely hear any more. It didn’t seem to matter, their relationship was stained with a hundred other mistakes, what’s one more?

   Odette gave in to her lust and stretched her arms out above her head, giving herself to him freely. She hugged him and kissed him deeply, revelled in the feel of Bastian on top of her, pressing into her hips, caressing her waist. It was a declaration that she was going to hurt him and that he could hurt her.

His kiss deepened with a fierce passion, their tongues intertwining in a heated dance. Their breaths, warm and intertwined, became indistinguishable from one another.

   Odette clung to him as their desire reached a critical point, their hearts captivated by an unfamiliar thrill. As his hand gently cupped her cheek, fingers brushing through her hair, she let out a soft moan and their breathing grew more intense.

   Bastian pushed himself up, lowered his suspenders and pulled of his wet shirt, while Odette practically ripped off her dress and bra. Before a hint of embarrassment could surface, they were lost in another fervent kiss. She surrendered to his embraces, each touch igniting her senses. His intensity grew, a wild passion in his movements, but Odette found herself not wanting to run away. 

His lips trailed down the back of her neck, gently biting her breast. Shivering at the sensation, Odette clutched his shoulder for support.

   Each kiss made her twitch and she moaned, feeling her breathing becoming deeper and more rapid. When his head moved down between her thighs and he kissed her on her most sensitive area, she heard a voice whimpering, but quickly realised it was her own voice, lost in the pleasure of his tongue delving into her.

Her skirt was smoothly removed, and her panties had vanished, leaving her exposed. Odette's misty eyes fluttered open to see Bastian atop her naked body. His sun-kissed, scar-marked body was like a majestic ruin –marked by life's trials, yet still strong and beautiful.

Suddenly, Odette found herself wondering how she looked like in Bastian's eyes. When they had mated like wild animals,  she had avoided this thought. Was she, in his view, merely a woman destined to fulfil a duty of revenge, bearing his child? The question now lingered in her mind, unbidden yet insistent.  

There was a moment when she lost in his gaze. Her heart ached, still, she couldn't tear her eyes away from him. She didn't even know what she was searching for in his eyes - just like now.

Bastian leaned down, pressing another kiss in her private part. Odette shook her head, gently held his face in her hands. “Bastian…” she moaned, brushing her fingers through his hair. 

Bastian stopped his touch and looked at her, his eyes filled with lust, but also a tenderness that she had never seen before. 

In his eyes sparkled a warmth reflecting his deep affection – he saw in her the warmth of a dog, the woman he loved, and the family and children he had built with her.

Theodora's voice, echoing the dreams he deeply yearned for but had forever lost, still rang in his ears. Perhaps his stepmother was the one who truly understood him the most in this world. It was this understanding that gave her the power to shatter him so completely.

But then, Bastian, what have you got? 

In Odette's quiet gaze, Bastian could read that cruel question. And in the silence that followed, the answer was easy to find.

Nothing.


He finally found the elusive answers he'd been seeking. His desire of becoming a good man, even at the last minute, fell apart into nothingness. The only thing he had left was himself, a man that was as pitiful as she was.

 He turned toward the window, to a stream of sunlight piercing through the crack and felt a sense of deep shame. 

There was a hatred in his heart for this unstoppable desire, even at this moment. He wanted to plunge into the abyss, to be a hot beast with no hope of anything. It was better to remain an immoral scoundrel for the rest of his life if he could not end it.

   “Bastian?”

His beautiful siren sang her song again. Bastian turned back to her and kissed her deeply as he spread her legs and felt him plunge deep inside her opened body.  

The sound of the outside world, which Odette had forgotten in the excitement, came rushing back to her. The sound of children playing, the conversations of those walking down the road.  The everyday sounds of chatter and laughter from passersby and the birds singing in the tree branches, mingled with the moans that slipped from her lips. 

Her vision blurred as Bastian reached the deepest part of her. Odette fought to keep her moans quiet as their entwined bodies shook. She tried to call out to him, but Bastian was lost in the passion of their kiss, capturing her lips and every whisper of sound she made. Each of his thrust sent shivers through her, making the old bed creak and groan as if it might break apart.

Odette surrendered to his violence in her bittersweet illusion. She felt dizzy, unable to gather her scattered senses.



“Bastian.”

   His name spilled out of her lips in between her breathless moans and blending with his panting. 

Odette gently unwrapped her arms from Bastian's sweaty back and covered her face, struggling to look at him as he avoided her gaze. 

After suckling on her tits like a nursing babe, Bastian slowly sat up. His expression was one of deep pleasure, but his eyes were distant and calm. With every breath, the veins in his neck throbbed noticeably.

“Bastian, I, ah… … .” Odette wanted to say that she couldn’t take any more, but he grabbed her wide open legs and plunged so deep inside her. 

Her mind went suddenly blank. She trembled even harder as his actions became wilder.The sound of wet flesh pounding against one another was all that could be heard every time he thrust into the deepest part of her.

Odette caught up in the overwhelming flow of pleasure and felt helpless. She tried to stifle the sound by biting her lips, but her soft moans still escaped, drowning out the noise coming from outside the window. She was lost in the throws of shame and pleasure. At once, pushing him away, but wanting him close. She kissed him, scratched him, dug her nails into his back.

 Bastian let her rudeness but never once looked at her, he either nuzzled into her neck, looked down at her swollen breasts or looked up at some distant point. The colder he ignored her, the more her lust grew, leaving Odette in a state of confusion, just like those nights of humiliation all over again, where she felt like a rotten piece of meat.

A bell chimed in the distance, heralding the coming of night.  Through the gaps in the curtains, a gentle golden light bathed the two nude lovers lying on the bed. They moved together in an intense beat, as if engaged in a fierce dance of battle, their kisses were wild, full of intimacy and intoxicating warmth.


Odette pressed her lips fiercely against his face, holding him tightly.  “Bastian, I… don’t like it.” she said, a single word that stood contrast to her gesture that was passionately devouring him. 

Bastian immediately lowered his gaze when he heard her whisper and realised what he'd done.


  “Don’t do that, I don’t like it,” Odette said, she cupped his cheeks using all her will to stop him from looking away.  A bitter smile appeared on Bastian's lips as he realised the meaning hidden behind her gaze.


“I…ah… … !”


Without warning, Bastian wrapped his arms around her and picked her up. The thrill sent a spasm through her and she squealed and wrapped her arms around his neck, clinging tightly to him. He pulled the hairpin out of her dishevelled hair and threw it away. Again, he began thrusting in earnest, shaking Odette with all his might, as if to break her. 

Her loose hair slid down her white, trembling back like wild black waves. With panting breaths and sobbing sounds that could be heard between her moan, Odette leaned against Bastian's shoulders, solid as armour. She struggled to lift her head to look at him. But she persisted, even though she felt helpless with the huge difference in strength between them.

   The thrill of those cold blue eyes on her turned to anger. Bastian grabbed a bunch of her hair in his fist and pushed, making her head lean back to face the bed once more. 

 “Please, Bastian!” Odette hit him mercilessly, shoving him and twisting her body against him. “Please…"

Bastian stopped when her plea came between sobs. He understood that she was never going to give up, so let her go and gave her a cheeky smile. Odette looked at him furiously and pounced on him, her fists pounding his shoulders and chest as they went. 

Now Odette was on top, she was in control and Bastian could do nothing but succumb to the unrelenting force that was now unleashed.

   She bent down and pressed his shoulder firm.  “Look at me,” she demanded, Bastian did not resist. “Look at me, Bastian.” She swallowed her tears and begged hatefully.


Bastian opened his eyes and stared into those turquoise eyes swollen with tears.  Her eyes were like mirrors, baring the depths of his soul that raged within. Those eyes made him uneasy as they touched upon the deepest and inescapable parts of him.

As the light slowly dimmed, they found themselves locked in a tender, wordless gaze.

 She stared into his deep blue eyes, filled with her reflection. They were like pools of calm water, there was no trace of contempt or hatred, neither compassion or pity. They were merely cool and soft like evening summer. The longing look, the tender gaze she had yearned for. Like a shimmering oasis in the midst of a parch desert, the eyes that seemed like the beautiful illusion of the past

What emotion came before feelings like pity and hatred?

 Even though their relationship was entirely contractual, there were moments when Bastian looked at her like this. 

It felt genuine…filled with both hope….and despair. 

Odette's confusion grew. Between them there was a dialogue of unspeakable feelings, unspeakable grief mixed with hidden joy, deep shame mixed with unfulfilled desires. These strong emotions made heat of emotion coursing through her, she felt her already flushed face grow even hotter.

   “It looks like you don’t hate it any more,” Bastian chuckled, holding her waist as she tried to move away.

"Ah..." Odette looked down.  Looking at her, it wasn't hard to guess what was making her stomach feel hot and flushed. The same hot sensation was also running through her bottom,

“Shall we continue, sister?” He said and Odette became astutely aware that he was still inside her.

 “Don’t call me that,” she said, flushing with embarrassment. Bastian smiled at her and lifted her up.

   “Then, Miss Byller?”

   Odette moaned softly as he moved hips, testing the pressure of him pushing against the inside of her stomach. She could already feel her consciousness fade as the mix of him looking up at her with his curious smile, and the feel of his hardness pushing her open.

   “Odette…” She had the words out of her mouth as she twisted her waist. Bastian remained silent, even though their bodies were intertwined. Odette. The name, which came out as she struggled to breathe, made she felt more confused. “I-I don’t know.” Odette shook her head slightly. “I don't know what I should do? ”

Odette' face flushed up to her ears and neck. Bastian was puzzled by her question at first. Then he burst out laughing and wiped her sweaty brow.

The memories he was creating were turning into wounds that never quite healed. But he was willing to try and accept that it hurt.  He didn't mind waking up each morning with the taste of lost on his lips.

He didn’t want to be the one to win in this game of love.

It was his most sincere heart that Theodora did not know about, and perhaps she did not even know about it. 

He pursued the sweet sensuality within her. Like watching an elegant dance, it was at once  wickedly  seductive and radiantly beautiful. 

The harsh breathing and moaning between them grew louder as the sounds of their flesh collided faster and faster. Odette, at the end of her tether, collapsed into Bastian's arms. Lovingly, Bastian kissed her messy hair, then sat up to hold her, biting her flushed cheeks. Odette trembled at his touch, there was confusion on her adorable face. 

The violent shaking of the bed and the creaking of the old floorboards added a dramatic undertone to their love making scene, their sounds blending with the crescendo of their climactic moans.

Bastian never looked away from his enchanting siren, singing like a beautiful sunrise. His heart, like that of a shipwrecked ship, had found its place of rest.

It was a sweet surrender, a victory in the guise of defeat.

Chapter 182.

Night Lover.










The sun was long set when they curled up in each others arms, the pale moonlight acted as their lullaby, cradling them in it's light, setting their drowsy minds to sleep. But sleep never came to them for long.

Odette slowly lifted her heavy lids,  and became capture by  Bastian's  blue eyes, which sparkled like the ocean in the darkness - alive with emotion that spoke more than words ever could. He began to move his hips to and fro, his body rocked hers like a tidal wave lapping against the shore; and she moved with him, feeling her muscles ache to move.

The ethereal glow of the moon shone through the window as the night grew darker and darker. They would shuffle a little when arms got tired,  they would pause for moments, just to stare lovingly into each others eyes or share a fleeting kiss. Time seemed to stand still in this moment, for all sense and notion of reality faded away- leaving only them in the blissful eternity on the bed.

The self-loathing that usually crowded her thoughts after a night of intimacy was absent this time around. She felt her heart swell with a passion that made her entire body tingle. She was taken in an embrace of genuine longing, reveling in the warmth of Bastian's touch.

His strong and sturdy shoulders held her as if they were meant to be together forever. Hot desire rushed through her veins like a raging river. Her breath shuddered and her eyes blurred as she felt their bodies meld into one.

“Ah!” Her breath caught in her throat, and her eyes flickered between his shoulders and her trembling white legs before finding his again which were full of burning lust. Every motion he made inside her surged through her core, it seemed to compose the crescendo of an emotional and physical symphony;- pleasure intensified until it tipped into pain.

"Please," Odette pleaded, her voice desperate.

Bastian leaned in, cradling her in his arms as he tenderly kissed her salty cheeks, touching her in all the places that made her quiver. Her slender arms wrapped around his neck tightly, her fingers slid through his damp, sweat-laden hair, pulling him closer until their lips were connected and sank deeper into passionate kiss that seemed to last forever.

Odette was consumed with passion as their kiss heightened. The bed sheets twisted and tangled around them as their legs intertwined. She was feeling rushed to finish their lovemaking. Yet, as she moved, Bastian pulled her down onto the floor.

Surrendering to the moment she tried to hold herself back from the pleasure building within her. Bastian sat before her, his sculpted form was illuminated by the silvery moonlight cascading through the window. His piercing gaze never left her, eyes cold yet ablaze with unseeing lust, eyes that was both familiar yet unknown to her. She had once been captivated by those eyes, once she used to crave, but now, all they brought was a feeling of terror within her.

Desperately, she had thrown everything, wishing for the perfect ending to their story. But now her confusion grew with every passing moment. She began to wonder, was their time together merely an illusion?

She realised his current action, fuelled by lone purpose, just like those times when he had caused her the greatest pain, nevertheless, she also knew that he wasn't the same man from those darkest of nights any longer.

Why? 

The unanswered questions of her heart became an unbearable weight. In that moment, Bastian reached his peak, releasing it outside of her. He groaned, cries of pleasure poured out of him in torrents and raw ecstasy. With that apex moment, he'd drawn the definitive line between them. The white, creamy proof of his desire, splattered on her sweat-glistened skin, served as undeniable proof of the boundary he made.

Perhaps, this was the answer she sought all along.

Bastian took a few moments to compose himself and rose from the floor. Odette, too drained to even lift a finger, could only watch as he went. Moonlight cascaded over his strong silhouette as he walked towards the bathroom. After what felt like minutes, he returned to the bed with a towel in hand.

Odette opened her eyes slowly, watching him tenderly wipe away sheen of sweat from her face and neck before moving down to her chest, tenderly caressing her as he cleaned away all the evidence of their lovemaking. She gasped softly as he slowly parted her trembling legs. He chuckled as his hand continue to softly caress her delicate thighs with the towel.

The window was a glassy canvas of beautiful roses, a gentle breeze drifted in, bringing with it the fresh, sweet scent of the blossoms and soft serenade of crickets and frogs in the warm summer night.

Bastian sat on the edge of the bed, his eyes tender and calm, without any blatant desire that left her feeling both puzzled and oddly content. The towel had come all the way down to her toes, and in that moment she felt cradled by his unwavering gaze.

Her finally found answer was, once again, deemed incorrect.

Why?

Odette grabbed his arm, her eyes silently conveying a question. Bastian returned her stare before climbing back onto the bed and softly running his fingers through her wild locks. He closed the gap between them as he leaned in, giving her a sweet kiss, like a couple birds sharing a loving peck.

His lips tenderly moved across her forehead, the curves of her nose, and the hollows of her cheeks before tenderly finding its way to her chest. Odette weakly wrapped her arms around him, drawing him closer as he kissed her neck. His body still radiated heat, his scent of warm sunshine filled her senses, gently cascading down her soul. She felt every inch of him - even the storied scars on his back - as she caressed it with loving care, before her eyes drifted shut, finally falling into to tender serenity.|



It was just after 10 pm when Bastian awoke and knew he could not get back to sleep. Odette lay beside him, so still that it seemed like she had fainted rather than simply drifted off. He rolled out of bed, glanced around the room at all the strewn clothing, found his trousers, and the floral blanket near them. He picked it up, and carefully draped it over her.

Bastian hurriedly tidied up the bed room, threw on a shirt and a pair of trousers without taking any time to make himself look presentable. He went downstairs and stepped outside into the garden. The scent of the surrounding trees filled his nose with fresh aromas.

   Bastian sat in the chair he had repaired the day before and lit a cigarette. The military car was due to arrive at 9 o'clock the next morning, which would be his last goodbye to Odette. This is how it was meant to be; this is how it was always supposed to end.

A smile spread across Bastian’s face as he watched the smoke of his cigarette disperse in the air. Since there was no warning from the navy base, it seemed that the operation would continue ahead as arranged. The war could not be avoided and while this was something he dreaded, he had done all he could to make sure Odette would be safe if the worst happened.

Putting out his cigarette, Bastian heaved a sigh, banishing any concerns of Odette's potensial danger as he went into the kitchen to make some dinner. With haste, he assembled a simple feast - a carafe of water, an assortment of succulent fruits, a loaf of freshly baked bread, and a generous spread of butter, complemented by a selection of delectable chocolates and confections for Odette who like sweets.

When he finished preparing the meal, suddenly memories of their last night together when they shared a special moment experiencing their unborn child’s first movements arose in his mind. But too soon, those precious memories faded as he sealed the cupboard door shut and clicked off the kitchen lights.

Bastian returned to his bedroom, where Odette had remained perfectly still since he'd left. He set the tray down on the nightstand and switched on the lamp beside it. “Odette,” he called her. She stirred and grumbled softly. Bastian helped her sit up against the headboard of the bed, then gave her a glass of refreshing water.

"....It's still Tuesday." she mumbled, checking the time. “What is that?”  her attention  turned away from the clock on the table, landing on the tray.


“The last supper.” Bastian laughed, bringing the tray over to the bed. 

It slipped Odette's mind that they hadn't eaten dinner that day. What a shame; She had gone through so much trouble to make this meal special, choosing a menu and getting the groceries days ahead of time, picking out the decorations and selecting her outfit for the night. But instead of enjoying her home-cooked dinner, Bastian had slapped together some questionable food on the ugliest plate she had ever seen. She still had some leftover meat pies from when she made lunch for the kids earlier that day, but it seemed he didn’t know where to find the leftovers, so he grabbed whatever he could find on the counter.

It was already too late to start cooking, So Odette thought that she could make the table setting nicer, but Bastian shut down her idea. "No. It's already quite late."

“There is other food. I can heat it up easily, so it’s quick….”

“No, Odette, this is fine,” Instead, he brought her to the bed and made her sit down. When the blanket fell off, her naked body was revealed in the warm light of the lamp and she blushed. She quickly covered her breasts with her arms and motioned for him to move to the table by the window.

"Let's go over there." After Bastian moved the tray aside, Odette asked him again, "Could you grab my pajamas from the dressing table?"

With a smile, Bastian fetched the pajamas draped over the chair. "Well, I rather like your current outfit."

"I don't want to attend the Last Supper looking like a barbarian."

"Then how about taking off our clothes and calling it a heavenly feast?"  Bastian teased her as he handed over the pyjamas. His boyish charm just seemed to increase with that little grin.

"I refuse such an extravagant thing." Odette smiled warmly as she declined Bastian's offer, dressed in her pyjamas. But when he scooped her up in a playful gesture, she decided to let him carry her to the window-side table. He set her down with gentle care and adjusted the hem of her pyjamas before taking the seat opposite.

If only life had been kinder to him, he would be the most incredible man—but life had proven to be cruel sometimes.

“Odette,” Bastian said sweetly, pulling her out of the confusion of her thoughts.

 As she turned, he gifted her with a warm smile. Somehow she could see why Sandrine found him so irresistible. Through her eyes, Bastian must have always been such an enchanting lover.

Their relationship, born from a contract, was torn apart by betrayal and hate. Now they were two lovers destined to part once more, it was an irony not lost on her.  Nonetheless, there was no other option but to keep going.

Odette made up her mind to see it through till the very end. Even if it was his final act of kindness towards her, the woman he once pitied and now saw her as his nightmare. After three long years, what difference would one extra day make?

 Odette tidied her hair and stood upright; then, she smiled at him with more brilliance than ever before. A smile meant only for her one-night lover, gleaming brightly in spite of their their tangled past.

Chapter 183.
May It Be beautiful.



Their last supper together went on until close to midnight. The meal prepared was a bit of a random assortment of whatever Odette could find, but it was more than enough; Bastian finished every bite on his plate. Even Odette ate heartily - having her fill of bread and water, and even savoring the apple Bastian shared with her, followed by the juicy orange that made her fingers sticky.

"Let me get it." Without hesitation, Bastian went to the dressing table  and fetched Odette a napkin. “How did you know where they were?” Odette said.

  Bastian looked at her with a sly smile, “You always kept them in the left drawer by the sink.” He cut open another apple and gave it to her.

   Odette realised that although they had been a pretend couple, they had still lived their lives together, and got to know each other as if they were truly married. She had to keep reminding herself that they were not a proper couple.

   Odette looked at Bastian with a new attentiveness and realised she knew very little about him. He was eating his apple while looking at the night sky outside the window. Did he like apples? Although she had no idea of the answer, she had never cared much about what Bastian ate or anything that he liked.

    She looked at the apples in her hand, succumbing to overwhelming emotion as tears rolled down her cheeks. Apples were always her favorite, just like the chocolate he had brought on the tray. These things would not have been known unless he had been. Bastian always paid attention to her habits, her likes and dislikes, something even Tira and her parents hadn't noticed in twenty years of living together. Somehow, it seemed that no one was able to take care of her. Because taking care of her was her job.

   But Bastian did.

   “You said you missed me, that’s why you came, right?” Odette said with trembling lips when their gazes collided in the moonlight.  

   “Yes, that’s right,” Bastian said, leaning deeply into the backrest, capturing her in his calm gaze.

   “I don’t understand, why would you miss this poor woman? Why would you go to so much trouble for someone that has been nothing but a nightmare for you? Why are you doing this? I don’t understand, Bastian, it all feels like a lie.” Odette conveyed her true feelings. “If you miss me enough to want to get me back, then I am not your nightmare. Which one is the lie?"

 She imagined standing in front of the locked door again. She wanted to knock on the door with all her might, in hope that somebody might open it from the inside.She wanted to go beyond that door. She wanted to know about the man bleeding alone there.

   “Well, it must be the same situation as with your sister, Tira.” A chilling smile spread over Bastian’s lips. “You loved Tira enough to dedicate your life to her, but after you allowed her to fly free, you were relieved, right? I think all of that was your true feelings.” Bastian’s voice was calm and gentle, without a hint of intimidation. “My heart feels the same, Odette. It's painful to look at you, but my heart knows what it wants, I still miss you.  I wanted to take responsibility for my mistakes. But when I see you happy after leaving me, I feel relieved. I think I can wake up from this nightmare now. I mean it, Odette.”

The wobbly door was now sealed shut, with a thick nail to hold it closed.

   Odette swallowed what she wanted to say and turned away. Tira. The name was like a scar from a knife that heated her cheeks. The woman that had been bondaged to her, who she loved, but at the same time was overwhelming and tiresome. The departure from Tira was a relief, especially so when Tira had gone to find her own happiness, and while Odette was undoubtedly sad, on the other hand, it was a strange kind of relief.

So I was Tira…to you….

 Odette felt like she had been stripped bare and laid out for Bastian to see, but he had always been able to see her, while she remained blinded to him by hatred.

She slowly munched on her apple before unwrapping the chocolate bar. Just as she took a bite of it, Bastian knelt in front of her and rolled up the hem of her nightgown, gently taking her foot into his hand. 

"It's okay, Bastian. It's all healed now!” 

Bastian didn’t answer. He unwrapped the bandage, carefully examined her ankle. He felt relieved when he saw that all the swelling had gone. Then his blue eyes moved up, following the line of bruising, up to her thigh where faint impressions of bitemarks could be seen. She was a woman that bruised easily, he knew that, but he could not hold back. He could feel the urges even now.

"Ah..."  Odette let out a soft moan as Bastian bowed his head and kissed her ankle, then up along her calf, kissing every bruise and blemish. To her knee. His large hand stroked along her soft skin, quickly followed by a kiss, until he was moving along her thick thigh.

      Odette let out an embarrassed whimper and tried to push him away, but it was no use. He had already reached his goal and all she could do was endure the pleasure-pain that struck her like lightning. Her breath got quicker and her moans louder as she struggled against him. Trapped between him and the chair, she found herself helplessly captivated by the pleasure of his touch.

The hands that were trying so hard to push him away now pulled him in closer. Passion mixed with a sense of deep shame caused her reason to be overridden as she clutched the hem of her nightgown that had risen up around her waist. Her other hand tangled in his hair, while her face almost seemed like it might cry and flushed with a vivid rose color that not even the darkness could hide.

 The sensation was so remarkable that she recoiled at the slightest touch of his breath. She screamed out in bliss as the orgasm hit her. When it was over, Bastian finally lifted his head to look at his wife trembling above him. His lips and nose were wet and glinted in the light of the moon.

Their eyes locked together and a hint of smile crept upon his face. With her dignity and pride gone, Odette took off her nightgown with trembling hands and gently cupped his cheeks. The silhouette of the curtains billowed in the wind behind them, casting their shadows across the room as they stared into each other's eyes.

She knew how she must appear in the eyes of strangers, she also knew that they were fleeting and unimportant. Sometimes it felt like a shackle that had made her life more difficult, but in this moment, she felt free and open, and she wanted to satisfy her vanity. She wanted to appear beautiful in his eyes.

Resentment and longing. Her heart filled with conflicting emotions as she looked at him. She wanted to be remembered as a beautiful woman. She wanted to glorify her past days that were stained with mistakes, in such a way. She was filled with a foolish and unreasonable greed, knowing that it wouldn’t fulfill her needs, yet still clinging onto it.

   The sound of a chime in the hallway announced midnight. Odette felt her courage rise as she bent over and kissed his forehead. With a wry smile, Bastian wrapped his arms around Odette and lifted her up, carrying her to the bedroom. Odette hugged him tight all the way, the wednesday began with a passionate kiss. 



Gently, he moved across her body, kissing her from the top of her head to the tips of her toes. His touch was like a divine blessing, and his hunger seemed never-ending. Every movement was filled with a wild passion, yet simultaneously drenched with endless devotion. 

When he finally entered her, Odette found herself awash with desire; every breath she took grew more desperate than the last. He moved slowly inside her, each motion bringing warmth and comfort to her exhausted body. Her slender arms reached up, delicately wrapping around his neck, amplifying their intimacy.

Bastian began to move carefully, trying not to put any weight on her. Even in that moment, their kiss went on uninterrupted. He savoured her delicate lips and licked the dew of her mouth and explored every curve of her throat, tasting its petal-soft skin with his tongue.

When he kissed her lips again, Odette opened her eyes. Though she was so drained that she could not move much, her gaze was still clear.

The sea of paradise sparkled behind her eyes as Bastian delved into her. Her heart leaped as she embraced him tightly and lovingly, never wanting to let him go.

At once, both joy and agony thundered within them. As their hands entwined together, his hidden desires crawled out from their hiding spots and they welcomed each other with a desire neither could deny any longer. Their bodies melted against each other - deliciously intertwined - before starting an almost violent harmony as if in some kind celestial dance.

   “Don’t go,” Odette said out of the darkness, her breath heavy. “It's impossible now, anyway.”  her looked like she was about to burst into tears at any moment, revealed the meaning of those enigmatic words. “So don’t go, Bastian.”  her slender arms hugged his back as if to trap him. 

Bastian kissed her passionately, as both their bodies reached a climactic embrace. Her legs encircled his waist and she held him close in an embrace of mutual bliss. With his last shred of strength, he embraced her tightly as he felt both a joyous laugh and sorrowful tears welling up inside. 

“Odette..” he murmured into her hair, his breath still coming in gasps. She smiled faintly at him, breathing heavily as if to capture every moment together before it slips away.

Bastian lay down beside her and they gazed into each other for what seemed like forever, not needing to exchange words. In that moment, their foreheads touched and they shared a gentle kiss, feeling each other's warm sweat against their skin until she drifted off to sleep in his arms. 

Bastian lingered over her with a lover's touch, his fingertips dancing across the curves of her face. He placed delicate kisses on her forehead, the arch of her nose, and her luscious lips, treasuring every moment and every kiss he held like a precious memory for all time deep in his mind.

The night ebbed away, each kiss and caress intertwined with his dreams like an entwined vine. Bastian would slip into a sweet embrace in his slumber, only to woke up again and find himself submerged in her.

Time seemed to stand still until the arrival of dawn could not be denied. The first glimmer of sunlight streamed through the curtains and blue light spilled into their chamber as if a gateway to another realm. The crowing rooster shattered the silence and awoke Bastian from his dream. He buried his face into her neck, as if wanting to ward off the arrival of the day. But the clock marched on, its ticking growing louder with each passing second.

 Bastian carefully rolled out of bed. He looked at Odette, still asleep. 

The sky was yielding to a new day, the night of deception had now come to an end.

He tenderly kissed her forehead, his closed eyes opening to reveal no more pain, all sorrow had been replaced with a soft peacefulness.

With no further hesitation Bastian left the bed. His steps merged with the picturesque morning light of Wednesday's dawn, leaving peaceful silence in its wake.

Chapter 184.
Peace and Freedom.








Odette awoke in the sight of blinding white light. The summer morning sun, glimmering as if a diamond was strewn across a velvet sheet, filled her empty space beside her with warmth. She quickly got up, checking her desk clock, it was still a few moments before 6am; there was still time until Bastian left.

She felt the chill of the water as she splashed it onto her sleepy face, washing away the fog of slumber from her mind. After donning her bathrobe, Odette ventured out from her bedroom and heard the tranquil sound of running water from the bathroom. Her reflection greeted her back in the mirror, hair disheveled and feet bare. The area around her chest and neck, visible above the neckline, was adorned with kisses from Bastian.

 Her cheeks flushing a bright red, she quickly returned to the bedroom to get into a high collared dress. It did little to mask the love marks, so she had to extend her efforts to a little makeup. She gathered her hair in an elegant bun and found suitable shoes to complete her outfit before heading to the kitchen to make breakfast.

 Odette smiled as she left the room, her mood had been lifted and she was feeling much better. From the bathroom still came the soothing sound of water running from the shower. With thoughts of Bastian on her mind, Odette headed for his room to check. 

When she opened the door, it seemed as if all life had gone out of it;  his trunk had been removed from the closet and all his belongings were nowhere to be found. All that remained was his uniform hanging on the closet door, like an old soldier ready to march off to battle. He had already packed up, as if ready to leave earlier than

Odette crossed the room and approached his uniform. She could feel the rhythm of her beating heart as she glided her fingertips over his stellar badges and medals. Bastian seemed would return straight to the Admiralty, had he always been a busy man.

The five leisurely days in this quaint hamlet had felt like a beautiful dream, but all dreams must come to an end eventually and now it was her time to wake up. She did something reckless and foolish but she didn't regret a single second of it. For the first time in her life, she faced her true feelings without fear of what they might reveal.

Odette went down to the kitchen to start preparing breakfast. She hummed as she set about kneading dough for breakfast, and soon remembered the crumpled shirt from earlier. After thinking about it, Odette turned on her heel and padded back up the stairs where the morning light streamed in through the windowpanes like a dreamy melody.



Bastian stopped changing his clothes and looked at the shirt held in his hands, feeling the comforting warmth of the iron that lingered faintly on its fabric. Odette had visited his room. He noticed the crisp pleats of his trousers, ironed with a perfect, sharp line.

Bastian donned his uniform with practised precision. Putting on each item of clothing without even thinking about it. His fingers worked on their own accord, fastening buttons, straighten lapels and knotting the tie. His mind drifted across the five days he had spent in the village.

   Moments of happiness shared with Odette surfaced and sat on the surface like a swan on the calm lake in summer. He looked about the room, not really taking it in and although he was checking to make sure he had not left anything behind, he did not see the room, only memories.

He stepped over and glanced down at his wristwatch--the long shower had delayed him and he could not dare to keep the Emperor waiting any longer. It was time to move on from the past, cut off any lingering attachments and head off to war.

Bastian adjusted his posture and grabbed his officer's hat and trunk before leaving the room for the final time, stopped only by the sight of Odette at the bottom of the stairs, apron on and covered in flour without even drying her hair properly.  

 “Leaving already? I’ve just finished making breakfast.” Odette levelled him with a stern look. Her voice, delicate and melodic like the sweetest of songs, wafted up to his ears. “If you don't feel that you're pressed for time, please stay for breakfast before going.”

Bastian checked the time he already knew. He still had enough time to spare but refusing was the right decision; The longer he stayed, the deeper the pain will become, the harder it would become to part. But with one glance from her sweet stare, his frail spirit crumbled into dust


"I can spare a few moments," Bastian said, betraying his true wishes. It would always be like this for all the remaining days of his life. 

"Would you like me to make some tea?" Odette offered as he made his way down the stairs.

   “No, I would prefer some coffee, thank you” Bastian said. He went to the front door and put down the trunk. There was no sign of the passionate lover who missed her anywhere. This was the limit. And she calmly accepted the line drawn by him. The ending of their story had already been decided and there was nothing to be shocked about.

“Fine, I'll get the coffee ready." Odette smiled. She was grateful that Bastian had allowed them to conclude their affair in the proper manner, not leaving any regrets or lingering doubts. The agony of her desires were pushed to the back, she would not let them ruin this perfect moment between them.

   “The table is set in the back garden. Please wait a moment.” Odette said and Bastian politely strode past her, his body language radiating a chill same that she had used as her weapon to keep people away from her, but was now wielded by him. 

Odette watched as the man, who had become a stranger to her in such a short time, silently left. She took a long, steadying breath and walked back into the kitchen then set back to work. The rhythmic clinking of cutlery slowly replaced the sound of his departing footsteps and she felt herself gradually calming down as she continued her meal preparation.

   She placed the shaped bread into the oven and pulled out the eggs for frying. Each time her gaze passed over the kitchen window, out the back garden, a pang of memory flooded her mind, but again, she pushed it to the back, desperate not to let anything spoil this last breakfast with Bastian.

   Bastian was now sat at the table, on the chair that he had repaired, looking up at the distant sky. He did not look toward her once. Even when she stood, staring for the longest time, he did not stir once. The chill of his demeanor and his unruffle and spotless appearance only added to her burgeoning feeling of loneliness.

Swallowing the surge of emotions, Odette set aside the ingredients to make an omelette and tipped the eggs into a pot of water and dumped it on the stove

She didn't want this to be their last memory. 

She could understand Bastian’s coldness. She had been the exact same when she was forced to say goodbye to Tira. She had become more harsh and firm for the sake of her sister, a stance she took because she knew pity would not help her sister.

She truly wished for Tira's happiness, and steeled to bear the role of the villainess if need be. She was sure that Bastian had done the same thing, and so she refused to let his kindness go in vain. 

   Odette rushed upstairs and in a frenzy, stripped out of the clothes she was in and desperately pulled on the blue muslin dress she had been wearing when Bastian first came round. She did not want to part ways like she had done with her sister, she didn’t want to be remembered in such a manner. Her resolve supported her weakening mind.

   Odette steadied her breath as she dumped herself in front of her dressing mirror, gold comb held in her trembling hand as she let down her hair.



The morning was still yet full of life, and the clock hands crept to 8 a.m. precisely. 

Odette placed the breakfast tray on the table between them with delicate care. Light filtered through the whispering leaves of the trees outside as if it was molten gold, its radiance splashed over her who sat across from him. To him it was like seeing her in a wedding veil again, just as she had been on that endless summer day when they first said 'I do.'

 “Bastian?” Odette whispered, his name rippling across the air like a caress of the wind. As she tilted her head, the small pearl earrings adorned her ears glimmered beneath the light.

   Bastian averted his gaze like he had been caught staring at something sacred and took a sip of the bitter coffee. Memories he had not realised he had, tore at his heart when he looked at the sugar cube tongs, the wild flowers in the vase at the centre of the table or even from the tablecloth.

Lifting his head from a bittersweet sense of defeat, Bastian saw her smiling softly at him. Her graceful image washed away any remnant of their old grudge as they both realized the time for their  farewell was quickly approaching. His hand trembled ever so slightly as he moved the teaspoon; only the sound of a broken eggshell breaking the silence. He pushed the cup with the cracked egg towards her, “What does my fortune read today?”

Odette's eyes reddened as Bastian's words reached her. She had been hoping for gentle farewell, one that would have made her heart at peace. She truly wished for it. Yet she struggled to understand why she felt this way now.

Please stay a little while longer. It was her sincere heart. Don't come any more. but now her wish had been granted.

Her fading gaze drifted to Bastian's egg, so delicately placed into her open palms. Everything became a blur. For her had dedicated her life to masking her emotions and telling lies with ease; a skill that allowed her to hide away from the pain.

  “It is like the calm waters,” she lied  as she always did, doing her best. “Today you  will be met with peace and closure.” She wiped her tears and looked at him with a faint smile on her lips.

"Is that so?" Bastian nodded and smiled, as if the fabricated fortune might just come true. “Now let me check your fortune.”  He put down the returned egg cup and pointed to Odette's egg. His eyes were very kind, with a bit of mischief in them. 

Bastian carefully considered the broken shape of Odette’s egg,  his kind eyes now replaced by a stoic gaze. “It looks more like a bird’s wing,” he spoke softly. “Then you will be free like the bird, soaring high in the sky.” he said, serene light dwelled in his now unsmiling face.

“Our contract ends today,” His words echoed as if this were his last word to her. The birds perched on the branches seemed to sense it too, as they silently took flight. Odette stunned in silence.

 “The divorce will be finalised and the official reason will be a simple change of the husbands heart. The originally agreed price  for your role as a wife over the past three years will be paid in full and I will calculate the extra year in the payout. I will also make compensation for all damages caused. My lawyer will be in touch soon.”

   “No, Bastian, please don’t do that,” Odette said, her hands came up as if in prayer. “I was the one who broke the contract in the first place and caused all the trouble, I don’t want compensation.”

   Bastian looked at Odette thoughtfully. “The decision is for my sake,” he insisted. “Money may not be able to amend for all the hurt that I have caused you, but my heart will feel lighter once I have taken responsibility for what I have done. So please accept it. That will be enough." 

Bastian's lips curved in a bittersweet smile, masking the wild cries that begged for release. He checked his watch once more—the military vehicle was on its way. The moment was soon upon him. The time had arrived for him to take his leave of this place and and make haste to the meeting point at the outskirts of the village.

   “I will flow like a peaceful river,” His voice sailed through the air on a gentle breeze, carrying with them an unspoken sorrow that betrayed his smile. The ice cubes in his glass clinked and cracked like delicate crystals falling from a world above.  "And may you soar freely like a bird."

   Peace and freedom.  His eyes paused by the sight of the beautiful woman who had held his heart ever since the moment she lifted her veil.

   “You have done well, Lady Odette, I wish you all the happiness in the world.”

Chapter 184.
Peace and Freedom.








Odette awoke in the sight of blinding white light. The summer morning sun, glimmering as if a diamond was strewn across a velvet sheet, filled her empty space beside her with warmth. She quickly got up, checking her desk clock, it was still a few moments before 6am; there was still time until Bastian left.

She felt the chill of the water as she splashed it onto her sleepy face, washing away the fog of slumber from her mind. After donning her bathrobe, Odette ventured out from her bedroom and heard the tranquil sound of running water from the bathroom. Her reflection greeted her back in the mirror, hair disheveled and feet bare. The area around her chest and neck, visible above the neckline, was adorned with kisses from Bastian.

 Her cheeks flushing a bright red, she quickly returned to the bedroom to get into a high collared dress. It did little to mask the love marks, so she had to extend her efforts to a little makeup. She gathered her hair in an elegant bun and found suitable shoes to complete her outfit before heading to the kitchen to make breakfast.

 Odette smiled as she left the room, her mood had been lifted and she was feeling much better. From the bathroom still came the soothing sound of water running from the shower. With thoughts of Bastian on her mind, Odette headed for his room to check. 

When she opened the door, it seemed as if all life had gone out of it;  his trunk had been removed from the closet and all his belongings were nowhere to be found. All that remained was his uniform hanging on the closet door, like an old soldier ready to march off to battle. He had already packed up, as if ready to leave earlier than

Odette crossed the room and approached his uniform. She could feel the rhythm of her beating heart as she glided her fingertips over his stellar badges and medals. Bastian seemed would return straight to the Admiralty, had he always been a busy man.

The five leisurely days in this quaint hamlet had felt like a beautiful dream, but all dreams must come to an end eventually and now it was her time to wake up. She did something reckless and foolish but she didn't regret a single second of it. For the first time in her life, she faced her true feelings without fear of what they might reveal.

Odette went down to the kitchen to start preparing breakfast. She hummed as she set about kneading dough for breakfast, and soon remembered the crumpled shirt from earlier. After thinking about it, Odette turned on her heel and padded back up the stairs where the morning light streamed in through the windowpanes like a dreamy melody.



Bastian stopped changing his clothes and looked at the shirt held in his hands, feeling the comforting warmth of the iron that lingered faintly on its fabric. Odette had visited his room. He noticed the crisp pleats of his trousers, ironed with a perfect, sharp line.

Bastian donned his uniform with practised precision. Putting on each item of clothing without even thinking about it. His fingers worked on their own accord, fastening buttons, straighten lapels and knotting the tie. His mind drifted across the five days he had spent in the village.

   Moments of happiness shared with Odette surfaced and sat on the surface like a swan on the calm lake in summer. He looked about the room, not really taking it in and although he was checking to make sure he had not left anything behind, he did not see the room, only memories.

He stepped over and glanced down at his wristwatch--the long shower had delayed him and he could not dare to keep the Emperor waiting any longer. It was time to move on from the past, cut off any lingering attachments and head off to war.

Bastian adjusted his posture and grabbed his officer's hat and trunk before leaving the room for the final time, stopped only by the sight of Odette at the bottom of the stairs, apron on and covered in flour without even drying her hair properly.  

 “Leaving already? I’ve just finished making breakfast.” Odette levelled him with a stern look. Her voice, delicate and melodic like the sweetest of songs, wafted up to his ears. “If you don't feel that you're pressed for time, please stay for breakfast before going.”

Bastian checked the time he already knew. He still had enough time to spare but refusing was the right decision; The longer he stayed, the deeper the pain will become, the harder it would become to part. But with one glance from her sweet stare, his frail spirit crumbled into dust


"I can spare a few moments," Bastian said, betraying his true wishes. It would always be like this for all the remaining days of his life. 

"Would you like me to make some tea?" Odette offered as he made his way down the stairs.

   “No, I would prefer some coffee, thank you” Bastian said. He went to the front door and put down the trunk. There was no sign of the passionate lover who missed her anywhere. This was the limit. And she calmly accepted the line drawn by him. The ending of their story had already been decided and there was nothing to be shocked about.

“Fine, I'll get the coffee ready." Odette smiled. She was grateful that Bastian had allowed them to conclude their affair in the proper manner, not leaving any regrets or lingering doubts. The agony of her desires were pushed to the back, she would not let them ruin this perfect moment between them.

   “The table is set in the back garden. Please wait a moment.” Odette said and Bastian politely strode past her, his body language radiating a chill same that she had used as her weapon to keep people away from her, but was now wielded by him. 

Odette watched as the man, who had become a stranger to her in such a short time, silently left. She took a long, steadying breath and walked back into the kitchen then set back to work. The rhythmic clinking of cutlery slowly replaced the sound of his departing footsteps and she felt herself gradually calming down as she continued her meal preparation.

   She placed the shaped bread into the oven and pulled out the eggs for frying. Each time her gaze passed over the kitchen window, out the back garden, a pang of memory flooded her mind, but again, she pushed it to the back, desperate not to let anything spoil this last breakfast with Bastian.

   Bastian was now sat at the table, on the chair that he had repaired, looking up at the distant sky. He did not look toward her once. Even when she stood, staring for the longest time, he did not stir once. The chill of his demeanor and his unruffle and spotless appearance only added to her burgeoning feeling of loneliness.

Swallowing the surge of emotions, Odette set aside the ingredients to make an omelette and tipped the eggs into a pot of water and dumped it on the stove

She didn't want this to be their last memory. 

She could understand Bastian’s coldness. She had been the exact same when she was forced to say goodbye to Tira. She had become more harsh and firm for the sake of her sister, a stance she took because she knew pity would not help her sister.

She truly wished for Tira's happiness, and steeled to bear the role of the villainess if need be. She was sure that Bastian had done the same thing, and so she refused to let his kindness go in vain. 

   Odette rushed upstairs and in a frenzy, stripped out of the clothes she was in and desperately pulled on the blue muslin dress she had been wearing when Bastian first came round. She did not want to part ways like she had done with her sister, she didn’t want to be remembered in such a manner. Her resolve supported her weakening mind.

   Odette steadied her breath as she dumped herself in front of her dressing mirror, gold comb held in her trembling hand as she let down her hair.



The morning was still yet full of life, and the clock hands crept to 8 a.m. precisely. 

Odette placed the breakfast tray on the table between them with delicate care. Light filtered through the whispering leaves of the trees outside as if it was molten gold, its radiance splashed over her who sat across from him. To him it was like seeing her in a wedding veil again, just as she had been on that endless summer day when they first said 'I do.'

 “Bastian?” Odette whispered, his name rippling across the air like a caress of the wind. As she tilted her head, the small pearl earrings adorned her ears glimmered beneath the light.

   Bastian averted his gaze like he had been caught staring at something sacred and took a sip of the bitter coffee. Memories he had not realised he had, tore at his heart when he looked at the sugar cube tongs, the wild flowers in the vase at the centre of the table or even from the tablecloth.

Lifting his head from a bittersweet sense of defeat, Bastian saw her smiling softly at him. Her graceful image washed away any remnant of their old grudge as they both realized the time for their  farewell was quickly approaching. His hand trembled ever so slightly as he moved the teaspoon; only the sound of a broken eggshell breaking the silence. He pushed the cup with the cracked egg towards her, “What does my fortune read today?”

Odette's eyes reddened as Bastian's words reached her. She had been hoping for gentle farewell, one that would have made her heart at peace. She truly wished for it. Yet she struggled to understand why she felt this way now.

Please stay a little while longer. It was her sincere heart. Don't come any more. but now her wish had been granted.

Her fading gaze drifted to Bastian's egg, so delicately placed into her open palms. Everything became a blur. For her had dedicated her life to masking her emotions and telling lies with ease; a skill that allowed her to hide away from the pain.

  “It is like the calm waters,” she lied  as she always did, doing her best. “Today you  will be met with peace and closure.” She wiped her tears and looked at him with a faint smile on her lips.

"Is that so?" Bastian nodded and smiled, as if the fabricated fortune might just come true. “Now let me check your fortune.”  He put down the returned egg cup and pointed to Odette's egg. His eyes were very kind, with a bit of mischief in them. 

Bastian carefully considered the broken shape of Odette’s egg,  his kind eyes now replaced by a stoic gaze. “It looks more like a bird’s wing,” he spoke softly. “Then you will be free like the bird, soaring high in the sky.” he said, serene light dwelled in his now unsmiling face.

“Our contract ends today,” His words echoed as if this were his last word to her. The birds perched on the branches seemed to sense it too, as they silently took flight. Odette stunned in silence.

 “The divorce will be finalised and the official reason will be a simple change of the husbands heart. The originally agreed price  for your role as a wife over the past three years will be paid in full and I will calculate the extra year in the payout. I will also make compensation for all damages caused. My lawyer will be in touch soon.”

   “No, Bastian, please don’t do that,” Odette said, her hands came up as if in prayer. “I was the one who broke the contract in the first place and caused all the trouble, I don’t want compensation.”

   Bastian looked at Odette thoughtfully. “The decision is for my sake,” he insisted. “Money may not be able to amend for all the hurt that I have caused you, but my heart will feel lighter once I have taken responsibility for what I have done. So please accept it. That will be enough." 

Bastian's lips curved in a bittersweet smile, masking the wild cries that begged for release. He checked his watch once more—the military vehicle was on its way. The moment was soon upon him. The time had arrived for him to take his leave of this place and and make haste to the meeting point at the outskirts of the village.

   “I will flow like a peaceful river,” His voice sailed through the air on a gentle breeze, carrying with them an unspoken sorrow that betrayed his smile. The ice cubes in his glass clinked and cracked like delicate crystals falling from a world above.  "And may you soar freely like a bird."

   Peace and freedom.  His eyes paused by the sight of the beautiful woman who had held his heart ever since the moment she lifted her veil.

   “You have done well, Lady Odette, I wish you all the happiness in the world.”

Chapter 186.
One Last Gift.








The air in Trosa island was already thick with the tension of war. The civilian evacuation order had already been issued. The officer families were all loaded onto transport ships and taken to the mainland. The docks were filled with teary eyed families saying goodbye to their loved ones.

   Bastian disembarked from the small frigate and threaded though the throngs of people and headed for the headquarters building. The officers and sailors, their faces ashen, trailed silently behind him like eerie wraiths. 

"Excuse me…Major. May I have a moment to say goodbye to my wife?"  Lieutenant Caylon, the young officer he had given up his quarters for asked as they reached the end of naval port.

Bastian turned his head and froze at the sight of Caylon's wife. Rivers of tears ran down her cheeks, as she stood frozen in place, gripping their trembling son tightly. His team felt the weight of the moment too; every inch of their skin was bright red as they valiantly attempted to keep their tears at bay; a stark contrast from when they had left with brimming confidence earlier that afternoon.


"You may go," Bastian said as he turned away. His officers bowed their heads deeply to express their gratitude and dashed off to warmly embrace their families.

Bastian was almost relieved that he did not have anyone to say goodbye to, but then Odette’s smiling face swam through his thoughts.

   The guards at the entrance to HQ saluted after checking Bastian’s identification. When the doors of the briefing room were opened for him by another guard, all the eyes turned to look at him enter. After making a formed greeting to all those important enough to warrant such, everyone turned their attention back to the map on the table they stood around.

   “We have completed recon without you,” one officer said to Bastian. “It is believed that the main unit of the aggressors is located in this area. Close surveillance was not possible at the time, but we were able to penetrate far enough to asses an approximation of size.” The officer pointed to several locations on the map.

   “The intelligence has been confirmed to be true” Bastian said. “The core forces Lovita’s Navy are converging in the North Sea. They are forming a blockade around Berg’s territorial waters.”

   Admiral Ryan, the fleet commander, let out a heavy sigh and wipe his forehead with a hanky. The atmosphere in the conference room grew dark and heavy. Admiral Demel watched Bastian with narrowed eyes. Even though all the other veterans were nervous at the growing tension, Bastian remained cool. The way he answered and asked questions during the brief made him look heartless.

   Admiral Demel swallowed a sigh. Bastian was taking in all the details of the enemies positions as they were pointed out. He couldn’t help but notice that on the finger where his wedding ring once sat, there was nothing but a faint band of skin.

   He had learned from the Emperor himself that Bastian had planned to divorce Odette. Though the Emperor was unaware of the true reason, he said that Demel would need to handle the situation discreetly.

"The Lovita’s fleet is on full alert. We must prepare for open hostilities to break out at any moment,” Bastian declared with a solemn voice, his gaze as ice-cold as the depths of the ocean he was sworn to protect.

The devil's hound has returned.

No matter what his reason may be, it would surely bring advantage to the country.



Though she had no lessons today, Odette was as busy as ever. There were plenty of chores that needed to be seen to, that had been neglected over the last couple weeks. It was a hot day and she sweated through all the jobs. Even before lunch she had pulled the weeds in the garden, scrubbed every pot in the kitchen, hung out the laundry and polished the floor, even though she was having it replaced next week.

   Sweaty and tired. Her lunch was nothing more than a bit of buttered bread and some water. She knew it wasn’t good, but she didn’t feel like cooking anything. Perhaps the increasingly hot weather was to blame.

   Odette stuffed a load of cleaning equipment into a bucket and went upstairs to make a start on the bedrooms. The house was already clean enough, all ready swept and scrubbed to perfection. Yet still, she began her silent task of cleaning once more. It was a kind of ritual that had been repeated on a near daily basis for the past fortnight. She had just opened the guest room door when she heard a sound.

   Barking.

   There was nothing special about the noise, she had heard dogs barking on a daily basis, as owners took their pets out for walks across the fields of wile flowers. This bark was different, it felt familiar. She thought it was the bark of Margrethe.

   No, pull yourself together. Odette said sternly, trying to compose herself as she stared off into the middle distance.

   She changed the sheets on the bed. The floral pattern blanket brought back a flood of memories. She did not try to suppress them and felt like she could almost hear Bastian’s voice behind her. He had only stayed for five days, but it felt like he had always been there.

   Odette hated it and cleaned with even greater intensity. As she was sweeping the floor, she thought she could hear the distinct barking of Margrethe again. It was like she was being haunted by the dog she had cared so much for.

   I’m okay. She told herself.

   She twisted the brush around and started scrubbing at them like she was trying to scrub away the indistinct pattern on the carpet. The doorbell made her jump out of her skin. With a dazed expression on her face, she looked out into the hallway. The doorbell rang again, she was definitely not hallucinating now.

She remembered Count Xanders had promised her he would come by that evening to relay the floor construction schedule, and it seemed the schedule had changed since they last spoke

   Odette rushed down the stairs, taking off her apron as she went. As she reached the last step, she heard the barking again. She froze in the hallway, staring at her front door. She dared not open it, but some one was banging on the door impatiently.

   When Odette finally opened the door, a ball of white fur pounced up at her, tail wagging frantically. There was no doubting it now, it was definitely Margrethe. Odette looked at the dog, tears springing to her eyes, Margrethe bounding up at her, begging for a hug.

   “Madam!”

   Odette only just realised there was someone else stood in the porch. Of course there was, Margrethe wouldn’t be able to ring the door bell herself. Odette looked up and found a familiar face looking back at her.

   “Dora?”

   “Yes, ma’am,” Dora said, bowing low. The two men behind Dora also bowed out of respect. Hans, Bastian’s driver and Bastian’s lawyer, who’s name Odette did not know.

   “Oh, Margrethe,” Odette said, falling to her knees and hugging the dog as tightly as she dared.

   “We have come to return her to you, as per my masters request,” said Dora.

   “But, how, I thought Margrethe was…”

   “No, its definitely Margrethe, ma’am. Please give her a hug.” Dora wiped away her tears and handed Margrethe.

   Odette buried her face into the fur of the dog and let out a cry that was almost a wail. She didn’t care about the onlookers. All the turmoil was forgotten, her heart trembled as she hugged Meg. 

Margrethe returned like a miracle. 

At this moment, that little dog in her arms meant everything to her.



The tea had not been touched, left to go cold and forgotten. Odette watched Margrethe as she laid out on the huge dog bed, nursing three puppies. Even as she looked at them, Odette felt like she was in a dream.

   “These are really Meg’s puppies?” Odette said for the third time.

   “Yes, ma’am,” Dora nodded. “They were born not long after the Master came here for his vacation. "It took us by surprise when we found out that Margrethe was preganant. We were worried as her health wasn't in the best shape, but thankfully, the delivery process went smooth without any hiccups.”

   Dora had already explained how Bastian had found Margrethe, after hearing rumours of a stray, white dog. Bastian personally went to investigates. He did not stop searching for days, not once paying any attention to the tragedy set upon the Klauswitz household, he only focused on searching for the lost dog. 

   He would eventually find the dog  the day after the Klauswitz’s family's funeral. Margrethe being looked after by some tramp that made his home in the sewers. Bastian only had to call her name and she came running. The tramp had said that he had found the dog wondering lost and alone along the beach, tired and hungry. The servants did not believe it could have been Margrethe, not until Bastian washed and trimmed her fur.

“Bastian… How is he doing?” Odette asked, her voice trembling. Odette did not ask why he lied to about Margrethe’s death, and kept it from everyone except his butler.

She understood it the moment she heard it. Why he chose to be the villain, why he did not simply give up searching for Margrethe, even after burying another white dog. Why did he leave without saying a single word? Everything.

 He was just that kind of man and that’s why Odette hated him.

   Although she hated him, she was still thankful that he never gave up searching for Margrethe. On one hand, she felt sorry for him, for being such a burden, but on the other, she was upset that she didn’t even get the chance to say thank you.

“Master has gone to Trosa Island, there is some sort of big exercise planned,” Dora said.

   “So suddenly?”

   “Yes, ma’am, he left just a few days after returning.”

  Bastian assigned her the responsibility of returning Margrethe to its owner. Margrethe got a clean bill of health from the veterinarian and was ready for the journey. At the eleventh hour, Bastian made the surprising decision to have his lawyer accompany her to the Rothewein. 

   Odette watched the puppies nursing, deep in contemplation, which was only broken by the lawyer, who finally spoke up.

   “Your divorce has been finalised, thanks to his majesties urge to get it sorted as soon as possible. The proceedings were swift and final.”

   As the lawyer went into the details of the alimony, Odette felt her consciousness drift away and ringing rose into her ears, drowning out the lawyers words. Something caught her attention as she looked down at the slumbering Margrethe.

   “This ribbon…” Odette said, cutting off the lawyer, who looked at Dora and Hans as if some great insult had been flung at him.

   The pink ribbon around Margrethe’s neck had a name embroidered along its length, ‘Odette Von Dyssen.’ She had embroidered that stitching with her own hands. She had given it to Bastian when he went to the polo tournament. A hair tie she thought he had thrown away.

   “That was masters, he thought it would look better on Margrethe. One last gift,” Dora said.

   Bastian had kept the ribbon after all, but now he had returned it. A wailing broke through her thoughts, just as a knocking at the door came. A siren. Just as confused as the other three, Odette went to the door and found Count Xanders standing there, worry plastered across his face.

   “Lovita,” he said, panting. “Lovita has declared war. Our Emperor had issued a general mobilization order. 

   “What?”

   “War,” Maximin said frantically. “War has broken out, Odette.”

Chapter 187.
Others.








“General quarters, general quarters, everyone to their battle stations.”

   The captains voice rang out through the tannoy of HMS Rayvael. Ratings and officers ran too and fro to get to their designated positions. Bastian stepped out onto the deck of the bridge, his telescope coming up to his eye as he scanned the area. The Lovita fleet were fleeing at full speed, while the main force maintained overwatch along the defensive line, not wanting to escalate the situation.

   In the north-western waters of Trosa island, a skirmish had broken out between Berg’s 5th Squadron, commanded by Admiral Demel, and a scouting fleet of Lovita. There was no real challenge in it, the fast moving scout ships were no match for the frigates and dreadnoughts of Demel’s fleet. Bastian decided to pursue the scouts, eager to capture one.

   The North Sea front had been a stalemate for months. A tense stand-off between sturdy spears and impenetrable shield. Lovita were desperate to open up a route to Berg’s mainland, but Berg’s defensive line was proving to be a formidable line, locking down the North Sea. Although Lovita had the larger fleet, the fact that Berg had control of Trosa island made it easier for them to deploy at short notice and keep the defensive line well supplied.

   “Blue flag from the flagship,” a communications officer called out. It signalled autonomous actions.

   Satisfied, Bastian turned back into the command deck and took his seat. His cold gaze looked out over the sea, where the fog of war was rolling across their prow. “Left, fifteen degrees to 075.”

   The waves grew higher as the ship turned into the rough seas, cutting an intercept course with the fleeing vessels. Bastian did not hesitate as sea spray splashed against the windows of the bridge. Both sides were in turbulent waters, but Bastian did not flinch from the hunt. His junior officer around him wore expressions of concern and worry, but their eyes showed strong sense of trust at their commander.

Bastian Klauswitz was an incredible commander, unlike any the world had seen before. He knew no fear of death, burning every bridge behind him. He followed the orders with an empty heart and no regard for anything else—including himself. Thus was his strength made manifest. 

His ship never sank; those who sailed beneath his banner will win the game. This adage became reality to the crew of the Rayvael, leading them to believe that even fate could not oppose their captain's legendary will.

   “Maintain course, full speed ahead on both sides,” Bastian said calmly. Shouts rang up as the captains orders were relayed to the helm and engineering. The Rayvael increased its speed and crossed the dark blue seaIt wouldn’t take long to catch up to Lovita’s ships.

   “Targets in range,” a rating called out.

   Bastian got up from his chair and looked down at the already battered ship doing its utmost to try and escape the imposing presence of HMS Rayvael.

   “Hold the main, fire only the secondary,” Bastian said and his order was carried out.

   “Major! The enemy ship is turning to face. Looks like they are going to open fire.”

   Bastian was unfazed by the news. The little scout ships guns might be able to scratch the paint of his ship, but it wouldn’t be able to do any significant damage.

   “Change, ten degrees right,” Bastian said calmly. It was hard to tell those eyes surveyed a scene of battle. “FIRE!!!!.”



The paper held no news of Major Klauswitz. Odette was relieved. Every day she felt the anxiety of seeing his name in the honour rolls of the dead and when she did not see his name, it was like a great weight lifted and her heart felt light. Only to get heavy again the next morning, in anticipation of the news.

   As she caught her breath, the summer sun was rising high into the sky. The heat was oppressive from the second the first rays shone out across the village. There was not let up on the heatwave. Odette looked out across the village square, where there would normally be market stalls, but now there was only dry, dusty dirt.

   When the general mobilisation order was issued. All the young men of the village were called up into active service. For a long while, the tears of the families saying their final farewells could be heard throughout the village.

   Anytime one of the men of village was reported to have died in battle, the chapel bells would ring throughout the day. A small service was held. There were never any bodies to bury, so the ladies would bury their husbands or sons clothes. Yesterday the bells rang non-stop for the village’s teacher.

The coffin lay cold and empty, with only his symbolic dog tag and the remnants of his blood-stained uniform to signify a life lost. Tears streaming down his widow's face, as their naive children continued to play innocently, unaware of the tragedy that had befallen them. Not even the most eloquent words could bring comfort in that moment; all mourners simply stood in.

The chapel bell announced the hour, and village women took to the streets for a prayer service for their husbands but Odette, who lived as Marie Byller, couldn't join them. Her fake marriage to Bastian Klauswitz was over and done with; he was no longer her husband and so she had no claim or rights over him.

   “Excuse me, Miss Marie?” a woman said, the grovers wife, she had been staring over at Odette for a while now. “I don’t mean to pry, but there is a rumour going around that your cousin, who visited a little while ago, is not actually your cousin.”

   “Oh my, why are you talking such nonsense,” an elderly woman said, who was sharing the table with the grocers wife.

   “What? I want to know the truth and put these horrible rumours to bed.”

   “I’m sorry, Miss Marie, please understand that it is a very sensitive time at the moment. People will gossip to keep themselves distracted,” said the grocers wife’s friend.

   After offering a smile in way of an apology, the friend dragged the grocer wife away. Odette sighed and got up.

   With the outbreak of the war, the hero’s name was on everyone’s lips again. Newspaper articles, propaganda posters and all sorts had Bastian’s face on it and spread throughout the empire. It could only be a matter of time before her true identity was revealed. It was time for her to move on from the village.

   Standing within the shade of the willow tree, Odette looked out at the stream that shimmered like brilliant scales. Memories of walking the path with Bastian filled her with past joy and brought tears to her eyes. She tried to swallow her sobs and walked on, but soon stopped. 

What are your true feeling?

   She wrote letters to Bastian every day, but she never got as far as posting them. She would always tear them up and throw the torn pieces into the fire. She didn’t want to clutter his mind with them while he fought on the fiercest frontline.

Her vision blurred as she pondered the meaning of the returned ribbon. Quickening her pace, she approached her home.

Bastian had already settled everything, and she didn't want to burden him with her useless feelings.

Odette practically ran back to the cottage, where Margrethe bounded up at her and tried to lick her hand. The puppies bounded in her wake, like little balls of fur that had no control over their legs.

 She looked down at the miracle Bastian had given her. A bittersweet smile on her face. For a moment, her vision dimmed and her legs buckled. She was barely able to keep herself from falling by holing onto the bannister of the stairs. Bile rose up to her mouth and a surge of nausea came over her, making her fall to the floor. Margrethe’s alarmed barks kept her from going completely unconscious.

   “Odette!” a familiar voice called out. Odette looked up to see Count Xanders was rushing towards her.



“Capture an enemy ship? Are you some sort of pirate now, Major Klauswitz?” the commander's voice boomed in Bastian’s ears.

   The Rayvael had completed its clandestine mission and returned to port with a Lovita ship in tow. All its crew were now prisoners of war and were being transported to camps. The ship itself had been quarantined. Even still, the commander-in-chief was not happy.

   “I warned everyone about kicking the hornets nest,” the commander kept shouting.

   “I authorised the operation,” Admiral Demel said. The commander turned his ire onto Demel.

   “Is that why Major Klauswitz does not fear disciplinary action? Because he thinks you can protect him? Admiral, this can not go unpunished. I don’t think the full command of a capital ship should be left to the likes of a major, war hero or not.”

   Bastian observed indifferently, like watching the exchange of fire from a safe distance. Facing the enemy again would be more preferable than having to be here for this.

   “What do you have to say for yourself, Major? Why on earth did you think bringing a useless scout ship to port would be worth all this commotion?”

   “We were planning a search,” Bastian said.

   “A search, for what, what did you expect to find?”

   “We don’t know that until we start searching.”

   “So you risked a capital ship for nothing then?”

Bastian remained calm, he expected the reactions; nothing was surprising.

 “It's done, so no choice. You started it, so you must clean it up." The supreme commander soothed the tense atmosphere. "You'll be responsible if the hidden enemy conducted their covert operations. It will be your responsibility. And remember, if you return empty-handed, that too will be a reason for reprimand.” His eyes went wild with anger and fury as he stared at Bastian.

Bastian accepted the orders and left, starting an operation to search for the hidden enemies.

He was in the front of the armed search party, ready for close combat.

Chapter 188.
Until the Day You Die.








“It's the hot weather, don’t worry, drink plenty of water and rest, you’ll be right in no time,” Count Xanders said.

   Odette lifted her head to look at him. She was still so very pale, but luckily there was no emergency. Maximin had brought Odette to lay down on the sofa, propping her head up with a soft cushion.

“Can I stop by the kitchen and get you some water?” Maximin asked as he tied the curtains.

"No, Sir Xanders. Let me do it. I don't want to trouble you."

"It's okay."  Maximin stopped Odette from getting up "It would be my honour if I could help. So, rest comfortably."

After leaving sweet words of comfort, Maximin went to the kitchen. After giving her trouble by constantly showing her teeth at her guests, Margrethe finally became calm.  “You can’t do that, Meg. You have to be polite.” Odette lowered her voice and scolded the dog. Margrethe quietly retreated to the side of the pupies who were playing around on the cushion. 

 Odette couldn’t help but laugh. All those sleepless nights were taking their toll, and with the heatwave, Odette found it hard to eat. At that time, Maximin came back from the kitchen and gave her a glass of water.


It can’t be. She knew it couldn't happen yet she couldn't relax, and Maximin's question made her even more agitated

   “Do you have any sort of medicine here?” Maximin said, still concerned about Odette’s paleness.

   “No, there is no medicine.” 

   “Then I will get you some.”

   “Thank you, Sir Xanders,” Odette said, feeling embarrassed when she remembered there was medicine in the bathroom cupboard.

   She tried to concentrate on what Maximin was saying, but was having difficulty in understanding while her mind was elsewhere. Now that she thought about it, her chest was sore and there was a throbbing in her abdomen. It was a familiar sensation.

   “I’ll be going back to Ratz in the next week or so.”

   Odette snapped back to reality as Maximin changed the subject. She looked at him with wide eyes.

   “Is the Royal Botanical Gardens closing then?”

   “Yes, I am nearly finished up there and was on my way back.” Maximin sighed with a bittersweet smile.

   The scale of the war was increasing day after day. All the universities and research facilities in the empire were having to close in order to free up funds. Most students and teachers were drafted, making normal operations impossible.

   Maximin was lucky in that he suffered from asthma and so, was not drafted. Instead, he was conscripted into specialist service. He joined the military scientific research team. One of his duties was to catalogue and preserve the knowledge of the botanical garden.

   “Come with me, Odette,” Maximin said. “Countess Trier is very anxious. If I leave, she might force you to go with her instead.”

   “But I…”

   “It's wartime. Staying alone, out here, is not healthy for you. Hasn’t your life here already gone its distance?” There was a firmness to Maximin’s voice, like he was not going to accept any excuse. “I’ve arranged a separate residence for you in Ratz. Don’t worry about being indebted to the Countess.”

   “No, Sir Xanders, I can't do that.”

   “I’m not saying the offer is free. You can buy the house from me. You’re in a position to do so, now.” Maximin did not give Odette time to argue.  He blocked her rebuttal with words he had prepared in advance. It’s Bastian Klauswitz who taught him this.

Two days before leaving Rothewein, Bastian came on a bicycle and knocked on his door. Maximin obediently accepted him, knowing he had a purpose for his visit. And it’s true, he asked Maximin to look after Odette, as they were soon to be divorced and he had no rights to protect her anymore.

“I will respect Lady Odette's wishes." 

Bastian's voice rippled through the room like a gentle brook that summer evening. Rays of sunlight spilled through the window, splashing the study with a radiance that illuminated the weight of unspoken understanding between them. It wasn't until after war had broken out that Maximin had come to know the reason why he had asked for his help. 

Bastian requested that Odette be given the utmost refuge if things escalated geopolitically; making preparations for her accommodation within the capital and entrusting travelling responsibilities to him.

 “I know its a big decision to make and I will allow you time to think it over, before I really must move on to Ratz.” Maximin soothed Odette, who was anxious, with a kind smile. 

Bastian Klauswitz must have sensed war coming when he suddenly appeared and asked him to stay with Odette. 

'Can you keep what happened today a secret until the day you die? Can I trust you?'

That’s command ended the day's conversation, and Maximin vowed on his honor to keep his words.

But, in reality, there was more than just the promise. He could see something more stirring behind it, laying deep within Bastian's soul. However he didn't question it, believing it was the best decision.

“I will wait for your decision, Lady Odette.”

Once again Maximin made a silent vow, looking into those beautiful turquoise eyes. He knew that the promise he had made may have appeared cowardly to some, but it was a vow he wanted to keep for eternity.



Bastian stood at the dock while the search team conducted their operations. The enemy captain, the last officially confirmed prisoner of war, disembarked carrying a white flag. 

Swearing filled the air as Bastian walked by Lovita's ship, a humiliating defeat for them. Excluding the thirty two dead, there were a hundred and fifty five prisoners of war. Bastian was familiar with Lovita’s typical naval deployments and while he shouldn’t leave out the fact that some of the crew might have been lost at sea, there should have been another twenty crewmen. Bastian was not willing to take any chances.

   The search team had been split into four groups, with Bastian leading the second group right behind the first. He was going to lead a team up to the bridge and command decks, once a path there had been cleared.

   “Compartment one clear.”

   “Compartment four clear, moving to next area.”

   Shouts rang out across the ship and Bastian moved in with his search team. The corridor's end rest area, laundry room, and food storage were all cleared. After you've finished exploring the chapel, he climbed the ladder that lead to the upper floors. He was just about to open the door to the communications room when he discovered the enemy ambush. A chair in front of a desk moved. There was no mistaken it, there was some one there.

   Bastian signalled his squad to halt, raised his rifle and prepared to open fire. Two of his squad were stood, waiting to breach into the communications room from the far door. Bastian raised three fingers, then two, then one.

   At the same time as he kicked in the door, the other two men went in through the far door and together they assaulted the communications room on two fronts. The enemy returned fire at the same moment the search team opened fire. Bastian used the door frame as cover, popping out to take well aimed shots as the enemies hiding under the desk.

   The rest of the squad covered him just as much as he covered them. Bullets whinged and whined off the metal walls, ricocheting down the corridors. The seconds passed in the suddenly hot and noisy confines of the ship. Although Bastian did his best to remain cool and calm, the adrenaline made him sweat.

   Gunshots, screams and shouts from both sides, in the language of Berg and of Lovita. Bastian’s team subdued the enemy one by one, even as some members of his team were shot in return. The Lovita’s soldiers had the better defensive position, forcing Berg to engage from choke points.

   Bastian did his best to shoot at arms and legs, none lethal shots. He wanted to take prisoners, not lives. 

   “MAJOR!” came Lieutenant Kaylen’s piercing shout.

   Bastian had been reloading when he turned away from the door just in time to catch a bullet in his arm. It would have gotten him in the chest if not for Kaylen’s warning. Bastian turned back into the door way and saw the soldier who had shot him, cleverly concealed in the piping of the ceiling. Bastian had to commend the soldiers efforts in squeezing himself into such a tight space. Bastian shot first this time.

   The communications room fell into a deathly quiet almost as quickly as the gunshots had rung out. There was the distinct smell of cordite and blood. The search team moved into the room and quickly subdued those still alive, cuffing hands behind backs.

   Bastian moved from prisoner to prisoner, turning out there pockets until he found what he was looking for: a bloodstained cipher book.

   “Mission successful,” Bastian said, holding up the code book.

   “Are you alright, Major?” Lieutenant Kaylen said.

   “Take the prisoners and disembark,” Bastian said calmly. With the adrenaline wearing off, he was becoming very aware of the graze to his arm.

He crept across the hallway to the captain's room and rummaged through the desk drawers until he discovered a first-aid kit. He went to the sink and removed his top, the gun wound was deep but not very serious. He wrapped a bandage around the injury and used warm water to wash away the blood from his skin. 

He couldn't help but crack a faint smile, seeing the ring hanging on his dog tag glinted brilliantly in the waning summer sunlight.

He pulled a cigar from the drawer and lit it. Smoke swirled around him as he left the captain’s office. Silence ripped through the ship like a knife, broken only by occasional gunfire in the distance. Bastian walked through the hallway with his gun clenched tightly in one hand. A pale strip of sea shimmered in shades of turquoise beyond the dock.


Chapter 189.


A Moment of Light.








The sounds of the pen nib scratching across the surface of the rough paper stopped. Odette revised what she had written already with thoughtful eyes.

   The summer night past its peak and the air was filled with noisy grasshoppers. While listening to their chirrups, barely able to focus on the words on the paper, the pen nib overflowed with ink and a droplet fell onto the page, above a sentence conveying news of their child.

   Startled from distracting thoughts, she tried to wipe away the ink blot, but only spread the ink over the paper. The more she tried to wipe it clean, the worse she made it. Even using the blotting paper did nothing to help. The letter was ruined.

   With a deep sigh, Odette stood up from the writing table and went to the bathroom to clean off the ink stains on her fingers, and to calm her troubled mind. She went downstairs, where Margrethe roused from a shallow slumber at the sound of her mistress descending the stairs. The dog plodded over and licked Odette’s hands.

   “Thank you, Meg,” Odette said softly, Margrethe grumbled a bark in reply.

   Odette sat in a deep chair and shared stories with the dog. The recent end to the sticky heatwave and the welcome arrival of cooler weather. The current state of affairs with Bastian and more miracles.

   “I might be a mother again,” she said, her voice fading at the thought. The symptoms were unmistakeable. They were just like before.

   Odette got up after an hour of her one way conversation with Margrethe and made herself a cup of tea. As she carried a tray of tea and treats to the back garden, a cool breeze blew through the garden.

   Would it be better to not tell Bastian? The thought of the ruined letter made her heart waiver. Bastian had all but shown his hope that such an unfortunate event would not occur again, but the last time was entirely her fault for not being responsible. It was unfair to burden his heart at this moment. A possibility she never dared imagine.

  Odette looked down at her belly. The day the diagnosis came, she abandoned all hope of ever having another child. She had given up on the belief that such a miracle could happen in her life. The hurt and pain had overcome her confidence to overcome it all. But what if a miracle happened in just one night?

 She felt a mix of disbelief and joy, yet worried at the same time. Now, running away and raising the child on her own did not seem the right course of action.

   Odette looked around the dark garden, as if the answer lay in the shadows some where, waiting for her to discover it. Everything around her reminded her of him, from the water pump he had repaired, to the sturdy-fixed chair she sat on.

The house glowed in the alabaster light of the moon. Every corner seemed to whisper Bastian's name, the memories of the brief time they had spent together permeated everything around her. It had been less than a week, but seemed to be as vivid as if it had been her whole life. Perhaps that’s why she chose not to leave the village yet. 

She was lonely.

   She had been so since the day Bastian left her. Going back to her daily life only made her everyday seem incredibly empty. She felt like she had been lonely her whole life, but had not realised it until he was gone. It was like not knowing what darkness was, until the light came and then left again.

   Odette steadied her heart, cherishing the hope found in despair. If she was indeed pregnant, she intended to quietly give birth and raise the child on her own. She wasn’t going to use the child as an excuse to bring Bastian back. She would tell the child of their father one day. Despite the sadness in their relationship, they had said goodbye on good terms, with both forgiving the other. 

   Odette looked down at Margrethe. “That would be okay, right?” The dog looked at her, head cocked. With a faint smile, Odette stood up and went to rewrite the letter.

   As she stood up, nausea came over her again. She clutched the edge of the table and felt a wetness between her legs. 

No way. 

She didn’t dare look down, there was no way it could happen again. Odette desperately denied reality, but the more she did, the heavier her heart got.

   Tears already flooding her eyes, she looked down at the chair, at the white cushion which bore a red stain upon it, same stain was on the hem of her nightgown.

It was a blood trail that signaled the beginning of monthly period.



Admiral Demel bore a large smile as he poured out another whiskey for Bastian. The breeze blowing in from the sea was quite chilly. It was the kind of chill that made one long for the warmth of summer.

   “The celebration is almost over, quick, drink up,” Admiral Demel said.

   “I’ll keep that in mind,” Bastian said, taking a sip of the whiskey.

   The moral of the troops was reached a peak when Bastian came to the supreme commander with the code book. As a reward, he afforded Bastian and his troops a day of leave, just when the cargo ship carrying letters from home arrived.

   All Bastian wanted to do was rest before the return to a long war. Although reluctant, he accepted the celebratory drinks with the Admiral, knowing he would regret it in the morning.

   “I bet Sher is gritting his teeth at such a humiliating defeat. It's like pouring fuel into a fire. I bet he had all kinds of desire to get his revenge against you.”

   “I am ready for it.”

   “Yes, of course you are, you’ll manage well I suspect. Look, Major, you need to make it out of this alive, you know that, right?”

   “Don’t worry about me,” Bastian said firmly.

   “Seriously?”

   “Absolutely.”

   “Then why do you fight like you wish for death?”

   “It's not like that.”

   “You’ve been my underling since you were an officer cadet, its been more than ten years, I know you Bastian. Something's changed in you.”

   “I apologise.”

   “Give over, Bastian, you know I don’t want to hear some bullshit apology.”

   Bastian knew that, of course, but he was not about to admit to the admiral that he had no intention of returning from this war alive. Even though Demel suspected that Bastian had a death wish, Bastian was not going to let Demel’s suspicions come to light.

   “If I said that I considered you like a son, it would be a lie. What kind of father would push his son to the very front of the fighting? But still, Major, no, Bastian, I care about you a lot. You are one of my most trusted officers. I would trust you with my life, but I am getting old and I doubt I will find another officer like you if I lived another hundred years, so please, take care of yourself. You would be showing me the truest form of loyalty if you could respect this one, simple wish.”

Love blossoms anew when death was nigh. People were indeed foolish beings. 

Bastian looked at Demel, who looked right back at him in silence. Bastian remained flat, distant, unreadable, but at least he looked human. Admiral Demel nodded, though not entirely satisfied.

   “One failed marriage does not mean the end of your life. Look at Admiral Ryan, he’s been through two wives and still made it to commander-in-chief,” Demel said jokingly. “So don’t you worry unnecessarily. You still have many prospects ahead of you, still more chances to take. It would probably be better if you avoided such tragedy in the future though.” Demel refilled his own glass.

   “Lets have one more toast, before you face the wrath of Sher.” Demel raised his glass to Bastian. “To the safe return of Rayvael,” Demel shouted.

   Cheers rang out from inside the officers mess. Bastian drained his glass and gave Demel la faint smile.

   “Thank you,” Bastian said, bowing his head. “I wont forget your kindness.”

“You sound like a man who's about to meet his maker. Off with you, then!” Admiral Demel chuckled and flicked his hand in dismissal. 

Bastian bowed one final time before departing from Admiral Demel's room, quietly shutting the door behind him. As he moved farther away, his footsteps faded away into the hallway beyond, slowly replaced by the gentle summer breeze.



After loading the last trunk into the back of the car, Odette was ready to leave. She settled Margrethe and the puppies in the back seat and paused to look at the old cottage one more time.

   It didn’t take long for Countess Trier to send a car once Odette decided to leave. It was a lot quicker than she expected, but she didn’t harbour any regrets. She had ordered her feelings on the night woke from her delusions.

   “Teacher,” a child’s excited voice called out.

   Odette turned and climbed into the car, where Alma was playing with the puppies in the back. She wore the brightest smile Odette had ever seen.

   Count Xanders came over once he had finished talking to the driver of the second car, which carried the vast majority of Odette’s possessions. Once in the drivers seat, the two cars left the quiet little cottage. They followed the creek until they were outside the village. Odette kept her hat on,  hidden under the brim and veil, her eyes were as red and moist as they had been that night.

Chapter 190.


Helene’s Daughter.


The boy cycled up the hill to the door Odette was patiently waiting at. His cheeks were rosy from the cold and he passed Odette a newspaper with an exhausted smile. 

"Thank you." Odette handed the child two freshly boiled warm eggs. The boy bowed his head before peddling away to the next house.

   Holding he newspaper like it was a love letter, Odette turned back into the town house. Her breath visible in the chill winter air. Once inside the house, she closed her eyes and said a little prayer before opening the paper. Today the front page was filled with an article praising the heroic efforts of Major Klauswitz. 

   Odette settled into an armchair in front of the fireplace and read through the paper. The fighting at Trosa was growing more and more intense with each passing day. The momentum of the Berg military, which had taken the initiative, was starting to slow after the capture of a major Lovita fort. The war took a turn when Ethar, an ally of Lovita, joined the war effort.

   The North Sea front was hit hard, after reinforcements from Ethar arrived, the naval fleet stationed in Lovita was able to secure supply routes through the blockade. However, these routes were quickly blocked again and the front line was pushed further south. This caused a sense of panic throughout the empire as they feared an enemy invasion on their mainland.

 Luckily, Berg's fleet was able to secure the North Sea and protect it from enemy forces. Their all-out offensive was successful in reclaiming the main ground line and reopening the crucial supply route.

  But Odette was not happy. Not because of the progress of the war, but because she kept seeing Bastian’s name on everything. Everyday new leaflets were printed and distributed. Every day new posters were put up. Every day the newspapers were filled with articles about Bastian’s heroics.

   Major Bastian Klauswitz, the hero of the North Sea.

   He had gone from being known as the junk dealers grandson, a scoundrel who ate his father and a spoiled brat who say on a throne of scrap and blood, to becoming the saviour of the empire. Even the social elite, who had rejected Bastian, were singing his praises.

   Yesterday, a charity fundraising event was held at the opera house, to build new battleships for the North Sea Fleet. Odette stared at the photo of Bastian for a long time.

   “You’re still on the chessboard,” Odette said, a pang of sadness in her words. She didn't want to hear Bastian's name on the lips of those who slandered and mocked him. She turned away and headed back home, knowing it would be another difficult day.

   “Ma’am, you’ve woken early,” said a maid, coming into the room for her morning chores. The puppies immediately bounded around her feet, trying to trip the poor girl.

   Odette put down the newspaper, fighting the urge to toss it into the fire. Instead, she let it drop to the floor, where the puppies immediately began attacking it. She then informed the maid of her duties today.

   “Countess Trier is coming over later, so please make sure the food she likes is prepared.”

“Yes, ma’am. Don't worry. I am well-versed in the Countess’s tastes.” the maid said with a nod, tickling the corners with a feather duster. She was a maid in the Countess's household before serving as the housemaid here.

   Odette did not want a maid, but Countess Trier deemed the house too big for one person to look after, so provided her with a maid. Odette struggled with accepting the company, but had no choice really. In the end, she accepted on the condition that she would handle the wages herself.

   The new residence had been prepared by Count Xanders and Countess Trier together. It was located in the centre of Ratz and even though it was small compared to the mansion, it was a decently sized house and nice enough for one to live alone.

  It had been three months since she had lived here and she couldn’t believe that the house was all hers. She also couldn’t believe the pension she had been given, which was paid into her private account each month, with Bastian’s alimony on top of that.

Bastian's lawyer also informed her about a trust fund for her, which will pay monthly, allowances for five years before being terminated. To end the contract, she must appoint a property manager or prove her ability to manage the inherited wealth. The lawyer assured her this was for protection due to her sudden wealth, but she didn't feel disappointed. She knew what Bastian was worried about and how much he lcared for her. She understood vverything.

   Odette gazed out across the sun drenched sitting room, the chilly winter air snuck in from the windows, but she hardly noticed it. She felt calm and serene, her eyes resting on the piano in the corner.

   The house had been in perfect condition since the beginning, from the furniture and decorations, to the household items. Everything was in its place, carefully curated by Count Xanders, who explained that the previous owner, who had moved to the new continent, had sold everything in the house with the house. The piano too.

   “Um, ma’am?” the maid said cautiously, waking Odette from her trance.

   “Oh, sorry, I got lost in thought,” Odette said. She quickly went upstairs to get dressed.

   Three times a week, Odette worked at the Military Advisory Agency, translating messages from abroad. She had seen an advertisement in the paper and thought it would be a good way to keep herself busy. At first, the interviewer had been dismissive of her, but once he found out that she could speak and read Felia, he was all for her. It also helped that she had been married to a military hero and had royal blood helped also.

   She mainly handled clerical work, as any military intelligence were handled by vetted soldiers. Still, Odette was pleased to be able to do her part in the war effort. It was also a place where she could quickly receive news of Bastian, though she no longer had the right to receive news of him. 

Every morning, on her way to the naval base, Odette had to remind herself of this fact. And today she dressed in a modest blouse, skirt, topped with a dark gray coat, hat, and gloves. Her footsteps echoed on the frozen streets, cutting through the cold air.



Once the supplies arrived, the mood on the ship lightened a little. Bastian had checked the repairs on the aft deck, which had been damaged in the engagement yesterday. There was a long line of people queuing up outside the clerks little office, waiting to see if they had any letters from loved ones back home.

   The air was filled with chatting that issued from smiling faces and relaxed expressions. They all turned their attention to Bastian as he walked past. Their demeanour changed quickly, as they all stood to attention and saluted.

   Bastian returned a simple salute and turned to walk down an opposite corridor leading to the bridge.

   “Ah, Major Klauswitz,” the postal working called his name. “There are letters for you too, and a parcel.”

   Bastian was a little surprised about this and took the letters and parcel. Instead of going to the bridge, Bastian took his correspondence to his quarters.

   He puffed on a cigarette as he considered the envelopes. There were letters from the Ardenne estate, his company and other friends serving in different parts of the war. They all carried new years greetings. His aunt had sent a hand knitted blanket. He completely forgot the end of the year was fast approaching. Odette’s birthday would be soon.

   Despite the war, her upcoming birthday would be better than last year when she was trapped in hell. He then chuckle to himself, she would probably have a better birthday with Count Xanders. Count Xanders also kept his promise, as confirmed by the report from the lawyer.

Odette was safely settled in Ratz, now the full owner of the townhouse Bastian had bought. It brought him comfort to see her, once a lonely wanderer, now with her own home.

   After haphazardly arranging the cards and gifts on his small desk, Bastian stood and looked out the porthole across the sea. HMS Rayvael was ordered to escort a military supply ship passing through the waters where Lovita lurked. They should be entering the safe zone some time tomorrow.

   The sea turned red as the winter sun began to sink into the horizon. He sat back down again at his desk and opened the drawer. Inside was the emperors promise. He knew that it was a sensitive matter and that it might take time because of the war, but two seasons have already passed. He couldn’t afford to sit back and wait any longer.

   The hero of the North Sea.

   Bastian knew all too well the power that title held and how he could use it. Bastian made up his mind and began to pen a letter.



The grand procession of cars and carriages passed through the gates of the grand palace. The Emperor stood by the window and watched them filter in. Today was going to be a busy and emotional day, that considered family more than anything.

   Helene’s legacy.

   The imperial councillors, upon hearing of the days agenda, were viably irate and sported disproving looks. They couldn’t understand why the Emperor would bring up the matter of his deceased sister at a time when the entire empire was engulfed by war. The criticism was not withheld either.

   The decision was brought about by a letter of new years greetings from a hero on the front line. Before the season changed. Bastian Klauswitz had set his own deadline. If their deal was not concluded by then, then the alliance would be shaken greatly. He presented plausible reasoning and righteousness, but the threat of it was more like a loan shark collecting debts.

   At first glance, it seemed like Bastian had the inferior position, but in the end, he would win the game. He might as well have confessed that Odette was his weakness. The Emperor no longer disliked Duke Dyssen. A beautiful daughter who was a lot like her father became a leash to dame a hell hound.

   The Emperor found it difficult to understand what love had to do with any of it. He only felt pity, a cold calculating mind that only considered what was right for the empire. Now that the decision had been sternly made, it would be easy to bend the will of a stubborn man, but today he was determined to do whatever it took.

   The empire needed a hero, and the hero wanted the crown for his discarded wife. So, Helene’s daughter must wear her mothers crown, whether he liked it or not, for the sake of the empire.
Chapter 191.


For My Princess.



The Northern Alliance were planning a large offensive operation. They had gathered together most of their fleet at Trosa Island, with the idea to seize control of the North Sea by launching an all-out offensive against Lovita.

   Odette looked down at the block of text she had just finished translating and blinked. Her breath caught in her throat, she tried to refocus on her work, but her mind was just blank. She was working overtime, her shift finished hours ago, so she took her shock to mean it was time to clock off for the day. There was no way she was going to be able to concentrate now that she knew what was coming.

   Cleaning away her desk and handing in the translated communiques to the secure locker at the back of the large room filled with desks and other women, and pensioners, doing the same work. She grabbed her coat and made her way out into the hallway bathed in the light of the setting sun. She was aware of peoples attention on her as she made her way down the rose coloured hallway, but she ignored them.

“Hello, Lady Odette.”  the guards in the entrance greeted her. After her identity was known, they no longer checked on her. However,  Odette removed her coat, a procedure required for all volunteers. She felt uneasy receiving special treatment because she was Bastian Klauswitz's ex-wife, and didn't want rumors to damage his heroic image

   Odette left the annex once the guards checked her pockets and patted her down. Across from the building she could see the naval headquarters. She stared at it for a long time, the gold trident, which stood as a crown of decoration above the entrance, glittered in the watering sun.

   Bastian was always at the forefront of the war and this operation was going to be no different. She didn’t want to let ominous thoughts bring her down, but she couldn’t help but feel anxious.

   When the hour came, the bell in the clock tower rang out.

   Her hands clasped together in prayer and as she had done in the days previous, she prayed to what ever deity of the sea she could think of, pleaded for them to see Bastian safe. She didn’t care if she never got to see him again, just so long as she knew he was safe and alive. She desperately wanted him to return from the war, be given the opportunity to start a family, have children who love him unconditionally. If she heard news of this, she could go on with her own life, happy in knowledge that Bastian was out there, living his life.

So Please

   The bell finished its tolling of the hour and Odette moved on through the naval base and out onto the streets. She couldn’t help but notice that there was a distinct lack of male citizens. Her idle thoughts presaged the time until she stood before the steps that led up to the tram station.

   “Lady Odette?”

   Snapped back to reality, Odette turned from the tram platform to see Count Xanders leaning out the window of his car, with a bright smile on his face.



“Don’t talk such drivel,” Admiral Demel said to Admiral Ryan, the commander-in-chief, who had been explaining the upcoming operation.

   “Now look here, Demel…”

   “It was bad enough that you gave command of a capital ship to a Major, but giving him command of the whole operation is absurd,” Demel went on without pausing. The other generals at the brief were on side with the commander-in-chief, but they kept their mouths shut.

They were meeting to plan the Sea Fox Hunt, a large operation. Lovita had suffered a blow and was reorganizing their defenses. Berg wanted to take advantage of this and defeat the enemy, but Admiral Sher wasn't an easy opponent. A trick was needed to flush out the hiding fox.

How?  To use the sea fox's natural enemy as bait. Having Major Klauswitz at the head of the defensive operation was all part of the plan, he was going to be the bait to lure out the enemy commander, Admiral Sher,  who had made it quite obvious that he wanted to sink Major Klauswitz himself and would stop at nothing to do so. Ryan wanted to take advantage of this.

Only Bastian could make Admiral Sher Fox lose his cool and act rashly. And this trap was likely to succeed. But what then?  Admiral Demel turned his red face to Bastian, who remained as cool as ever, as if ignorant that Ryan wanted Bastian to put his life on the line for the sake of catching one sly little fox.

   “We all understand that you care for the officers under your command, Demel, but don’t you think you’re taking this a little far?” Admiral Ryan said.

   “Its not even about that, this whole operation is a death sentence, pure and simple. The Emperor is not going to like you putting the life of the countries favourite war hero at risk.”

   “That’s an exaggeration,” Admiral Ryan said with a wave of the hand. “Of course, I admit that its a dangerous operation, but that’s war and I have complete confidence in Major Klauswitz’s abilities. He is a war hero, like you said.”

   “Yeah, only a hero once he has sacrificed his life,” Admiral Demel sneered.

   “Are you challenging my command, Admiral Demel?”

   The other commanders in the room shifted uncomfortably, hoping this was not going to devolve into a debate of honour. All the while, Bastian sat at the far end of the table, studying the map between them all.

   Ryan was one of the finest strategist in the navy. Despite Lovita being drastically outnumbered, it was Ryan’s unparalleled insights that kept Lovita in the fight. His appointment as the commander-in-chief to the most crucial front to the war was a testament to his abilities.

   Though he was still criticised as a cold blooded and heartless commander, Bastian had every confidence in him. A view that was not dictated by personal feelings. Bastian agreed with Admiral Ryan. No matter how much he studied the map, he could see no other way of drawing out Admiral Sher. Bringing him in would practically sign the end of the war and Odette would be able to wear the crown.

   Though their marriage had ended, she remained the only beautiful thing left in his life. Something he wanted to protect with every fibre of his being.

   With cool eyes, Bastian looked up from the strategy map and seemed to notice the argument now in full swing for the first time.

   “I will take command of the reconnaissance fleet,” Bastian said, as if asking for another cigarette. For his princess. That one reason was enough for him to willingly obey.

   “I knew you would,” Admiral Ryan said, with a cocksure grin. Admiral Demel looked at him with mouth gaped and eyes wide in shock.

   “But I have a condition,” Bastian said, bowing his head slightly.

   "Let's hear it."

   “I want things to proceed according to standard military procedures,” Bastian said politely. Admiral Ryan chuckled.

   It might not have seemed like much, but for Bastian to ask for the SOP’s, he was practically asking to be treated like any other admiral. Only admirals can command independent fleets, so his request for military adherence was essentially asking for an admiral's position. It was unexpected from someone to enjoy the privileges and station far above his rank, but Admiral Ryan couldn't refuse it.

Bastian Klauswitz had earned enough honors to be promoted to admiral, but he refused to unleash such a devil's untamed hound.

“Do you really think the Emperor’s favour would stretch so far as to allow you the privileges of a full Admiral?” Admiral Ryan said.

   “I am merely asking for what I am owed, is that not why you have entrusted me with such an operation? You know that I am capable, right?” Bastian calmly said.

 Admiral Ryan soon let out a resigned laugh. “I had momentarily forgotten that you're also an excellent negotiator.”

That was all the answer he could give.



“I’m sorry for the poor state of dinner,” Odette said to Count Xanders.

   “Think nothing of it, it was a nice dinner.”

   “Thank you for your compliment,” Odette said with a bright smile as she poured herself a cup of tea.

   Maximin watched her with calm eyes. Odette’s drawing room was bathed in warm light and was cosy enough to allow them to forget about the bitter winter war that was currently raging in the North Sea.

   Count Xanders did not mean to spend the rest of the afternoon with her, their meeting was purely by chance, but he couldn’t let slip the opportunity to catch up. He mustered up the courage to ask her out to dinner and to his surprise, she accepted. The excitement slipped from his fingers as the restaurant he took Odette to had closed down, most of them coffee shops, tea rooms and restaurants were closed now. So Odette invited him round hers for dinner.

   When they got to her town house in Ratz, Odette seemed to relax a lot more and there was no sign of the uptight noble lady. He felt like the scope of the friendship had bloomed into something more, but he didn’t want to risk brooking the subject in case he read things wrong. He didn’t want to lose such a good friend.

   “Actually, I have something to tell you,” Maximin said, clearing his throat.

   “Oh, what do you mean?”

   “I would like to ask you formally if you would like to start a proper relationship with me, Lady Odette.” Maximin put down his tea cup. The anxiety coursing through him right now, he felt like he was going to let the cup slip through his fingers and there was no way he was going to survive that embarrassment on top of everything else.

   “Sir Xanders…”

   Before Odette could give her response, a knock came on the door and the maid stepped into the room. “There is a messenger from the palace, ma’am.”

Chapter 192.


When I Stand at the End of This Road.








The ceremony was a simple one due to the war. She boarded the carriage with a waiting servant, the guard of honor omitted. The luxurious crest engraved on the carriage was the only hint of the royal event. Pulled by two white horses, it carried Odette from her town house to the royal palace. The people they passed by stopped and stared. By the time she reached the palace, there was a considerable crowd gathered.

   Odette gazed out of the window as if caught in some wild dream. The familiar gatehouse and gardens felt more alien then they ever did before, especially when she thought about her mothers crown waiting for her at the end of the road.

   The envoy had announced the Emperor’s edict to restore Princess Helene to her proper station. Odette never thought it was true, like it had been a whispered lie in the darkest corners of her mind. Even as the maid congratulated her, with teary eyes, and Count Xanders shaking her hand in congratulations.

   “Congratulations, Odette, truly. You’ve received the best birthday gift of your life,” Countess Trier said.

   “Thank you, Countess, but why would the Emperor do this?” Odette said. She looked at Countess Trier with eyes of a bright, young child.

‘One day we will return to our place.’

   She had never dared even dream that her mothers wish would ever come true. Odette had always tried to push it from her mind, to forget about reaching the castles in the sky.

   “Seeing the world fall apart is a tragedy, maybe the Emperor had a change of heart and wanted to forgive his sister,” Countess Trier said, trying her best to provide some comfort to Odette, but Odette knew that the Emperor was not a sentimental man. She would find out the reason once she meet her uncle.

As the carriage sped down Preve Avenue, signs of the holiday season appeared despite the war. Odette closed the curtain, not wanting to think about empty sentiments. Today was the day her mother's wish would come true, and that was all she wanted to focus on.



“Congratulations, Admiral Klauswitz,” Admiral Ryan said as he affixed the new rank pins to Bastian’s lapels.

   Bastian responded with a simple handshake and a salute. The applause from the soldiers and naval ratings around them became a roar of noise, marking the end of the promotion ceremony.

   The Emperor bestowed the War Merit medal and a special promotion to the hero of the North Sea. Although there were concerns about the nature of the promotion, it was unheard of for a Major to be promoted directly to Admiral, most agreed that Bastian was well deserving. Besides, it was wartime, victory was more important than following conventional ruling.

   “Do your best to be the admiral that safeguards the seas of the empire,” Admiral Ryan said, patting Bastian’s shoulder.

   Bastian’s indifference to being the youngest admiral in naval history was absurd, but most chose to ignore it and celebrate on Bastian’s half. What was shaping up to be the final battle was drawing near. It was a crucial time to boost moral.

   There were those that looked bitterly on Bastian’s fast track, stooping so low as to call Bastian a Mayfly Admiral. To most, especially amongst the junior ranks, Bastian had become nothing short of a deity of war, his promotion became a catalyst in which moral was boosted to exponential heights.

   “An Admiral more popular than the commander-in-chief,” a general from the conservation faction muttered bitterly.

   “Not only that, but they are even starting to call him the ‘Duke of Trosa.’ It wouldn’t surprise me if they promoted him above the Emperor himself, at this rate.”

   “If you’re so opposed to it, why don’t you volunteer yourself up as bait. Breaking through Lovita's defense, attacking Sher's fleet, and luring the enemy to our trap at sea. Seems simple enough, right?" Admiral Demel said scornfully.

   “Are you mocking me?”

   “Not at all, I’m just giving sincere advice. If you’re so against the hero’s rise, why don’t you do it instead? Why don’t you step up and become the hero of Lovita?”

   “Enough, even cats and dogs don’t fight as much as you two,” Admiral Ryan said, as he watched Bastian's departing. “May the gods bless the empires new Admiral. He’s going to need all the help he can get.”



Princess Helene’s crown had finally found a new head to rest upon. Its new owner walked down the length of the red carpet, her head bowed in embarrassment a crowd of elders stood shoulder to shoulder to witness her ascension. 

All eyes in the banquet hall turned to that spot. The restoration ceremony for Princess Helene was also a year-end party, with many guests besides the imperial family. Due to the young men being away at war, there were mostly elderly attendees.

   “Helene’s tears have finally stopped,” Odette who was standing next to the emperor and waiting for her mother's crown, heard one of the elderly ladies mutter under her breath.

   Jewels in the royal family were always passed on to the next generation, all with one exception, the crown of Princess Helene. It was said that the jewel encrusted within the circle was cursed, so it had been locked away in the treasure trove, never to see the light of day until today.

The crown, made by a past emperor with top-quality jewels for his loving daughter, was locked in the imperial jewelry storage. It had gained the nickname "Helene's Tears" due to its drop-shaped diamonds that resembled tears

   The Emperor personally held out his sister's crown, ready to rest it upon his niece's head. Odette felt the weight of it and reality struck her. It was as if she had been plunged into the cold depths of the sea where Bastian was now fighting.

   “I hereby recognise my sister, daughter of the empire, as princess of the empire once more. We hereby pass on her station to her daughter, Odette Theresia Marie-Laurie Charlotte Von Dyssen, who  is now brought back into the folds of the royal family once more. Who is now heir to Princess Helene.”

   Odette bowed, as was only proper in such a ceremony and the rest of the gathered masses applauded. The national anthem started playing. The once abandoned princess, known to all as the Beggar Princess, finally returned to claim her rightful place.



The banquet that followed was a far cry from the gaudy and over indulgent parties that would normally have been thrown on such an occasion. No one would have thought it was an end of year celebration. Dancing was prohibited, the food was very simple and the guest all wore simple dresses fit for mourning rather than celebrating.

   Maximin watched Odette, who stuck out from the sea of mundane thanks to the glittering crown she now wore. Donning in a plain black velvet dress with a blue sash symbolizing the royal family, she was the star of the evening and so, impossible to approach. Deciding that it was probably for the best, Maximin turned away and went out onto the balcony. At least he was saved the embarrassment of rejection.

The winter garden was bathed in a rosy sunset, as events nowadays ended at dusk due to the curfew. On the day he proposed, news of her crowning was announced. He didn't hear her answer due to circumstances, but felt no urge to ask again. He just regretted his impulsive proposal.

   He barely got chance to enjoy the crisp evening air when a soft voice brought him back. “Sir Xanders?”

   Maximin turned to see a radiant beauty before him. “Good evening, Lady Odette. Congratulations also.”

   “Thank you. I just wanted to say, about that day, I’m sorry if my response comes too late.”

   “It’s fine, it's not your fault. I should never have brought it up, we can pretend that I had said nothing at all if you wish.”

   “No, we can’t, I think it only polite that I should give you a proper answer, rather than leave the question hanging over our heads.”

   “If that is your wish, Lady Odette.” Maximin felt his cheeks burn red.

   “Sir Xanders, you are such a good person and I sincerely thank you for the kindness you have shown me over the years, but I’m not sure I could ever see you as more than just a friend. At least, I don’t think I would like to risk my friendship with you,” Odette said calmly. After Maximin poured his heart out to her, her mind raced to the past, and realized that his kindness and care towards her went beyond mere friendship.

She had always seen him as a good person, because he's Alma's father. Because they're friends. But as she peeled back the layers of excuses she had made for their relationship, the truth began to reveal itself.

There was an undeniable affection that had been suppressed and disguised as friendship and camaraderie. How had she not seen it before? Bastian must have known all along, and a deep sense of shame and guilt wash over her. It made her feel disloyal to both him and Maximin, and there was no excuse for her ignorance.

   “That is understandable, even if its not true love, at least we can still be friends, companions, as we have always been,” Maximin said. Odette nodded with a weak smile on her lips.

   “You’re right, Sir Xanders. If I had been thinking of remarrying, I might have given you a different answer, but I like things the way they are right now.”

 Maximin von Xanders would make the perfect husband she had dreamed of. She could see them spending their lives in blissful happiness, even if it wasn't fueled by passionate love. A comfortable companionship and a solid family for Alma, just enjoying each other's warmth. 

But her mind wandered could never forget Bastian. She couldn't bear the thought of betraying her feelings for him by settling for someone else.

   “Is it perhaps because of Major Klauswitz?” Maximin said warily. Odette did not answer and looked away. “I see. I understand, Odette. I respect you and your decision.”

   “I’m sorry, Count Xanders.” Odette turned to go back into the banquet hall.

   “Please, wait a moment.”

   Maximin felt like their friendship had shifted drastically because of his rash actions. He wanted to preserve his honour and wouldn’t be able to forgive himself if he ended things in such a painful manner.

   Taking a deep breath, Maximin stood up straight before Odette and took a deep breath. “There’s something I need to say, about Major Klauswitz.”

Chapter 193.


Pieces of Truth.








After the brief promotion ceremony, the North Sea fleet begun its end of year party. After fulfilling his duties and accepting congratulations from the other officers, Bastian used the opportunity to slip away.

 "Congratulations, Major! Oh no, I mean Admiral  Admiral Klauswitz,” the crew of the Rayvael called out as they saw their commanding officer march by. They were busy enjoying the luxurious food and drink the emperor had provided. It was the best food they had seen in weeks.

   Bastian saluted his subordinates with a mock smile. Even the young conscripts, who wore grim faces, looked bright and cheerful this evening. Once past them, Bastian continued along the dark shore, where the North Sea fleet’s home port was visible.

   Bastian lit a cigarette, facing toward the sea as he let out a puff of smoke. He stood and listened to the crashing waves. A stray, brown dog cautiously approached him. It was slightly larger than Margrethe and circled around him a couple times. Bastian could see a collar, which didn’t really mean anything any more, most of the strays on the island used to belong to someone. Many were painfully thin, their ribs visible. The North Sea winters were harsh, and their human pets struggled to survive in the war-torn conditions.

   “Admiral Klauswitz,” someone called out from the darkness. Eventually, the shadowy figure resolved into that of Lieutenant Caylon. “I just wanted to properly congratulate you on your promotion.”

   “Thank you,” Bastian said. “By the way, Lieutenant Caylon, do you have any biscuits?”

   Caylon looked at Bastian confused, until the movement of the strays caught his eye. “Ah, I don’t have any on me, but if you give me a moment, I’ll go fetch some.”

   Bastian sat on the seat as he watched the moon high in the sky, blowing dark smoke out into the dark sky. The strays wandered a little closer and he thought about Margrethe.

   He had lied to Odette to save her life. He could never have given up on Margrethe. He was determined to find her even if the dog was dead. He wanted to live with hope, not only for himself but also for Odette, because the dog was the only thing left for that miserable woman.

The puppies must be all grown big by now. Bastian chuckled as he thought about the little of giant fluff balls becoming a handful for Odette. Bastian missed having the dog follow him every where he went.

   He realised he had given his heart to that dog. The day before he left for war, Margrethe seemed to sense he was going away for a long time and followed him around more than usual. She whined at him when he tied Odette’s ribbon around her neck, even the maids attempts to calm her failed. Even after the car carrying him drove away, Margarethe stood by the front door for along time, barking until her voice was hoarse. Bastian had to steel himself not to turn back. 

Bastian was brought out of his retrospection by something soft and wet lapping at his hand. The brown dog looked into Bastian’s eyes expectantly, tongue lolling out the side of its mouth. As Bastian petted its head, Caylon came back with a pocket full of biscuits. Bastian couldn’t help but burst into laughter.

"I got permission from the cook, Admiral. Don't worry."  Caylon looked at Bastian with an awkward smile.

   Getting up out of the sand, Bastian and Caylon began distributing the biscuits amongst the strays. Once done, he lit another cigarette and stared out across the absolute darkness across the sea. As he looked up at the moon, he made a wish for his dear Odette.

He hoped that the beautiful and noble woman had finally reclaimed her rightful place. May twenty-five-year-old Odette find the happiness she deserves.



Odette returned home earlier than she planned. The maid was startled to see her mistress return so early and hurriedly opened the door. Despite it being a day of great honour, Odette looked ashen.

   “My goodness, Ma’am, should I call a doctor?”

   “No, no, there’s no need for that. I just need some rest,” Odette said as she made her way into the drawing room.

   Odette collapsed into a high back chair in front of the fire place and took off her cloak with trembling hands. She drank some water the maid brought to her and felt paralysed. It took a little time to piece together the information given to her by Count Xanders.

Bastian prepared this house for her.


On his first day in Rothwein, he met Count Xanders. And even two days before leaving, he ran into him again while biking alone after a date downtown. The man who confidently claimed his rights at first changed his stance within a week. He provided her livelihood and gave the credit to the Count, keeping it all secret as if he asked Maximin to take her husband’s place.

 It was a story she didn’t want to believe, but what reason would Xanders have to lie to her?  Everything Count Xanders said rang true, for his thoughts, actions, and even the smallest were very Bastian-like.

Bastian had deceived her, right when she thought he was on the level.

Her eyes turned to the piano placed by the window. From the very start, Odette had felt uneasy about her situation. She had tried not to think about it, tried to ignore the pressing concerns. She didn’t want to go through the same misery as when she had deluded herself into thinking she was pregnant again.

Bastian had always known that the war was coming. The sudden change in his demeanour suggested he had received the news in Rothewein Odette had to agree. Bastian was meticulous. He would not have prepared a refuge just on a vague hunch that international relations might deteriorate.

Odette's heart twisted in pain as she remembered the memories of last summer, on the day he had missed their dinner date. The man who had come to her, saying that he missed her and would wait for her to change her mind, no matter how long it would take, suddenly changed course. 

He said he would stay with her for more days, so that they could divorce on good terms. Declaring himself a short-term husband, he had come unannounced, spent five precious days, and left. As if he had known about the war and broken his promise on purpose... As if he wanted to make final memories, knowing he would soon face his own death...

Then what about her?

   Odette’s breathing became increasingly laboured, unable to bear the weight of all that sorrow and grief in one hit. She turned to the window, where she could see the golden Ferris wheel spinning on the night sky. 

The townhouse had a perfect view of the Ferris wheel, she could always see its colorful lights shimmering through the window because her house just a stone's throw away from Ratz amusement park. How could she have believed all this was coincidence?

   Too late, Odette realised her breath had caught in her throat and she was unable to take a breath. She collapsed to the floor, the last thing she saw was her crown wheeling away from her.  The brilliance of its jewels felt like they were slicing through her heart. The last memory to cross her mind was that of her storming up to the Emperor, thrusting the crown at him.

  ‘Is this crown what HE wanted for me?’ she demanded of her uncle.

  ‘Oh, I guess you didn’t know.’

There was no need for further questions. The look in his eyes told her everything, as if he saw the most pitiful and foolish child in the world. She felt as though she had just been handed a death sentence. 

With trembling legs, Odette rose from her seat and stumbled out of the reception room, paying no mind to the fallen crown that rolled along the carpet. Bastian's blood-stained crown now meant nothing to her.

"Madam!" The maid's cries echoed through the house, but Odette didn't stop. She pushed past the entrance hall and bolted out of the house, the chill wind whipping at her hair and clothes.



Odette wondered like a ghost to the Ferris Wheel. As if she could find the man she held nothing but resentment for and let her anger flow out of her at him.

   She crossed the quiet road, emptied due to the restriction of vehicles and approached the dream like glow of the park. It had opened just for today. The joyful expressions of the revellers passed her like shadows. It would have been easy to forget that it was wartime.

 You deceived me, 

because you love me,

Because you love me, the unworthy, cowardly me.

  She felt like she knew Bastian’s true intentions, hidden behind expert lies. She couldn’t believe she had never notice it sooner, it was so obvious now. Why had she so foolishly and naively sent him away? 

She hated him for lying, but she hated herself more for forcing him into a position where he had to lie. 

She should have accepted his apology. She should have forgiven him. They should have started anew.

But caught up in her pride, she hadn’t even seen him properly, believing a good bye was the best she could offer.

Passing the carousel and the swings,  she soon came to the front of the Ferris Wheel. Memories of that day swam though her head, slowly surfaced like the golden wheel turning in the sky, when she had loved and been loved, without ever knowing it was love.

The gifts he had left behind, sacrificing everything, brought no joy to her. She had no desire for gold and jewellery, she only desired that man.

The man that had given her the most painful wounds. The one she had hated the most and yet, she was also the one who had loved her the greatest. He was the most precious and dear to her.

He was the person she loved the most in this world.

'I want to have you, Bastian.'

 Tears finally flowed freely down her cheeks. “Please don’t go,” she said to her memories. “I miss you, please come back.”

Words she couldn't bring herself to say before now flowed out with her tears. She stood, motionless, before the Ferris Wheel, like a wounded animal. Her cries drowned out by the joy and excitement of the amusement park. Passers by glanced over at the strange, weeping woman and hurried on, not wanting to let her mood bring them down. 

Her eyes remained fixed on the Ferris wheel twirling in the starlit sky. Her tear-stained face, bathed in the bittersweet glow of the colorful lights, captured a beautiful blend of sorrow and beauty that was impossible to look away from.

  “I love you, Bastian,” Odette said to no one.

The words hung heavy in the air, unable to reach him. As the final night of the year descended, her tears flowed without end.

 “I really love you…”

With passionate confessions were spoken over and over again in an endless rhythm.

Chapter 194.


Your Odette.








There was a strange air of quietness about the naval base ahead of the operation. The noisy festival atmosphere had passed on quite late into the night, now it felt like everyone was walking on thin ice.

   Bastian, along with the other senior officers, inspected the fleet and the port. The commander-in-chief had brought together a huge fleet. The flagship Rayvael was surrounded by three battleships and five battlecruisers. The reconnaissance fleet was set to leave at dawn, with 12 light cruisers and 18 destroyers in formation, and thanks to the ciphers they acquired from the captured ship, they were able to accurately predict the location of Admiral Sher.

   Ryan had chosen to lure the craft little fox out by sending in a small fleet of battleships to bombard the home port of the Lovita fleet. Once Admiral Sher was on the sea, they would then heard the fox into a kill box and sink him for good.

   It was going to be an interesting fight.

Bastian once again explained the scheme of battle operations before dismissing his troops. Despite being younger, all the captains and superiors obeyed the young admiral without question.

“May you have a nice dream, Admiral,” the colonel said politely, despite his previous hostility. 

Bastian saluted him. Comrades fight together, trusting their lives to one another and becoming united in front of the enemy.

He finished his inspection by taking a tour of the barracks. All the soldiers and ratings, who had been full of merriment not twelve hours earlier, were now gloom faced and concerned. They wore forced smiles as Bastian passed them. As letter and envelopes were handed out, the air grew heavier. 

Before a dangerous battle, they were given time to write a letter their family. It more like wills than actual letters and while some of the soldiers liked to enclose locks of hair in their letters, to give the families back home something to bury encase their bodies were lost at sea, Bastian did not indulge in such pointless traditions.

   Once the inspection was completed, Bastian returned to his quarters. After a long shower, a supply soldier delivered envelopes and stationery to his door.

“Sweet dreams, Admiral.” 

Bastian returned to the bedroom with the delivery and turned off the lights, letting in the bright moonlight. He threw the box on the desk and lit a cigarette by pulling out a lighter in the darkness.

   Sweet dreams. A grin crossed his lips. It was tradition in the Berg military to wish good dreams to the commanders before an important battle. It might be a good idea not to sleep tonight, afraid of the nightmares that might come

Bastian finished his cigarette and looked at the box with a new one in his mouth. Despite countless battles, he never made a will and  this night was no exception.

Now it was done.

He had fulfilled all the duties required of him, but had he done enough? He didn’t believe he held any regrets about his past life,  a belief that held true until his final days, though he wished he could see Odette who has found her place one more time.

   A newspaper with the news of Odette’s crowning had come a couple days ago. It filled out the whole front page and several pages after, but there was no photos. It was probably Odette’s choice. He was disappointed, but it was so her.

  He thought it would be a nice to dream about Odette that night. She was the most precious thing for him and that fact would not change with his last breath. Every moment spent with her felt like a beautiful dream. Even the hardships and heartaches were bittersweet, shining in their own brilliance.

She was the light, pulling him out from the depths of darkness. But little did she know, he was the one who imprisoned her in a never-ending nightmare. There was no way to undo the mistakes of the past, but he could avoid committing the same sins in the future. That small sliver of comfort made him smile. He wondered if he would have fallen into a restful sleep by now. 

Bastian looked at the pale moon rose high in the starry sky above, lost in the beauty of the night. The summer night he had spent with her before the war broke out was still fresh in his mind. Her big beautiful eyes looking at him with something other than hatred. Her loving gestures and even the smallest sounds of her breathing.  Despite knowing it was a mistake, he held no regret in his heart. Perhaps it was nothing more than a one-night stand, yet that memory continued to fuel him, keeping him alive until now.

   “Admiral Klauswitz.” 

   Bastian stamped out his cigarette and turned to see who had called to him. It was just a regular soldier. “A letter for you, sir, came in on the artillery ship.”

   “Why is the artillery ships carrying the mail?” Bastian said as he took the letter.

   “I don’t know, sir, I just know its an important letter from the Emperor.”

   Bastian gave a salute, never taking his eyes off the letter. It was from the Emperor, but it did not have the emperor’s name on the front of it. He held his breath, thinking he was dreaming. His eyes wavered at the sight of his name on an envelope with the emperor's seal. He stayed in the cold winter night for a while even after the soldier left.

   Your Odette.

He looked at that dreamy name again and again



To my Bastian.

Odette's letter greeted him by name, Bastian turned on the lamp at his desk to read it.

  It's a deep night, not long before the end of the year, but from where I write, I can see the glittering lights of the Ferris Wheel. The gift you gave me shinning bright. I am both very happy and very sad about it.

  My dear Bastian, the lie you spoke to me has been found out. I know now of all the sacrifices you have made for me. Ratz House, My mothers crown that I got back through your deal with His Majesty the Emperor and even the divorce that was decided for me. Everything.

   As much as I feel sorry for finally shattering the illusion, I hate you for telling such lies, but I can’t bare to resent it because I was the one who silenced you. So I ended up hating myself. This foolish feeling consumes me, I long to let it go.  Because that wouldn't be fair to you, who gave everything for me.

You once said you wanted me to soar like a bird, to find happiness in my new life. I promise to live up to that expectation, never letting dark thoughts taint the beautiful world you've given me.

So I want you to come back to me, Bastian.

 I want you to be my sky, just as I want to be your ocean. I sincerely wish and hope for you to be my beautiful world where I can fly freely and find endless happiness.

    My dear Bastian, please forgive me confessing my love to you now, perhaps too late. I love you. I love you more than anyone else in this world. This confession is a sincere act of atonement, one that I am willing to risk everything for.

   I know you love me too, you gave me a deep, deep love that I have never received from any one before, no one has ever loved me like you do, and in return, I don’t think there is anyone in the world I could love as much as you.

   Love alone cannot heal the wounds we have inflicted in the past, but thanks to you, I have learned that at least you give me the strenght to move beyond the hurt. Thank you, Bastian, I feel like I have finally grown and flourished in your love.  

   When you return, let us stand together at the new starting line. Let's start again from the beginning, without any calculations or goals, just our love for each other. As lovers, friends, family. I want to live like that forever as your Odette. So please be my Bastian forever.

I will share the many feelings I couldn't fit into the letter in your arms when you return.

When that day comes, we will go to the amusement park together. Actually, Bastian. I really wanted to ride the Ferris wheel. I also wanted to try cotton candy. But I hated not being with you. So, I am always looking at the lights of the Ferris wheel from afar.

So Bastian, please come back to me.

For my cotton candy and ferris wheel. For the happy days we will have together. For this timeless love that will never come again.


  With eternal love,

   Your Odette.

There were a few drops of dried tears at the bottom of the page. As he took in the last of the letters, tracing a thumb between each teardrop, Bastian began to tremble.

   He looked up at the moonlit sea and felt the tears build up. The sound of the ticking clock in the hallway became very distinct.

   What should I do with you?

   The overwhelming joy quickly turned to sadness. There was no way he could reach her, beyond the open window all he saw only the darkness.  His breathing became heavy and his eyes fell to the floor, where a strange piece of paper had caught under the toe of his shoe. It must have slipped out in his hurry to open the letter. He picked it up. It was a photo.

The photo he had been waiting for,  Odette looked like a proper princess, in her elegant gown and glittering her mother’s crown. She was smiling as she looked at the camera and Bastian could tell that it was not a genuine smile. He felt like the photo had been taken after she had been crying. Was it a special gift she prepared for him?

   Bastian stared at the photo for what felt like half the night.  Across her beautiful face, memories of the days he had desperately longed for her flooded his mind. After coming such a long and distant way, his heart finally reached her, yet he stood on a path leading to the battlefield.

In the quiet ticking of the clock, Bastian arose from his bed at dawn. He placed Odette's photo and a heartfelt letter into an envelope before calmly washing his face. Every hair in place, he was ready just as the first rays of sunlight peeked through the window.

Then he sat in his desk, finally opening the supply box he had neglected earlier. As the pen stopped its journey across the paper, a shrill siren broke through the silence.

With hope still burning in his heart, he stood up, grabbed his cap and slid into his coat.

The morning of deployment had arrived.

The only way back to his beloved Odette was through: a victory.

Chapter 195.


Like the Spring Snow Melting.








The transport ship docked on the main island of Trosa before dawn, carrying much-needed supplies and volunteers for the military hospital. Word quickly spread about the arrival of Odette Theresia Marie-Laurie Charlotte von Dyssen, a princess and former wife of a renowned naval hero who had recently joined as nursing staff.

"Ah, why are you here?" The Director of the hospital, Colonel Haller, approached Odette with a puzzled expression upon hearing the news.

"Good day, Colonel," greeted Odette politely. "I have been directed by His Majesty the Emperor to join the Naval Nurse Corps on the Northern Seafront. I assume you were informed of my arrival. Is there any confusion?"

"I was aware that additional nursing staff would be joining us, but there was no mention of a princess accompanying them to Trosa Island. It seems there may have been a miscommunication. Please accept my apologies for any inconvenience," 

"Don't worry," Odette said, sensing his confusion at her sudden visit. "I came here to let you know, no need to be concerned." She blushed slightly at the unexpectedness of it all. She had just left the transport ship and discovered that the war fleet was still in port. Though she hadn't been able to inform Bastian of her arrival beforehand, she held onto hope for a chance to bid him farewell before he left.

The night after her emotional breakdown on the ferris wheel, she approached the emperor with a plea to be sent to Trosa island. As her tears flowed freely, a weight seemed to lift from her heart like melting snow in the spring. The seeds of love, long hidden beneath her icy heart, began to sprout and bloom, the newfound love she promised to protect, much like the delicate spring flowers. Clutching a letter addressed to Bastian, she made her way towards the imperial palace with hope firmly planted in her heart.

‘I'll forward the letter to him. There's a transport ship leaving for the Trosa Island tomorrow morning. If you're lucky, the letter will arrive before Admiral Klauswitz heads to the battle.’

With the emperor's approval, Bastian would soon receive her letter. But doubts remained about her journey to his place.

'The risk of attack is small, but it's still a front line where anything can happen at any time.’' 

‘I am ready, Your Majesty. I have complete faith in the Berg fleet's ability to achieve victory. Even if the worst situation approaches, I won't be terrified. This world means nothing to me without Bastian by my side.'

 ‘I have always been fascinated by your love for each other, willing to make sacrifices for one another. So tell me, if your love is true, why then did you both choose to end it in divorce?’ The Emperor puffed on his cigar, the room fell silent, the only sound the gentle rise of smoke swirling lazily between them.

'I know Bastian will undergo a very dangerous military operation.' Odette said.

'I heard, you served as a military advisor in the navy, it looks like you managed to get a considerable amount of classified information.'

'Yes, while translating classified documents, I learned about the potential impact of a large fleet on turning the tide in the North Sea. However, my access was limited and I never sought out hidden information without permission. But Your Majesty, I trust that you will not make the hasty decision to grant Bastian the rank of admiral.’

'So, did you critique my decision?' The Emperor gave her a sharp look, and Odette began to see the true character of her mother's brother.

‘As an emperor, I understand and respect Your Majesty's decisions. However, I ask that you reconsider not as my uncle who worries about his niece but as a leader of the empire.’

The Emperor looked at Odette, who was now bowing her head, 'As an Emperor, should I grant your request?'

‘The royal family is upset with your choice to reinstate my mother's status, damaging relations between Berg and Lovita during the war when the empire was mourning. The public likely feels the same.’

'So?'

‘My devotion to the empire will quiet the criticisms if I join the front lines. As a daughter, it is my responsibility to redeem my mother's sins in this way.’

‘As an Emperor, I see it as a propaganda tactic. Your true purpose is to meet your ex-husband on the battlefield, making it sound more like a tearful love story.’

'That reason isn't entirely foundational, Your Majesty. I don't want to be a burden to the royal family, especially after receiving a title from a North Sea Hero for free. I hope to prove myself worthy by becoming a respected member of the imperial family. Please grant me this chance to turn the crown from Helene's tears into Odette's smile.’

The Emperor's icy gaze didn't scare her. She knew the crown Bastian returned to her held great value, but it was up to her to make it truly shine. She wanted to be a princess worthy of standing by the hero's side.

'Negotiating with the Emperor requires sacrifices, but it will benefit me. I'll use you as bait to fetter the hero, and then use the hero to fetter you. Both of you will my sacrificial lambs for the Empire. Are you willing to go through with a disadvantageous negotiation for love, Odette?' The Emperor gave her a final chance, and Odette stayed silent. 'What a clever yet foolish couple. The grandson of a junk dealer and granddaughter of an emperor make for a perfect match, how amusing.' He pitied her, but his warm gaze gave Odette more courage.

‘Excuse me, Your Majesty, but may I take a photograph?’

‘A photograph?’

‘I want to send a photo of me wearing the crown he returned in my letter.’

‘Why should I, the emperor, care about your love life?’

‘This request is for my uncle, not for the Emperor of the Empire.’

The Emperor chuckled as Odette felt embarrassed and searched for an explanation. Then, the bell rang. He gave the order when the attendant arrived.

‘Call the imperial photographer! And summon a servant to dress her.’

Once the order was given, Odette realised her appearance was untidy. She blushed but tried to stand tall and dignified.  The photo of the restitution of her title, with the Emperor's help, was quickly sent to a transport ship heading to Trosa Islands. The next day, propaganda material about her enrolling in the Navy Nurse Corps and being deployed to the North Sea front was distributed.

"Excuse me, Colonel Haller, may I greet Admiral Klauswitz for a moment?" asked Odette. She had been rehearsing the request since she saw the Trosa Islands on the horizon.

"How should I put it? Admiral Klauswitz's fleet has already set sail," replied Colonel Haller. Confused, Odette looked at the military port. "Aren't his warships still there?"

"That's the main fleet. At dawn, a scouting fleet led by Admiral Klasuwitz was sent to the enemy camp for a diversion operation."

"Ah... okay, I understand." Odette held back her hurt feelings as she reminded herself to be strong. But a siren shattered the silence, signalling that it was time for the main fleet to set sail. She joined a group of volunteer nurses and ran towards the military port, where the main fleet led by a squadron of destroyers  were waiting at the entrance. Together, they set out across the dark blue waters of the North Sea.

She and her fellow volunteers waved goodbye to the war fleet from the dock. Though she couldn't see Bastian off, she had her own duties to fulfill. She trusted he would do his best, and she must do the same.

"Now, volunteer nurse group, please proceed to the hospital!" The command came as soon as the fleet sailed towards the open sea.

Odette joined them, adjusting her cap and recalling her medical training as they prepared to treat severely injured soldiers from enemy artillery fire.

As she entered the area, her heart paused at the stench of blood and screams, but her faith in Bastian's victory kept her moving forward. With a silent prayer in her lips, Odette walked through the hospital's doors, ready to face whatever awaited her inside.



The ocean raged and roared like an angry beast, whipped into a frenzy by the hungry sea fox as it snapped at the tempting bait. 

Bastian and his fearless fleet achieved the impossible, breaking through the impenetrable enemy defence and launching the first attack that shook the seas. Caught in the crossfire of merciless gunfire, Admiral Sher and his soldiers fought back with everything they had.  The cruiser squadron retreated to defensive lines, the war fleet led by the Rayvael surged forward into the ultimate showdown of battle.

"FORMATION READY, OPEN FIRE!" Bastian's voice boomed through the ship's intercom. The Lovita warship squadron had finally come within range and it was time to strike. Two warships swiftly manoeuvred into position, forming a deadly battle formation, their cannons armed and ready.

"ENEMY CONTACT! BEARING 065! IT'S SUBMARINE – POTENTIAL THREAT!" 

Bastian's face hardened as he absorbed the crucial information from the sonar crew. He could feel his heart racing as he monitors the evolving situation, his mind working at lightning speed to come up with a counter-strategy.

The Admiral Sher's fleet began to make a hasty retreat towards the northwest. Just as they think they have the upper hand, sirens blare and all hell breaks loose.

"ENEMY SUBMARINE SPOTTED! THEY'RE PREPARING TO LAUNCH TORPEDOES!" 

The urgent warning blasted through the ship's intercom, sending everyone into a frenzy. Rayvael frantically launched counterattacks, creating a chaotic scene of explosions and water splashing against the hull. They unleashed a barrage of shoots into the raging sea, desperately trying to ward off the approaching enemy submarine. But before their bombardment could be fully executed, Sher's fleet launched a reckless onslaught of firepower, engulfing their own submarine, too, in roaring flames.

"That spy was worthless," Bastian seethed, gritting his teeth in frustration as he watched the burning wreckage of the enemy warship. "ALL FLEETS, CHANGE COURSE TO THE NORTHWEST AND TAKE THE INFILTRATION ROUTE!" He barked out orders. 

"But with that route, we'll need more time to get back to the main force. Our formation will be exposed, giving the enemy an advantage," his aide argued, voicing concerns over the risky decision, which Bastian ignored.

The enemy's submarine squadron was a formidable foe, their battle formation untouchable by any ordinary means. Thankfully, they had superior firepower at his disposal, enough to annihilate their attackers with ease. Bastian ordered his fleet to charge into battle, ignoring the danger of the minefield below. "ATTACK WITH EVERYTHING WE HAVE! LURE THE ENEMY INTO OUR TRAP!" he commanded, shifting from a defensive position to an all-out assault. With the enemy fleet ahead, he couldn't take a safer route. Time and lives were precious, and his duty was to minimize losses and quickly reunite with the main’s fleet.

With Bastian's command ringing in their ears, the entire fleet shifted direction to the northwest. Caught off guard by this sudden change in tactics, the Sher's fleet scrambled to defend themselves as Rayvael unleashed a barrage of devastating shots upon them.

"ONE ENEMY WARSHIP SUCCESSFULLY ELIMINATED!"

Sher's fleet, engulfed in flames from 3 exploding bombs, burned ferociously. The deafening explosion ripped through its ammunition storage, spreading fire and chaos to the nearby ships. As the chaos ensued, Bastian's mind raced, realising too late that Admiral Sher had set a deadly trap. He had intentionally left their ammunition storage door open, luring Bastian's forces into attacking and exposing their defences. It was a desperate and dangerous move, but it seemed to be working as Sher's fleet launched a brutal counter strike.

"MAINTAIN FIRING RANGE! AND AIM FOR THEIR AMMUNITION STORAGE!" Bastian's commanding voice echoed through the intercom, urgent and unwavering. In a frantic scramble, the rest of the fleet obeyed, their hands shaking as they aimed for the storage.

Explosions rocked the sea battle, drowning out all other sounds with deafening booms. Fiery shards rained down as a thick fog of smoke engulfed them like a suffocating shroud, concealing their movements and adding an eerie cloak of darkness to the chaos.

"ONE OF THE PROW TOWERS IS DAMAGED! SEVERAL AREAS ARE NOW FLOODED!"

"SOS! MEDICS! WHERE ARE THE MEDICS!"

Panicked screams and pleas echoed through the air, drowning out all other sounds, but Bastian wasted no time in ordering a counterattack.

A tense silence fell over the chaos as they waited for the outcome. Moments later, a report arrived that shook them to their core - Admiral Sher's warship had also been hit, but the damage was not fatal.

"FULL SPEED AHEAD, JOIN THE MAIN FLEET!" Bastian bellowed, his eyes scanning the horizon beyond the thick smoke. In the distance, Berg's flag fluttered in the wind. With the midday sun beating down on them, the Berg fleet assembled, ready to face their formidable opponent in the ultimate battle.

This was it. The decisive grand battle that would determine the fate of their world - both sides unleashing their full might in a brutal clash of wills.

Chapter 196.


Night on The Sea.








“THE LAUSANNE SHIP HAS SUNK!”

The news spread through the hospital like a thunderclap. All the medical staff's eyes snapped towards the open doorway, pausing all their activity. Even Odette, who was busy gathering blood-soaked bandages, stood frozen.

"ONLY 9 OUT 1,128 PASSENGERS SURVIVED!”

"My Goodness!" One of the nurses moaned in grief, her hands forming a trembling cross. The news of yet another shipwreck, the sixth in a string of tragedies. Odette forced herself to stand tall and steel her nerves, bracing for whatever devastating updates may come next.

“Our destroyed ship rescued the remaining victims and returned to port. Approximately 200 people were injured, mostly from gunfire and fire. Prepare for incoming patients.”

The medical staff's command echoed like a boxing bell. Whimpers and groans filled the room. Odette pushed aside her sorrow and focused on her task, still her anxiety crept in. Their hopes for victory had faded. The Berg naval forces had to change strategy when the realities on the ground were different from the prior information.  But Admiral Klauswitz's leadership led to a successful manned operation, despite the enemy reinforcement fleet remaining undefeated.

"He's passed away. Please clear his bed." 

The military doctor declared the man's death. Odette's heart plummeted watching the soldier was blanketed with white sheet and carried away on a stretcher. He was the patient she took care before. She had just bandaged his wounds and helped stop the bleeding, but it was not enough to save him. As he faded from view, she could hear the wails of agony from the other bed. Quickly, she gathered her medical supplies and turned to the next patient. His uniform was torn and soaked with blood, bullet holes riddling his body

The military doctor carefully removed the bullet fragments from the patient's torn skin. Odette stood with her colleagues, holding the hand of the young soldier who winced before losing consciousness, unable to withstand the intense pain. Once the doctor completed the treatment, it was Odette's turn. She meticulously cleaned and bandaged the patient's blood-soaked body before leaving the place.

"You're here, Princess.” Colonel Haller greeted her when she was changing her bloody apron. “There's a letter for you,"  he took an envelope from his pocket and gave it to her.

Odette felt her eyes tremble as she read the simple "K" on the envelope with her name inscribed on it. It was a letter from Bastian, and she recognized his handwriting.

"Admiral Klauswitz had written a will... no, he called it a letter for you,"

"Thank you," Odette said to him before he left her on her own device.

Alone in the hallway, she leaned against the cool-rough wall, taking a moment to stare at Bastian's letter. The setting sun cast a glow on the white envelope, its reflection dancing over her face and painting her lips a faint red. The sea battle was said to have ended before dusk, and she believed Bastian had emerged victorious and would soon return. 

She closed her eyes and slipped the letter into her skirt pocket, refusing to read it just yet. Wouldn't it be better to hear the good news directly from Bastian himself? 

 Taking a deep breath, Odette changed into a fresh apron and returned to her patient's room. From the peak of day until twilight, she worked tirelessly, until twilight painted the sky shades of purple.



The sun had disappeared behind the horizon, and night had fallen over the vast ocean. Letting out a long breath Bastian removed his helmet he had been wearing for the entire day. It was an unspoken rule among naval officers to avoid battle at night - the darkness made it nearly impossible to distinguish friend from foe, risking heavy losses on both sides. But sometimes, circumstances forced their hand. In the frigid waters of the North Sea, where winter shortened the days, they had to press on with the fight before nightfall. And ironically, even after hours of intense combat, victory still seemed out of reach under the cover of darkness.

With the Berg fleets gaining the upper hand, Lovita desperately needed reinforcements. Just in time, a new fleet arrived from the mainland to support their cause.

When the situation seemed dire, Admiral Sher unleashed his secret weapon and launched a ferocious counterattack. The intensity of this assault made it clear that Lovita had no intention of backing down, using this battle as a means to gain control of the North Sea at any cost.

"ENEMY SHIP SPOTTED AT BOW 92, 19 KM AWAY!

The tower operator's urgent shout echoed through the ship. Bastian quickly donned his helmet, he stood at the bridge and bellowed out orders "TARGET LOCATION DETERMINED, ENEMY IDENTIFIED! FIRE ALL CANNONS AT ONCE!”

In mere moments, Rayvael's cannons roared to life, the air was filled with the thunderous boom as their barrage of shots rained down upon the Lovita's ship.

A towering fire blazing through the darkness. The target ship exploded into fragments, engulfed in flames. The fiery pillar illuminated the horizon, the once-shrouded battlefield was now revealed in all its chaotic glory. In the midst of smoke, enemy’s second fleet had entered the fray, the ships careened into each other, the sound of metal grinding against metal echoed through the air after a wrong manoeuvre by their close distance.

The damaged ship disappeared into the murky depths of the night sea, and darkness cloaked the battlefield once again. Rayvael deftly dodged a torpedo from a Lovita destroyer and changed course to the northeast and west to reposition the battle line.

In a sudden move, Sher's fleet executed a sharp turn and sped towards the north in retreat. The fierce chase was brutal, causing heavy damage on both fleets. Lovita suffered the ultimate blow, they lost more ships to the merciless waters. Their lightning shot strategy had turned into their greatest downfall after they stocked the ammunition warehouse carelessly beyond its capacity. Overflowing with shells and left unguarded, it became a ticking time bomb waiting to explode. 

 What was once an advantage at the start of battle - a rapid-fire tactic - had now become their own undoing. The fight dragged on longer than expected, their sinking ships multiplied.  With dwindling strength and desperate attacks, they were caught up in a horrifying cycle of destruction. 

Both Berg's grand admiral and Bastian plotted their every move to capture the elusive sea fox.  Victory was within grasp, and they would stop at nothing to conquer Commander Sher and bring down the Lovita fleet.

As Rayvael manoeuvred through the chaos of battle, the Lovita fleet desperately tried to breach Berg's defence line. Explosions rocked the sea around them. In a split-second decision, Rayvael made a sharp turn to evade an incoming attack, bullets rained down like hail upon them, accompanied by the thunderous crash of torpedoes tearing through ray shields.

The once powerful ship now shook violently under the devastating blows, breaking apart piece by piece. The sounds of destruction, screams, and weapons clashed together in a haunting symphony of war, drowning out all other sound but the relentless barrage of weapons fire.

Glass shards rained down like deadly hail. With both hands, Bastian shielded his face and surveyed the destruction of his ship with growing panic.  A raging fire consumed the bow, two towers lay in ruins, and a gaping hole gaped where the torpedo had struck. 

"THE TORPEDO HAS CRIPPLED THE RUDDER! EMERGENCY REPAIRS ARE IMPOSSIBLE IN THIS CHAOS!" The officer's voice trembled with fear as he relayed the message from the steering room.

Reports flooded in from soldiers assessing other parts of the ship, each one more dire than the last.

“ADMIRAL!! CASUALTIES ARE MOUNTING ON THE DECK! THE TOWER ARE ABLAZE FROM ENEMY FIRE!”

“THE AMMUNITION WAREHOUSE HAS BEEN SEALED OFF TO CONTAIN OFF THE EXPLOSIONS! BUT IT’S ONLY A MATTER OF TIME BEFORE IT BLOWS!

"SIR, THE LEFT SIDE AND STERN HAVE BEEN BREACHED BY ENEMY TORPEDOES! THE INNER AREA IS NOW FILLED WITH SEAWATER!”

“OUR COMMUNICATION EQUIPMENT HAS DESTROYED, WE CAN’T CONTACT OUR COMMAND SHIP”

Bastian's courage crumbled like a castle made of sand as he witnessed the carnage of his ship and the broken, battered soldiers struggling to hold on. He gave the order to retreat to the defensive rear line at once. But their escape was thwarted, its damaged steering wheel rendering Rayvael immobile.

The crew was trapped, their once-burning determination now smothered as they faced certain doom, their dreams of reaching a safe haven grew slimmer,  despair set in like a suffocating fog

"LIGHT THE FLARE! FIND THE SHORTEST EVACUATION ROUTE!”

Bastian frantically searched for a way out.  Flames licked at his heels and screams filled the air, but all he found in the blinding sea of light was crushing hopelessness.

"ADMIRAAALL! THE ENEMY IS CLOSING IN!”

Bastian clenched his jaw, staring into the murky depths illuminated by the fading flare. A sea dragon anchored, the flag of the Lovita Sea Fleet Commander flapping on its pole, made a sharp turn bore down on their crippled ship. The terror of the seas - a cunning and vengeful fox that had bided its time, Admiral Sher, waiting for the perfect moment to strike back in revenge.

 Sher’s fleet unleashed a deafening barrage of cannon fire. Rayvael's remaining crew tried to fight back with what little weapons they had left on their right side. Explosions rocked Rayvael's body, the ship listed dangerously to the left, its structure torn apart and its once-proud sails now tattered rags.

"ALL HANDS! ABANDON SHIP! LAUNCH THE LIFEBOATS!” Bastian's voice boomed over the alarms. In the pitch-black night, the crew quickly clambered to lifeboats for their last chance at survival, risking it all as they launched into the treacherous sea before the ship plunged into its watery grave.

"SAVE THE WOUNDED AND NON-COMBAT SOLDIER FIRST! THE REST USE EVERY CANNON TO DEFEND THE SHIP UNTIL EVERYONE IS EVACUATED!”

The gravity of their situation weighed heavily on him - Admiral Sher's warship was too close, they managed to launch the lifeboats, but the constant gunfire would make escape impossible. Their only hope rested on the arrival of reinforcements from the command ship, but until then, survival meant fighting tooth and nail for every fleeting moment.

The Lovita fleet surged forward to engage the battered Rayvael. Bastian stood at the helm, sweat pouring down his face as he desperately tried to navigate through the chaos. His troops were running low on ammunition, but they had to hold out until Admiral Demel's ship arrived.

"MOVE FASTER!!"

The soldiers sprang into action, they evacuated wounded comrades and returned to their battle stations.

Bastian tried to steer the damaged ship and engage in an artillery battle with the enemy fleet. But the damage was escalating rapidly, and their non-responsive ship was  quickly becoming a death trap. The pitch-black darkness provided some cover, but it was only a matter of time before Admiral Sher realised their weakened state.

Death loomed over them.  He had to do whatever it took to win and survive, even if it meant walking on the brink of dangerous hell.

Because now I find the way to you, Odette.

So I will surely win.

“EVERYONE! AFTER HALF OF OUR TROOPS HAVE MANAGED TO GET ON THE LIFEBOATS! PREPARE FOR THE FINAL STRIKE!”

A deafening gunshot tore the air once more, shattering the steering deck and sending debris flying. The flames roared louder, forming a thick smoke curtain that began to consume Rayvael in darkness.



"RAYVAEL IS LOSING CONTROL AND DRIFTING OFF COURSE!” the scout shouted from the command ship,  watching on the inferno consuming the once-proud vessel.

Admiral Demel's gaze follows the scout's pointed finger to the Klauswitz fleet, now crippled and unable to steer amidst the raging fire on their deck. The mighty ship, known for its unmatched record of enemy destruction, now lies abandoned and defeated on the front lines. 

The sea fox, their cunning foe, had outmanoeuvred and dealt a devastating blow to his archenemy.

Demel's frozen fingers struggle to wipe away the frost forming on his face. Admiral Sher's blind obsession to defeat Bastian overrode any rational thought, and he gave the order to launch a full-scale assault. His grudge on Bastian drove him forward like a madman. The sea fox that had once been known for his cunning strategies now showed no fear of death as it barreled towards its target. He was willing to sacrifice everything, even himself,just to see Bastian's death

"Are we still unable to establish communication?" Admiral Demel's voice dripped with impatience as he paced the deck.

In a sudden burst, Rayvael fired a rescue flare into the night sky, casting an intense, blinding light over the endless ocean below.

"ADMIRALl! RAYVAEL IS SENDING A SIGNAL!" 

 Admiral Demel sprinted towards the bridge dock. His face drained of all colour at the sight of the red crimson flag fluttering behind the smoke from cannon shots. The other officers wore equally horrified expressions. He couldn't believe it even though he had seen it firsthand until one crew member's voice rang out, laced with tears. 

"...Rayvael …..will be resting forever in the depths."

Chapter 197.


Bastian.




 



"ADMIRAL, MORE THAN HALF OF OUR CREW HAS MANAGED TO ESCAPE!” 

The words reverberated through the frigid, dark night like a death knell. The final mission began. The remaining soldiers scrambled to flee from the sinking wreckage of their ship, leaving behind the half-destroyed hull. In the darkness of the night, the waves tossed and turned, Admiral Sher and his troops surged forward with unrelenting force, their weapons drawn and ready to fire. 

Bastian's gaze flicked to the watch on his wrist, counting down the seconds until his plan would be put into action. "WE WILL LEAVE IN 5 MINUTES!  LEAVE ONE LIFEBOAT EMPTY. PASS THAT TIME, DON’T HESITATE TO DEPART AT ONCE!”

Time was ticking down and only 5 minutes before Rayvael would completely rest on the depths. The entire ammunition depot was thrown open as elite forces, led by him, were dispatched, blood and sweat mingled to complete their last mission.

Bastian's mind had to race to search for a plan as Admiral Sher relentlessly launched attack after attack. With the Rayvael loaded with explosives, he saw an opportunity to turn the ship into a deadly weapon that could blow up Admiral Sher  and buy them precious time until Admiral Demel's rescue ship arrived.

Bastian stood on the frontline and led  his prepared soldiers into battle. From the deck, flares sparkled once or twice, emerging from across the night sea. Three bursts of light in quick succession responded to their desperate SOS signal and confirmed Admiral Demel's rescue ship was on its way.

One more step, just one more step to reach her place.

 That determination pushed him forward, he sprinted towards the ammunition depot with every last ounce of strength in his body. The deck was in ruins, littered with debris and blood. The stench of death and smoke overwhelmed his senses as he ran, and one by one, he collected the dog tags hanging from the necks of his death comrades on his way.

The deafening roar of cannons once again hit Rayvael as he arrived at the weapons and ammunition depot. A fiery explosion decimated everything in sight, engulfing some young soldiers who had fought until the bitter end in flames. Their bodies burned and fell into the merciless sea, disappearing below the dark waves of the North Sea, never to be seen again. 

"MOVE! SCATTER AND ESCAPE ONCE THE MISSION COMPLETED!” Bastian's voice boomed over the chaos as he bellowed orders to the remaining soldiers. They scrambled towards their designated positions, dodging explosions and gunfire, some of them raced towards the lifeboats as time was  ticking away in a deadly countdown.

Odette.

The mere mention of her name had the power to make Bastian stand up again.

That name stirred something inside of him.

That name was the reason why he wanted to keep on living.

Whenever he felt the fear of death creeping in, he would think of her - the one whose name was etched into his soul...

‘I love you’

Those miraculous words of her love confession seemed to swirl around again.

‘Please come back’

And her desperate plea continued to echo inside his head. 

Over and over, he had to keep going. He needed to survive – to make it back to the woman who loved him and whom he loved in return.

To My Eternal Odette

The memory of the starting line of his letter to her kept burning, like a relentless flame that refused to die.

Despite being thrown to the ground by the shattering debris from the collapsing ship, Bastian pushed through the rubbles and forced himself up. He wiped the flowing sweat disturbing his view; his helmet has been lost in the chaos. He checked his watch - 

Only 3 minutes left. 

The acrid smell of gunpowder filled his nose as he ran towards his destination like a wild beast on the hunt. His legs burn with exertion, his body screaming for rest, but he pushed on, whispering the words from that sacred letter as if it were a prayer to God that may be listening.

Odette, my dear Odette.

I love you, Odette, I've always loved you.

From that moment when first my eyes met yours, to this very second, there has never been a single moment when I stopped loving you.

 Even when I tried to hate you, in the end, my heart still loved you.

But I was living a lie. I used excuses to keep myself from facing the truth. 

To deny you.

To hurt you again.

To protect you.

There was always an excuse attached, but only one truth remained.

I was a coward, too weak to face these new and unfamiliar feelings that besieged my senses. I was always afraid and confused by the strange emotions I felt for the first time in my life, so I just ran away.

Odette..please forgive me.

 Please forgive me for everything. 

And thank you.

 Your love has saved me from my own darkness and pulled me out of an endless hell.

The letter he wrote for Odette continued to dance in his head as the world around him erupted in a symphony of booming explosions and twisting blaze. Images of her waiting for him at the end of a road engulfed in devouring flames flicked before his eyes.

"DANGER, ADMIRAL!" Lieutenant Caylon's voice shattered through the chaos.

Reflexively, Bastian shielded his head from the raining debris. The impact crushed his wristwatch, shattering its glass and stopping  the clock-hands.

Perhaps 2 minutes left...

Counting the remaining time, he flew through the ship's corridors to reach the ammunition room before it was too late. He just turned the corner and finally opened the door, when a fierce explosion rocked the entire ship. The roar of cannons and the people screams rang in his ears. Chaos erupted as shrapnel rained down on the ship, ripping apart his comrades and sending them falling into the unforgiving ocean below.

"GET UP! RUN QUICKLY!" Bastian screamed through the smoky air. He sprang to his feet and urged his soldiers towards the waiting lifeboats. 

The Lovita cannon relentlessly attacked Rayvael again and again. Bastian dropped to the ground and crawled, using his own wounded body as a shield. His uniform was torn and covered in blood and ash, but he forced himself to get back up and keep running towards the depot.

I will do my best to let go of the veil of past regret that dims my spirit's light.

It’s my duty to you, as a way to show my gratitude for your forgiveness and your love.

 I promise to return to your side with nothing else but love for you.

I will stand by your side to start anew, as your lover, your friend, and your family. Through this, I hope to make amends for my wrongdoings by devoting myself entirely to you for the rest of our lives.

The promise inscribed in his letter was a lifeline. It pulled him to stand again and again. Every time pain imprisoned him and nearly toppled his consciousness. When his entire body was being crushed—he would remember those words he wrote in his letter.

Odette, ...I want to live.

I want to live with you.

"ADMIRAL! ADMIRAL!" 

He could faintly hear the cries of the rescue crew. The ship's hull was engulfed by water and a Lovita vessel fired, sinking one of the lifeboats. The expected Demel Fleet was nowhere in sight, likely occupied with other enemy ships..

“SHER! YOU BASTARD!”

Bastian staggered towards the ammunition warehouse, the door loomed ahead of him, partially open. He found Lieutenant Caylon weakly sitting and holding onto the door handle.

"I promised…. my wife and children... I will return..." Every time he tried to speak, red blood kept spilling from the corners of his lips.

Bastian carried Caylon to safety, blood soaking his hands. He couldn't tell whose blood it was as they fled from danger.

Caylon's whisper calling for his family faded as they escaped into the night. A photograph, stained with blood, slipped from his weak grasp and was carried away by the strong winds, disappearing into the haze of gunfire. He placed Caylon's lifeless body on the edge of the deck. Then, he took a dog-tag pendant from Caylon's neck and tucked it into his pocket.

 Bastian stood gazing at the sinking Rayvael, the icy sea water rushing in to envelop the entire ship. The sound of increasingly intense artillery fire became blurred, as if happening in a distant world. He no longer felt pain in his body; everything seemed swallowed by the shadow of the impending death.

A deranged laugh escaped from his lips, echoing across the deck as he stumbled forward on legs that felt like lead weights. 

Odette, even if my body cannot return to your side, may you not dwell in overwhelming sorrow and despair. 

Let not my demise cast you a lasting sadness, for my love will always be with you..

My love will be in the winds that rustle through the skies where you fly, and in the waves of the sea when you swim in.

I will always be with you wherever you are , in your world, everlastingly accompanying you.

 So, Odette, when I’m gone, I hope you love your world and fill your days with beauty. For I hold firm to the belief, that’s  the way to keep our love to last forever, beyond the end of time.

The words from his last message to Odette pounded in his head like a relentless drumbeat, driving him forward as he stumbled and clawed his way through the darkness. Thick smoke choked him, his body screamed for him to stop, but he pushed on, tripping and stumbling until he rose again, And then….

Like a beacon of hope, Admiral Demel's ship emerged through the fog.

This was it - the final showdown.

He wiped his face, smearing blood, sweat, and tears across his skin, before turning towards the final lifeboat waiting for him. The watch on his wrist had stopped ticking long ago, but he knew that only five minutes had passed.

Bastian ran across the battered ship's deck, and jumped into the churning sea where the rescue fleet loomed in the distance. In a split second, a blast erupted behind him, a boom split the air as a shot destroyed through the ammunition warehouse. Flames burst forth, engulfing the Rayvael ship in a fierce inferno and rapidly creeping towards Admiral Sher's warship. 

Bastian closed his eyes against the blinding glare of fire across the ocean floor. The icy water swallowed him whole, dragging his body further and further…. into its depths…… 

Odette....

my eternal love......

My life was once a broken ruins, forged from the embers of hatred and pain. I used to live only for revenge and destroy things—I believed it was my sole reason for being alive in this world.

Through you, I understand the meaning of true love. That's the gift you gave me. Because of you, I learned how to protect myself in order to keep living on.

You were the first person I wanted to protect when the sword of death came my way.

With you by my side, the world seemed brighter and more beautiful, and our memories together continue to give meaning to my life. 

I am grateful to have you in my life. You have brought joy and love into my world.

 Odette my love, I found happiness in loving you.

There were countless words I wanted to share with you while holding you close.

But...

When the time comes when my arms can’t hold you anymore, I hope you remember this...

Loving you, that’s my life.....

With eternal love,

Bastian.

Chapter 198.


A Name Without an Answer.




 



News of victory was announced, with the sinking news of Admiral Bastian Klauswitz's ship, the Rayvael.  

"Only half of the 1,264 souls aboard were able to escape. The Admiral Demel fleet rescued the survivors and brought them to the nearest port. But many suffered severe injuries - we must prepare more hospital beds immediately!" When the medic delivered the news, all eyes turned to Odette who was busy cleaning the deceased patient's bed. 

Bastian. Rayvael. Sunk. She repeated the words in disbelief. Taking a deep breath, she tried to calm herself but the news was still hard to digest. She pushed aside her dark thoughts and back to focus on her duties; the report wasn't all bad this time - half of the passengers were reported safe, so there was still a chance Bastian could return alive. 

As the Berg fleet sailed back to the harbor, the hope in Odette's heart burned brighter. Bastian's presence in the distance and their soon-will-be reunion kept her going, like a racehorse sprinting towards the finish line. She refused to let doubts or fears cloud her mind and believed that he would be fine, pushing aside any negative thoughts.

So please...

She continued her work, holding back the tears that threatened to overflow at any moment. With a heavy heart, she gathered the blood-stained bandages scattered around the hospital room and delivered medicines from one place to another. Her hands trembled with every task, but she refused to let any tears fall. It wasn't until a fellow nurse gently touched her shoulder, 

"You can let go now," she said. "It's time to rest. You can go to the military harbour if you need to."

Odette looked at the head nurse sadly. It suddenly hit her how much she had been holding back. "No...," Her voice, barely a whisper, escaped her lips "first, I must finish my work..."

“You’ve worked tirelessly since morning. You've done enough for today, my dear. It's alright; go ahead...” The head nurse smiled and gently pushed her back towards the door.

Her hands trembled uncontrollably as she clutched a tin can filled with bandages and a bottle of medicine "I am sorry for the inconvenience." she murmured and took the head nurse's advice. At this moment, she was unable to provide the best care for the soldiers fighting to stay alive.

Without hesitation, Odette rushed out of the hospital towards the military harbour. The biting North Sea winds lashed against her skin, but she powered through, numb to the biting cold. Even when her feet gave way and she fell, she felt no pain. Only one thought drove her on….

Bastian.

She whispered his name along the shoreline  like a sacred prayer as she raced towards the lights of the approaching fleet emerging from the depths of the dark sea.

A heavy cloud of sorrow seemed to hang in the air as she stepped onto the military camp at the dock. Dozens of men stood with slumped shoulders and downcast eyes, their faces painted with grief over the loss of half of their fellow comrades-in-arms only a mournful silence that weighed heavily on the hearts of all who witnessed it.

She bulldozed through the sea of injured soldiers. Panic and desperation fueled her search for survivors from the decimated Rayvael ship. But every step brought her closer to despair, until a soldier sensing her distress, reached out and guided her towards a distant dock at the edge of the harbor.

 "Admiral Demel fleet is about to arrive here. All survivors from the Rayvael ship are on board." he said. 

Grateful but without a chance to thank him, Odette watched as the soldier disappeared back into the chaos. 

Standing behind the gathering soldiers, she anxiously awaited Bastian's arrival. Bathed in the cold moonlight, the chill in the air made her shiver, but she refused the military doctor's offer of a blanket to warm her up. 

As the wind howled like a hungry beast and the waves crashed against the shore, a massive warship slowly sailed into the harbour.  At the peak of the ship illuminated by blazing torches on deck, proudly waving in the wind, was the admiral's flag of the Demel fleet. With practised ease, Odette straightened her dishevelled clothes and hat until it sat perfectly atop her head. She needed to appear flawless when greeting Bastian even though her insides were a chaotic mess.

The warship screeched to a halt at the dock, its engines still roaring as medical officers rushed onto the ship. The dock was a gruesome sight, littered with bodies and resembling a bloody battlefield, "Prepare the stretchers, we need to evacuate the most severely injured immediately!"

They rushed to transport critically wounded soldiers and Odette stepped back to make room for the busy medical staff. She couldn't help but think about Bastian, with so many urgent patients requiring first aid, she thought that he would likely disembark from the ship later on.

As the victims were being evacuated, a military doctor noticed Odette and approached her. "I'm sorry, but you should leave this place immediately."

Odette, who had been praying, looked up at the doctor with worried eyes.

"Admiral Klauswitz will be transported from the ship soon. He is in a critical state and needs immediate surgery."

Odette's mind was thrown into chaos the moment she heard Bastian's name. It felt like a hammer pounding on the fragile pieces of her world, threatening to shatter it completely. She stumbled across the bridge, her legs feeling like they were made of lead to the warship loomed ahead. The sight that greeted her was grim - Admiral Demel standing next to a soldier covered in blood, being carried down from the ship on a stretcher.

No...it can't be. She shook her head, trying to deny the horrifying truth in front of her. Her world shattered as she stumbled backwards, but before she could turn away, Admiral Demel called her name in shock, "Odette?" He quickly changed his shocked expression and stepped forward to block her view. "You shouldn't see this, Odette."

The medical officer rushed past, quickly carrying the stretcher. Odette's eyes fell on the injured patient, catching a glimpse of platinum hair.

"Ba...Bastian..." Her throat tightened.  She called out his name, but no response came from the bloody figure lying before her. 

"BASTIAN!” Odette screamed, pushing away Admiral Demel who tried to comfort her. BASTIAN!"

"STEP BACK!" The military doctor shooed Odette away from the ambulance.

"PLEASE, I AM HIS FAMILY!” Odette raised her voice, shouting. "I AM ADMIRAL KLAUSWITZ FAMILY! PLEASE LET ME ON BOARD!!"

"She’s his family, let her board."

Odette and Admiral Demel burst into the ambulance, after the doctors let them in. Bastian covered in blood took her breath away. The siren’s wail began to blare as they sped off towards the hospital, racing against time to save Bastian's life.



Bastian was rushed to the military hospital's operating room, bypassing other waiting patients. Outside, Odette stood guard, her face was deathly pale, looking as if she could faint at any moment.

Demel couldn't bear to ask her to take a moment's rest. He had just received word from his superiors that she had volunteered as a medical staff on the treacherous Trosa Islands, risking her life to find her ex-husband. And without any explanation necessary, he understood her reasons. 

Demel sat on a bench at the end of the hallway, his eyes squeezed shut to block out the haunting memories of that night. His wrinkled hand wiped his weathered face.

The sea god had saved the hero when all seemed lost. 

Bastian's rescue was nothing short of a divine miracle. He, unable to reach the rescue ship in time, jumped into the sea. A lifeboat raced to where he had fallen, only to find him gone, swallowed by the darkness below. Just when all hope seemed lost an unexpected miracle occurred: Bastian resurfaced, battered and broken but miraculously alive.  

With all his remaining strength, he tried to climb the remains of the sinking ship floating in the sea. A passing lifeboat spotted his desperate plight and changed course to save him. When they pulled him to the lifeboat, a deafening blast rocks the waters, the Rayvael ammunition warehouse exploded, engulfing Admiral Sher's warship in violent flames that lick hungrily at the sky.


Admiral Klauswitz, the North Sea Hero, had finally vanquished the notorious Sea Fox

- a feat celebrated by all. But for Admiral Demel, it was a hollow victory. In his mind, Bastian still had one final mission left to fulfill: returning home alive. No amount of praise or accolades would matter if this final task was left undone, the entire operation would be deemed a failure in his eyes. Admiral Demel raised both of his hands and prayed.

‘God, please protect your son once more’

That night, shortly after boarding the lifeboat, Bastian lost consciousness again. The doctor marvelled at his survival thus far - swimming in the frigid sea with countless wounds was nothing short of a miracle. Demel watched how Bastian fought for every last breath, barely hanging on to life. The medical team on the warship did everything they could - first aid, an emergency operation, even a blood transfusion - but Bastian's condition remained dire. Even the military doctors in the hospital couldn't offer much hope for his recovery. His very life hung by a thread, and everyone could only pray for a miracle.

"We will do our best."

When asked about Bastian's condition, Admiral Demel understood the meaning behind that answer. But he refused to acknowledge it, and Odette knew too, Bastian's chances of survival were slim.

"Is the operation over?" Odette's voice snapped Demel out of his thoughts as she spoke with a nurse outside the operating room.

"What happened?" he asked.

"I'm sorry, but it seems that the operation needs more time. We are running out of blood and need to find donors."

"Alright. I will inform the whole unit. What's that?" asked Admiral Demel.

"These are Admiral Klauswitz’s belongings," said the nurse, handing a box that she was holding to Odette. "We'll do our best to save him," she added, before heading back to the operating room.

After Admiral Demel left, Odette was left in stunned silence. She stood in front of the operating room door with a box in her hands containing Bastian's blood-soaked military uniform and other small packets containing items that could easily get lost.

Odette's legs trembled as she stumbled towards the window, her hands shaking as she placed the box on the windowsill. Bastian surely would survive. That's what she believed to steel her heart as she opened the first bag and found a jumbled mess of dog tags belonging to the dead soldiers.

Carefully, Odette tidied them up and put them back in the bag. She unzipped the next bag. There was a letter already soaked by seawater and blood addressed to her. The emotions inside her grew as tears threatened to spill from her eyes. And as she unzipped the last bag, she saw another dog tag with a ring slipped into its strap.

Tears blurred her vision, but she knew it was belong to him without a doubt. 

The ring was familiar to her, the same wedding ring they had exchanged on their wedding day.

She took the dog tag and held it tightly in her shaking hands,  while tears spilled uncontrollably from her eyes.

Bastian….

The pain tore through her chest, tearing her heart until it was shattered into a million pieces.

It hurt, almost too much to bear.

Bastian....

Her cry broke out, a scream that she had kept locked inside for so long finally burst forth, echoing along the hospital corridor.

In the dimly lit darkness, she cried without end, calling him with every breath

Bastian...

But her cries went unanswered, met only with a cruel silence. Regret consumed her whole, tearing at her until the break of dawn when the doors to the operating room opened once again and reality came crashing back in.

Chapter 199.


Paradise Sea.






 




As the sun rose on the horizon, Odette began her busy day. She woke up to the soft blue light of dawn and felt surprisingly refreshed despite her restless sleep. With a quick stretch, she got out of bed and neatly made it. After taking a shower and a change of clothes, she donned her familiar nurse's cap and headed towards the hospital bed with a warm towel in hand.

 "Good morning, Bastian," Odette said with a smile, kissing his cheek. She felt a pang of sorrow when he didn't respond.

Bastian lay peacefully with his eyes closed, almost as if he had just drifted off to sleep. Odette sat in a chair next to the bed, gently stroking his face as she began her storytelling. Her voice was soft and warm, like the comforting glow of a fireplace, as she weaved an intriguing tale. At times, she would pause, overcome with emotion, but she doggedly, carrying on her one-sided conversation with Bastian in the tangible quiet of the room.

The surgery had been a success. The doctors were able to remove all fragments of the bullet and his internal injury was not as severe as feared. However, his recovery was still uncertain due to major bleeding and hypothermia. All they could do now was wait until he woke up.

She held onto her belief and gratitude, praying to every deity for Bastian's recovery. Although the doctor attending to him grew uneasy after a week had passed with no signs of improvement, she remained confident that Bastian would wake up and refused to give up hope as she continued to wait by his side.

Bastian's condition showed signs of a miraculous recovery. His body temperature, pulse, and breathing were finally returning to normal after days of dangerously low levels. Odette could feel the steady rhythm of his heartbeats and warmth from his hand as she held it.

For her, Bastian was merely in a deep slumber. His body and soul were beyond exhausted, drained from a lifetime of never-ending running. She only had to believe in him and wait patiently by his side. He just lay in a deep slumber for much-needed rest and would wake up after getting enough rest. 

After wiping his face, Odette carefully pulled back the blanket and examined Bastian's injuries. His wounds now showed signs of healing, and his broken bones seemed to be slowly mending. The warm morning light bathed his strong and handsome form, enveloping him like a blessing in the making.

Odette changed his bandages with care, all the while wearing a smile. Though tears threatened to fall from her eyes, she bravely held them back.  On the dawn that she heard the news about the success of his operation, she made a promise to herself that she wouldn't cry until he woke up. She didn't want to let him see her weakness and shattered. She wanted to show him her strong determination, just like he was in his fight for life and recovery.

After changing the bandages, she continued her story while cleaning Bastian's body. Day after day, she repeated the routine - pouring her heart and soul into each word as she talked to the unconscious man lying before her. Though sometimes waves of sadness crashed over her, she never stopped her storytelling, never faltering or missing a beat.

The doctor recommended stimulating Bastian's senses as a way to bring him out of his coma. From then on, she made it a daily ritual to talk to him in the morning and at night after cleaning his body. If words felt too heavy, she would sing sweet melodies and other times when even that became too much, she simply whispered his name. 

Odette settled into the chair beside Bastian's bed after covering him with a warm blanket. The wintry landscape outside was beautiful, but she couldn't fully appreciate it as beads of sweat formed on her forehead. Taking care of Bastian was no easy feat, as he suffered from extensive nerve damage and even the slightest mistake could worsen his condition. But she found some joy in caring for him, as she could be of use and do something for Bastian during these moments.

Through the window, the clear sky above the Trosa Islands stirred a longing in her heart for his gaze. "The sky is beautiful, without a single cloud in sight, Bastian. Just like your eyes, as if the sky has morphed into you lying here," she whispered to his sleeping form. "I don’t blame you, I know you need rest, my love, but please come back to me soon."

Tears welled up in her eyes as she stared at the scar on Bastian's cheek and chin. It may have been a small shaving cut, but it held a deep emotional scar on her. She felt guilty, as if she had added to the pain of the already wounded man, and couldn't help being annoyed that he was peacefully sleeping while she struggled with her feelings.

Almost every day, she shaved Bastian's moustache and beard, even though she could have easily asked for help from a professional barber. But she didn't want the world and anyone else to see him in his helpless state. And that became a matter of pride for her. She wanted to protect him, love him, take care of him, and do everything in her power for him.

Because he was her family. The family she chose, not an inherit–the family she longed for and built one of her own– And in the end, became her true family.

"Bastian, as you can see, my shaving skill is so bad. I don't want you to wake up one day and get startled by my 'expertise'," she joked, trying to ease her own tears. Her fingers trembled as she ran them through his neatly combed platinum hair. Glancing at the clock, she realised it was almost time for her nursing duties to begin. She rose from her seat and put on her blue nurse's uniform

Whatever the purpose, she came to this place to become a member of the nursing volunteer group, and she didn't want to neglect any of her assigned duties.

Because Love came with a responsibility. And that belief alone was strong enough to stave off her feelings of despair. Because she loved him, for the one she loved, she would do everything right.

After giving him a gentle kiss on the cheek, Odette quietly left the hospital room. The soft rustle of her deep blue gown accompanied her as she made her way to her workstation.



A glimmer of light emerged in the darkness. It shone like the sun in its full glory, then dimmed into moonlight before eventually fading back into darkness, and from that twilight, a dream began to bloom. 

In that dream, Bastian was a young boy wandering through a dark forest. A huge dog with the body of a wolf suddenly ran towards him. When he took out the eggs and bread that he had secretly hidden in his pocket, the stray dog wagging its tail in excitement. 

He slowed down his pace as he watched the dog happily playing. The dog's eyes glistened with love and longing, captivating him. A hint of shame tingled in his cheeks as he realised he had been using stolen food from the kitchen to gain the dog's trust. Quickly, he handed over the peeled egg, along with all the other food he had brought. While the stray dog sat patiently, waiting for its next meal, Bastian couldn't shake off his nagging doubts:  

Did this dog truly love him?

 In the depths of his heart, a mix of uncertainty, fear, and hope all vying for his attention. And when the answer finally came to light, it wasn't in the form of love. The dog's sharp fangs tore into his skin, ripping apart his flesh until it’s bleeding.

A gasp of pain escaped his lips. He quickly dropped to the ground, reflexes taking over as he loaded a bullet into his hunting rifle. The loud bang of the gunshot shattered the forest's silence, and brought back his recurring nightmare. Blood gushed from his previous wounds and he could finally feel the raw sadness that came after the physical pain.

He stood at the edge of the cliff, his rifle still in hand. He looked upon the dog he had just shot, in its fading eyes, he saw a glimpse of himself filled with guilt and regret. The dog wagged its tail until its last breath, no food in his hands, only the rifle that had taken its life. 

With a hollow expression, he turned away and walked towards the cliff's edge

A wave of relief engulfed him as his body glided freely through the air, diving headfirst into icy embrace of the ocean depths. He let go of the haunting memory of his aunt's attempt to save him. His peaceful dreams returned at last.

Thank God.

Relieved and calm,  he let the ocean's arms cradle him as he closed his eyes in peaceful surrender.

'Bastian.'

A soft, murmuring voice floated into the stillness of the world. The boy blossomed into a young, his youth fading like a setting sun.

'Bastian.'

The beautiful siren sang once more. As he covered his ears, his very being began to change, maturing with each of her notes. When he opened his eyes, he was no longer in the depths of the sea but surrounded by fields of vibrant red blooms. And there, holding hands with a beautiful young girl.

Her beaming smile lit up the flower field, her porcelain skin and luscious black hair held a delicate beauty, so lovely like that of a living doll. They walked together among the blooms, riding on wooden horses, gathering her favourite flowers, and playing with a ball lost in their joyful play under the softening sun.

The girl stirred a sense of déjà vu within him, one that he had cherished long ago. In the distance, the faint sound of a barking dog reached his ears. The same stray dog he had once loved and had loved him back.

As he stood still, the stray dog and the girl ran together joyfully through a blazing sea of red petals as if they were bound by fate. 

‘Bastian.’

A longing voice carried his name on the wings of the wind. He turned to find its source, but the little girl and the stray dog had already soared into the sky, never to be seen again 

He froze in place in the middle of the field where the crimson waves danced around him. Mesmerised, he looked closer, it was not a flower but an endless sea of blood. And in an instant,  the bloody sea devoured him whole in its ever-rolling tides.

‘Bastian.’

The haunting call of his name grew nearer,

He submerged himself in the depths of the sea closing his ears, shutting out the sounds.

It hurt...

It felt like…. a piercing wound.... 

Ripples of pain.

The Siren's song grew louder, its melody pulling him deeper into the abyss of pain. Exhaustion crept through his weary bones, tempting him to surrender to a never-ending slumber. 

Perhaps it’s better like this…

To stay within the arms of the ocean and faded away in an eternal sea of dreams

‘Bastian.’

But why 

Why does that song of delusion not stop?

‘Bastian.’

He was adrift in the tumultuous sea, lost in the ebb and flow of life.

 As he opened his eyes, the water retreated further and further from his sight. Even beneath the dark water, he could glimpse the shadows of flame dancing on their own.

His hands slowly fell away, and his ears were greeted by the enchanting verse of the sea siren.

It was... a beautiful melody

Like a spellbinding love.





Odette arrived at Bastian's hospital room earlier than usual, thanks to the kind nurse who had shortened her shifts. After disinfecting her hands, she drew back the curtain to let in the warm afternoon light. With the room now clean and bright, she approached Bastian's bed and took a seat, gently humming to herself as she waited.

Bastian remained in a comatose state, showing little improvement since his transfer to the ward. Colonel Haller had warned that his recovery may take a long time because of the severity of his injuries. Although her heart was heavy with sadness, Odette tried to offer reassurance that Bastian would recover. But the doctor simply gave her a sympathetic look and chose to end the conversation.

"Bastian….."

As her melody faded into silence, Odette whispered his name like a prayer on her lips. 

'I am very scared and lonely, Bastian. So please wake up and hug me.'

She couldn't utter those words, and just rested her head on Bastian's body. The steady thrum of his heart became her sacred rite, it was a balm for her soul whenever she felt weak.

"Bastian….."

His name kept dancing off her tongue as if it were the only word worthy of being spoken.  Tears streamed down her cheeks, and suddenly she felt a comforting hand gently stroking her back in soothing circles.  Odette slowly raised her head, and a pair of blue eyes glowing as bright as a cloudless sky were full of her.

Bastian was smiling. With his pallid face, but radiant like a child-like innocence.

"...I'm back, Odette…..."

His voice sounded weak, but Odette clearly heard it 

"I love you…."

She could hear everything…

Each breath and every word…

Even his whispered confessions that sounded like sighs blending with the wind.

"Welcome back, my love."

Odette's smile bloomed like a flower in springtime, her turqoise eyes shining with love, like sparkling emeralds reflecting the sun-kissed waters. It was a pure and simple love, radiating from every fibre of her being.

'Thank you for coming back to me.'

Her heart overflowed with emotions, unable to contain the depth of her love. Emotions too deep to articulate poured forth in a single sob. Then, her tender kisses rained down on Bastian's face - forehead, cheeks, and lips all marked with her love's passionate seal.

Her radiant smile was washed away by tears of joy, leaving him speechless but feeling loved beyond measure.

Bastian wiped away Odette's glistening tears, and she held his hand full of love.

After a treacherous voyage across the endless ocean, the hero ship had finally dropped its anchor.

He finally arrived at the paradise sea, in the Siren's arms who was singing about love.  

-----

Continue in Epilog, Odette's diaries and More side stories!!
